2
CHAPTER I.
THE PLATFORM.
To say that the townspeople of this mighty
metropolis
were in a state of greater excitement and activity on
a certain night in a certain month of Novemberwhich
it is not necessary more particularly to definethan they
are on certain other nights of periodical recurrence, would
be to do the said townspeople arrant injustice, and to
establish
for the chronicler of the following authentic
history
,
at the very outset, a questionable character for truth
and plain-speaking. On this immediate occasion,
however
,
there was, it must be confessed, a commendable
degree
of agitation and enthusiasm visible, in almost every
quarter of the city. Crowds were emerging from lane,
alley and thoroughfare, and pouring into the central streets
in the direction of the Hall; sometimes in knots of three,
four or more, all engaged in earnest conversation, in a
loud key, with vehement gesture, and faces considerably
discolored by excitement. The persons composing these
various peripatetic and deliberative groups, could not be
said to be of any single class or profession, but mingled
together indiscriminately, much after the fashion of a
country store-keeper's stock, where a bale of fourth-price
flannel neighbors a piece of first-quality linen, and knots
of dainty and gallant wine-glasses are brought into a state
of sociable confusion, with a gathering of hard-headed
plebian stone-bottles. Although all tended the same way
and on the same errand, let no man be so rash and
intemperate
as to imagine that no distinctions were observed;
that certain lines and demarcations were not maintained;
and that broadcloth was not careful here, as usual, not to
have its fine nap destroyed by the jostling of homespun.
The knot of tough-fisted mechanics kept its course,
roaring out its rough sarcasms and grat gusts of invective,
while the company of well-dressed gentlemen bound for
the same harbor, glided more quietly along, their talk
scarcely disturbed by the extravagance of a rippling phrase
or an oath.
Here a substantial citizen advanced in great state and
dignity, alone, toward the place of gathering, unless his
horn-topped walking-stick might be held as suitable
company
for so grave and dignified a personage; and again a
thoughtful young gentleman might be discovered, striding
along with his hands thrust deep in his pockets, conning a
few common-places for a speech.
This various crowd has at length reached its destination,
and scampering up the stairs of a large mis-shapen
building
,
with no little heat and racket, finds itself landed in
a spacious saloon, facing a raised platform, protected in
front by a rough railing with some score of vacant chairs
occupying the floor of the same, and as many stout candles
ranged against the rail. Beneath the platform is a small
square table, holding a capacious inkstand, ornamented
with two or three huge grey goose-quills. Abreast of the
table are stretched a number of rude benches, to afford
accommodation for such infirm, ease-loving and sedentary
individuals, as may see fit to take possession of them;
and taken possession of they are at a very early stage of
the proceedings, first by a squad of precocious
ship-wrights'
'prentices, secondly by a broad-bottomed
dairyman
who was left at the Hall in the afternoon by one of
his own wagons from Bloomingdale, and thirdly by a
rout of scrambling fellows, from no place in particular,
who push and jostle and clamour their best for the
occupancy
.
The meeting is on the eve of being organized,
when in marches a well-fed uppish manthe very citizen
that was alone with his cane in the streetwho,
contemplating
the crowd with an air of austere regard, urges
himself towards one end of the platform, where he meets
a scraggy man, smartly dressed, and displaying from the
pillory of a sharp-edged clean shirt-collar, a very
knowing
countenance extended to the audience, and engages
in a whispered conversation, the concluding clause
whereof
embodies this sterling sentiment, (enforced by the
thrusting of a roll at the same time into the open hand of
the scraggy gentleman.) There's a current tenmake
me a vice, will ye? The scraggy man thereupon cocks
his eye significantly, and the stout citizen, slipping
away, gets into the outskirts of the crowd, where he
stares at the platform and the candlesthe political Heaven
of ambitions stout gentlemenas if they were the most
remarkable objects in creation, and as if he was perfectly
unconscious of the objects for which the meeting was then
and there convened.
In due time the meeting was called to order, and the
innocent
stout gentleman established himself, with five others,
upon the platform, as an assistant presiding officera
viceof the same. Silence was proclaimed and a
dwarfish
little man, with one of the oddest countenances in
the world was lifted upon a high stool by the mob, and
commenced reading a manuscript, which he dignified
with the name of the Report of the Anti-Aqueduct
Committee
,
appointed by the citizens of New-York, at a large
and respectable meeting held at Fogfire Hall, &c., &c.,
in which was furnished a certain amount of statistics
(taken from the 'Cyclopedia): a decoction of mouldy jokes
from the newspapers): and a modicum of energetic
slanga direct emanation from the inventive genius of
the reader of the Report.
This was a great, a tremendous questionsuggested the
Anti-Aqueduct manuscripta question, to come to the
point at once, involving the rights of mankind, the
interests
of universal humanity. If this principle was allowed
to pass unopposedthis pernicious principle of setting up
pure water, democratic Adam's ale, the true corporation
gin, for purchasewhere would we land? The
Committee
that drafted the Report could tell 'em!in tyranny,
despotism, bloodshed and debauchery. Individuals would
get drunk at the pump, as soon as the price was made an
object: there was a consideration for them! The people
had their rightshere the reader wagged his head
vehemently
,
and grinned like a demon just going out of his
slanghe could tell them, and the people could take care
of 'em.
A general dissemination of genuine gin cock-tails among
the hearers, could have scarcely produced greater
excitement
than did this most apposite and thrilling sentiment:
caps flew up, and hats flew off, as if the air were alive
with great black insects, and canes came down with a
general crash, like a cane-brake itself in a state of
tornado
.
It seemed as if they never would be done
applauding
this happy allusion; and the Committee-man stood
on the stool, swaying on one leg, and smiling, as if he
considered it the most agreeable spectacle he had ever
enjoyed. The Committee did not suppose that it was the
purpose of Providence to destroy mankind by a second
flood, but they were satisfied, morally satisfied, if such
an intention ever did come within the purview of the
divine displeasure, the object would undoubtedly be
accomplished
by the bursting of the Reservoir which it
was proposed to erect at the junction of the Third
Avenue
and Bowery:at least, the Committee thought it
proper to add, as far as the citizens of New-York were
concerned. And so the Report rambled on, like an echo
among the Dutch Hills, until it finally died away in a
thundering Resolution, and the little reader was
inadvertently
knocked off the stool by a charcoal-vender, who
was employed, besides grinning through the sable stains
of his trade in a ghastly manner, in swinging his hat in
approval of one of the concluding sentiments of his
Report
.
The charcoal-man was hustled, the little Committee-man
set upon his legs, and a vote of thanks unanimously passed
for the able Report just read.
A very long, dull-looking man, next offered a
resolution
,
and delivered a speech, as long and dull as himself;
which resolution and speech were seconded, by a round,
heavy man, in an harangue quite as rigmarole and
ponderose
;when
a pause occurred, during which the mob
seemed to be reflecting what they should do next. After
a proper degree of cogitation, they commenced shouting
for a favorite speaker, who always interested their feelings
by proposing a general division of property: which was
very liberal in him, as he had nothing to divide but the
payment of two-score old debts, and the expenses of a
small family; but he failed to make his appearance.
Upon which certain sagacious persons began peering
about in the crowd, as if they expected to find him
sandwiched
away snugly among the carmen, omnibus-drivers and
stevedores, there present. Certain other active persons were
despatched into the halls and purlieus of the building; a
self-formed committee of five rushed post-haste for the
bar-room; and one over-zealous individual was so far
carried
away by his enthusiasm, as to run a mile to the
orator's
dwelling, and there to demand his person with such
breathless incoherence, as to lead his small family to
suspect
that their dear protector and pay-master harbored the
intention of making way with himself.
A second popular favorite was called by the audience;
the same scrutiny instituted, and with the same result.
Affairs now looked exceedingly blank, the audience
began
to despair, and to entertain the horrible expectation
of having to go to bed speechless, when an unknown
individual
pushed convulsively through the crowd, struggled
up the steps, and placed himself at the foot of the
platform
;
and stretching out his right arm to its full extent,
began.
He was youngthe bloom of roseate health upon his
cheek would satisfy them of that. He was timid and
doubtful: witness his tremblings and shiverings on
presenting
himself for the first time before that highly
respectable
body of august citizens. He was rash and
foolhardy
,
he was aware, in coming before so intelligent an
audience, at that critical moment. But he was actuated
and impelled by a sense of duty, which would not allow
him to be silent while that great question called for an
advocate
.
They had heard the thunder of the cannon, in
the Report; the braying (a slight titter at this word) of
trumpets, in the speeches of the two learned gentlemen
that had preceded him: and now that the grand overture
of battle had been performed, he ventured to come upon
the field, and with his simple shepherd's pipe to sound the
humbler music of peace. He trusted that no violent, no
vindictive feeling, would be indulged toward their
opponents
.
Let their measure passlet the Aqueduct be
reared, and let its waters begin to flow:from these very
waters, pernicious as they seemed, should be drawn the
rainbow of promise for his friends; for the friends of cheap
government and good order! Taxation was not
democracy
:
debt was not democracy: public ruin and bankruptcy
were not democracy (gently warbled the shepherd's pipe):
and if this insane, wolfish and reckless party, wished to
destroy itself with its own fangswhy, in God's name,
bid them God-speed, and give them a clear field. He
would not suggest that the farmers in Westchester county
should oppose the passage of the Aqueduct through their
own lands; they were freemen, and knew what was what.
He would not stir up the Harlaem Bridge Company (
Heaven
forbid) to withstand this encroachment upon their
rights; they were a corporation, and could discriminate
carrot from horse-radish. He hoped, he fervently and
sincerely hoped and trusted, that the entire race of
water-rats
and ground-moles might be annihilated, before the
undertaking was commenced; so that it might not be
impeded
or undermined by their operations. At these
various
hopes and suggestions, as they were delivered, there
was an uproarious ha! ha! uttered by the assemblage, who
seemed to relish them hugely: and, with a hint or two to
the audience, not to allow themselves to be tampered with;
not to look on and see their heads taken from their
shoulders
,
and the bread from their children's mouths (all of
which was heartily seconded by the hearers); the young
oratorthe gentle friend of peacestepped from the
platform
.
At the conclusion of the speech, some one in the crowd
jumped up a foot or two, and shouted, Three cheers for
the last speech! and three cheers were given, with great
animation; and then, at the same suggestion, three more;
and three at the end of them. Different members of the
audience turned to each other and shook hands, and
exclaimed
,
Royal, That was fine, and other like
phrases of approbation: and then inquiries were set on foot
as to the name of the new speaker, to which no one could
furnish a satisfactory answer; and whether he was from
this ward or that ward, which was in a state of equal doubt
and uncertainty; and finally it was conjectured and
suggested
,
that he did n't belong to any ward at all, but had
come from the country: which they were for proving by
his rural simile of the rainbow, (rainbows not being
indigenous
in incorporated towns), and his intimate
acquaintance
with the feelings of the Westchester County farmers,
and ground-moles.
Whatever might be his name and origin, his foot had no
sooner touched the floor than he felt his sleeve twitched,
and turning, he discovered a singular-looking little
gentleman
,
beckoning him to follow.
CHAPTER II.
FIRST ACQUAINTANCE WITH HOBBLESHANK.
Disengaging himself from the crowd at Fogfire-Hall, the
young Politician followed his unknown conductor into the
open air. From the rapidity with which he moved, in
advance
,
although his gait was shuffling and uncertain, he
was not fairly overtaken until he had reached the mouth of
a neighboring Refectory, at which, pausing only for an
instant
glance at the young man's countenancewhich
seemed
to create a pleasurable feeling, and caused him to smile
strenuouslyhe plunged down the steps. The young
Politician
followed, and found himself in a close narrow room,
the air of which was musty with confiement, and, having
no opportunity from the pent place where it was imprisoned,
to ramble about among meadows and fresh streams to enliven
itself, depended on fumes of brandy and clouds of
cigarsmoke
,
for whatever life it exhibited. A tall man stood before
the fire, who would have inevitably perished of its noxious
qualities if he had not taken occasion, through the day, to
stand up the steps with his head and shoulders above ground,
contemplating the clay-covered wagons that came in fresh
from the country.
Judging from the starved, narrow-breasted skeletons of
turkies and fowls, the cold, sepulchral hams, the cadaverous,
shrunken legs of mutton, and the dwarfed tarts and
bread-rolls
,
that lay in miserable heaps on the table, they might
have easily concluded that the pie-house into which they
had descended was the dreary family vault, to which
melancholy
butchers, bakers and poulterers were in the habit of
consigning such of their professional progeny, as had ceased
to have life and merchantable qualities on earth. The room
was, of all possible dirty rooms, the dirtiest: with walls
smoked and tallow-stained; an unsanded floor; tables
spotted
all over, like the double-six of dominoes; and a fire, with
just enough animation to blush at the other appointments of
the place. The pie-house had its pretensions, too: for it
possessed not only a common-room for outside customers,
but a private parlor, snug and select, cut off from its vulgar
neighbor by elegant blue curtains, made to resemble patches
of dirty blue skymoving on a wire with jingling brass
rings, and entered by a half-raised step.
Upon this, which was little more than a large stall after
all, they entered. The mysterious little gentleman,
drawing
the curtains behind them, rushed up to the fire and
rubbed
his hands together over the blaze, opened the curtains,
thrust out his head, called for oysters and beer, and took
his station at one side of the table in the middle of the
floor. It's all right, said the stranger. Don't be
alarmed
.
My name is Hobbleshankwhat's yours?
Puffer Hopkins, replied the young Politician, surveying
more closely his whimsical companion.
He was an irregular-built little gentleman, about
fifty-five
years of age, with a pale face, twitched out of shape
somewhat by a paralytic affection: with one sound eye, and
one in a condition of semi-transparency, which gave to his
features something of a ghostly or goblin character; and
hedging in and heightening the effect of the whole, a pair of
bushy black whiskers, of a fine, vigorous growth. The
little
gentleman wore a faded blue frock, short pantaloons, low
shoes, an eye-glass, and a hat considerably dilapidated and
impaired by age.
The singularity and whim of the little old gentleman's
demeanor was shown, in his shambling up side-ways toward
Puffer whenever he addressed him, and looking up timidly,
first with the doubtful eye, as if sounding his way, and then
with the sound one; fortifying himself, from time to time,
from an immense snuff-box, which he carried awkwardly in
his left hand.
That was an excellent speech, young man! said the
strange little gentleman, dropping into a seat and
simultaneously
swallowing an oyster black with pepper.
I trust the sentiments were correct, modestly suggested
his companion.
Never better, sir: sound as a Newton pippin, to the
core, continued the strange little gentleman. But you
are young yet, sirquite youngand have a thing or two
to learn. Be good enough not to advance upon the stage
again, if you please, without your coat buttoned snug to
the chin, which shows that you mean to give them a
resolute
speecha devilish resolute speech, exclaimed the
little gentleman, glaring on the youth with his spectre eye,
full of storm and thunder, sir:or else with your breasts
thrown wide back, indicating that you are about to regale
them with an airy, well-ventilated and very candid
effusion
.
Appreciating the interest that the little old gentleman
expressed in his future success, his companion promised
to comply, as far as in him lay, with these new requisitions
in the art of addressing public bodies.
3
There was an awful omission, continued the strange
gentleman
,
a very awful and unpardonable omission, in your
harangue to-night. The little old gentleman's voice sounded
sepulchral, and his companion cast his eyes anxiously about
the select parlor.
For Heaven's sake, what was that, sir? asked the young
gentleman, regarding his censor with intense interest.
Why, sir, said the little old gentleman, relaxing into a
grim smile, where were your banners? You had'nt one in
your whole speech! An address to a political assembly in
New-York, and not a tatter of bunting in the whole of it
you must excuse me, but it's the weakest thing I've ever
known. An army might as well go into battle as an
orator into our popular meetings, without his flags and
standards. Where were your stars, too? There was'nt
even the twinkle of a comet's tail in the whole harangue:
they expect it. Stars are the pepper and salt of a political
discoursemind that if you please!
At this passage, the little old gentleman became
thoughtful
,
and fell upon his oysters and beer with horrible avidity;
which process caused him to grow more thoughtful than ever.
Many a good speech have I heard, he at length said,
contemplating
Puffer Hopkins with melancholy regard, whose
deliverer now lies under the tombstone. Others lie there,
too!I'd give my life, sir, he exclaimed earnestly, pressing his
hands closely together, my life with its resulting interest, if
I dared, for a minute's gaze at features that are lying in the
silence and darkness of dust. That's hard, sirtoo hard to
bear: a young wife borne away in her bloom by a cold, cruel
hearseblack, all over black! And then what followed
do you recollect what followed? I'm a foolyou know
nothing
of it; why should you? Life is a green field to you,
without as much as a grave or a furrow in it all.
I am not too sure of that, answered Puffer Hopkins, for
I have a dim remembrance of a death that touched me nearly,
long ago; whose death I cannot say, but a vision, away off
in past timesof a darkened housea solemn train issuing
forth, with one figure staggering into the funeral coach, drunk
with excess of griefthe heavy roll of wheelsand many
tears and lamentations in the small household.
While he delivered this, Hobbleshank looked earnestly in
his face, as if he discovered in what he said a meaning deeper
than the words. At this there was a long silence, which Puffer
Hopkins at length attempted to break, by stating to his
companion
the character in which he had appeared that night,
for the first time, at Fogfire Hall.
I know, said Hobbleshank, pushing his open palm toward
Puffer Hopkins, Do'nt say a word:I know all about it.
You're a young professional trader in politics and
patriotism
;
a beginnerjust opened to-night with your first speech,
and a fresh assortment of apostrophes and gesticulations. I
know you are new in the business, for when you spoke of
Heaven, and Eternal Justice, you looked at the audience!
Very green, my boy: an old spouter, in such a case, always
rolls his eye-balls back under their lids, and smells of the
chandelier, which is much better, although the odor is'nt
pleasant.
A mere 'prentice at the business I confess myself,
answered
Puffer.
I wish you would bear in mind, too, continued his
whimsical
adviser, when you address a mixed audience, and have
occasion to speak of the majesty of the people, that the
established
rule is, not to stare at any individual dirty face in
the middle of the crowd, but to look away off, beyond the
crowd entirely; as if you discovered what you're speaking
about in some remote suburb with which they have nothing
to do. Do you understand me?
I think I do, replied Puffer: But is'nt there generally
some placid gentleman or other, who comes to the meeting
early, and plants himself in front of the platform at a proper
distance, with the praiseworthy purpose of having the speaker
lay out all his strength in gazing at him, and moving his
bowels and understanding? I used to think soand have
tried it more than once: it feels very pleasant, I can assure
you.
What of that? It's your business to humble these gentry
they're aristocracy in disguise, and borrow their cartmen's
hats to come to public meetings in. No, no: cried
Hobbleshank
with emphasis, Do'nt you be caught in that trap.
Do you pick out the dirtiest waistcoat in the audience, with
the most cadaverous face in the room peering over itpitch
your eye upon the second button from the top, just where the
proof of a lack of under-garments becomes overwhelming
and fire away. Your target's a poor scampthe
beggarliest
in the house with an understanding like a granite
rock, (needing the whole force of an incorporated
company
of metaphysicians to quarry and dress it)and a select
circle of acquaintance, among wharfingers, small boatmen
and bean-eaters, near the market. That's your man. Dash
your hair back from your brow, swing your arms, and do'nt
spare flowers, knuckles, tropes and desk-lids.
By the time Hobbleshank had arrived at this division of
his subject, he had reachedworking himself along by
degrees
the
extremity of the stall, and was standing on his
toes, with his goggle eyes glaring over the partition at a
melancholy
personagethe very counterpart of his description
who sate on a stool by the fire, with his piece of hat drawn
over his eyes, with one leg on the ground, and the other
thrust under him on the seat.
That's one of them, whispered Hobbleshank, casting an
eye down at Puffer, and pointing with his finger over the
partition. No, it is'nt, after all, for there's the top of a
book sticking out of his pocket. Our kidney don't know
books.
Puffer Hopkins leaned out of the stall, and stretching
himself
forward, contemplated the object to which Hobbleshank
directed him; but instantly drew back, and seizing his
companion
by the skirts, pulled him, almost by main force, into
his seat.
Don't, for Heaven's sake! he said, as he bent forward
and placed his mouth at the ear of Hobbleshank, That's
my poor neighbor, Fob, the tailor.
These brief words were delivered in such a way as if
Puffer Hopkins expected their mere utterance would silence
his companion, and cause an entire revolution in the
feelings
with which he had regarded the sorry creature before
the pie-house fire.
A poor tailor! he echoed, well, is that all?
Yes: that's all! answered Hopkins.
Nothing more? asked Hobbleshank.
Nothing more, replied Puffer Hopkins.
These questions were asked and answered, in tones that
brought the conversation between them to a dead pause; at
which it staid for a good many minutes: when Puffer
Hopkins
,
rousing a little, asked If that was'nt enough?
At this moment the poor gentleman at the fire waked,
heaved a great sigh, and taking an imperfect copy of a book
from his pocket, and lifting his hat from his eyes, fell to
perusing
it with great earnestness; all of which interfered,
very seriously, with any further conversation on his
condition
and prospects in lifeso that after contemplating him
steadily for several minutes, they thought proper to retreat to
the previous subject of their discourse.
You should'nt have dropped from the platform so
suddenly
,
said Hobbleshank.
I was through my speech, answered Puffer Hopkins,
and wished to get out of sight at once.
Out of sight! exclaimed his companion, as if
unconscious
of Puffer's presence, What a fool the boy is. Why,
sir, if you intend to be a politiciana thriving one I mean
you must keep yourself in view, like St. Paul's steeple, that
frowns down on you, wherever you go through the city.
Out of sight, indeed! You should have made a bow to the
audiencewheeled aboutseized the first adjacent hand on
the stageshook it with the utmost violence, smiling in the
owner's face all the while, very pleasantlyand then planted
yourself on a chair fronting the audiencehooked your elbows
over the corner of the chair-topsmiling steadily on the
populace
,
and leaving off, only, every now and then, to nurse
your ruffle and pull down your wristbands.
I'll endeavor to practice this next time, said Puffer,
meekly.
Do, said Hobbleshank, And look to your costume, if
you please. What do you mean by wearing this brown coat,
and having your hair cut plain?
I don't know why I had my hair cut this way, answered
Puffer, but I wore the coat, because it was large in the
sleeves, and allowed a wide spread of the arms when I came
to the rainbow thus, and he expanded his arms after the
manner of an arch, as he had, indeed, endeavored to do in
the delivery of his speech, but was prevented, at the time,
from the embarrassment of having to employ his handkerchief
in clearing the sweet which oozed out in liquid drops on his
forehead. You recollect the simile?
Perfectly, answered Hobbleshank: And don't station
yourself next time, sir, on the lowest point of the platform
but stand forth in the centre, making wings of the six vices
on either side of you, and compelling the anxious presiding
officer directly behind you to stretch his neck around the
skirt of your coat, and to look up in your face with painful
eagerness to catch what you're saying, which always makes
the audience, who have great confidence in the head of the
meeting, very attentive. It's a grand stroke to make a
tableau
on any stage worthy of the biggest type on the
show-bills
and here you have one of the very finest imaginable.
But as to the orator's position, asked Puffer, Do you
think a public speaker is ever justifiable in standing on his
toes?
In extreme cases, he may be, answered Hobbleshank,
pondering, But it's best to rise gradually with your hearers:
and, if you can have a private understanding with one of the
waiters, to fix a chair conveniently, a wooden-bottomed
windsor
,
mind, and none of your rushersfor it's decidedly funny
and destroys the effect, to hear a gentleman declaiming about
a sinking-fund, or a penal code, or the abolition of
imprisonment
for debt, up to his belly in a broken chair-frame. As
the passion grows upon you, plant your right leg on one of
the rounds, then on the bottom, and finally, when you feel
yourself at red-heat, spring into the chair, waive your hat,
and call upon the audience to die for their country, their
families and their firesidesor any other convenient reason.
As Hobbleshank advanced in his discourse, he had
illustrated
its various topics by actual accompaniments: mounting
first on his legs, then the bench, and ended by leaping upon
the table, where he stood brandishing hisb roken hat, and
shouting vociferously for more oysters.
No reply to this uproarious summons appearing,
Hobbleshank
thrust his head between the curtains, discovered that
the tailor had vanished, and that the tall man was sitting
against the chimney-piece with his legs stretched upon a
stool, and sound asleep. He snatched up his hat, and
hurrying
toward the street, said he thought it was time to go.
As it had worn far into the heart of the night, Puffer
Hopkins could not gainsay the postulate, and followed on.
Hobbleshank keeping a little in advance, they rambled thus
through many streets; the little old gentleman sometimes
hurrying them forward at a gallop, and again subsiding into
a slow, careful stepas if he kept pace with the heavy
chimes that were sounding midnight from the town-clocks,
or perchance, with thoughts that beat at his heart with a
sharper stroke.
Be constant, child, said he, as he was preparing to leave his
companion, in your visits to popular associations and
gatherings
:
many a man is platformed and scaffolded by these
committees and juntos, into the high places of the nation.
He then told Hopkins where he could leave word for him, in
case he should at any time require advice or assistance;
said that, if he chose, he might be at Barrell's oyster-house
the next evening, and he would wait upon him to one of these
assemblages; and before Puffer Hopkins could answer one
way or the other, he had disappeared from his side, and
vanishing
into a bye-street, was soon lost in the darkness.
It cannot be matter of wonder that Puffer made his way
home with a head considerably bewildered and unsettled by
the occurrences of the night. The great popular gathering;
his own first speech; the thundering and tumultuous
applause
;
and, what fastened itself with peculiar force upon his
imagination, the voice and figure of the little old man,
uttering
pensive truths or shrewd observations, with the kindly
interest
he had expressed in himself from the first moment
all crowded upon him, and made him feel that he was in an
actual world, where, if he would but bestir himself, fortune
might prove his friend. The result of the whole was,
that he determined to prosecute his career: and in
furtherance
of that determination, he resolved to meet
Hobbleshank
again; the last image that his mind distinctly
recognized
,
ere it yielded to sleep, being that of the little
paralytic
,
passing and repassing, at times dissolved in tears, and
again, filling his chamber with the echoes of smothered
laughter!
CHAPTER III.
THE BOTTOM CLUB.
Punctual to his appointment with Hobbleshank, Puffer
Hopkins, at a few minutes of seven o'clock the next evening,
directed his steps towards Barrell's oyster-house, where in
due time he arrived, and made discovery of one of the most
singular little oyster-houses that could be found throughout
the whole of oyster-eating Christendom. Mr. Jarve Barrell,
it would seem, had, in the golden age of his career, been the
proprietor of a large Public House, occupying an entire
building and surrounded by his regiments of waiters and
wine-bottles, whose services were clamorously and steadily
demanded, by a mob of customers, from six in the evening
until one, morning; in fact the poor man's head had been
half-turned, by the pressure of a prosperous and growing
business. But, somehow or other, oysters, one unlucky
season
,
grew smaller, waiters more impudent for their pay, and
custom walked out of that street into the next on a visit to
a new landlord, who served his stews with silver spoons and
his oysters in scollop-shells; so that poor Jarve Barrell was
compelled, in spite of himself, to clip his wings and confine
himself to a humbler cage: in a word, he rented his second
floor to a boarding-house keeper, took in a barber at the
rear of the first floor, and continued business on his own
account in the front room of the same. A second decrease
in the size of shell-fish, the opening of a street that carried
travel in another direction, and Barrell was forced into that
last stronghold of the oyster-man, the cellar; and there it
was that Puffer Hopkins now found him, standing on one
leg of his own and one that came out of a fine piece of oak
woods at West Farms, a coarse white apron about his waist
and a salamander in his countenance, declaring stoutly to a
customer that although he had roughed it against the tide
all his life, he was determined to have his own way in dying.
Being questioned as to the way to which he alluded, he
proceeded to explain, that whenever he felt the approaches
of death he should hire a White-haller to pull him over to
Staten Island, cast anchor just above the richest bed in the
shore, and giving one good deep plunge, said Jarve Barrell,
I'll carry myself to the bottom, and stretching myself out on
a picked oyster-bed, make up my mind to die; so with the
tide rippling over my head, and a dozen or more pretty
mermaids
standing about me, I'll give up the ghost, and hold
myself
entitled to haunt the Bay and Island ever after, with a
spruce ruffle of sea-weeds in my bosom.
Puffer Hopkins was well pleased with the joyous spirit of
the decayed oyster-man, but had scarcely heard him through
when he detected a quick clatter upon the steps, and
turning
,
he discovered his singular companion of the previous
night hurrying down. In a moment he had Puffer by the
hand, and hailed his appearance with a sort of wondering
enthusiasm as if it gave him great joy to find him there and
to take him again in a friendly grasp. Hobbleshank
interchanged
a few words with Mr. Jarve Barrell as to the
influence
of certain recent enactments relating to oyster-beds
upon his own trade and custom, to which Mr. Jarve Barrell
gave very lucid and convincing replies, and they set out
forthwith for the Bottom Club. This they were not long in
finding, for Hobbleshank guiding Puffer rapidly through
sundry dark alleys and bye-ways, for which he seemed to
have a peculiar inclination, they reached a building in front
of which a dusky lamp was glimmering, ascended two flights
of stairs, and knocked at a low dingy door.
The door was opened from within, and Puffer advancing,
with Hobbleshank in front, found himself in a long narrow
room, with a plain pine table stretched through the centre,
a forlorn-looking eagle, with a bunch of arrowy skewers in
its talons and a striped flag about its head for a turban, two
or three carpenters' benches along the walls, and the whole
lighted by four sombre tallow twopennies at the farthest
extremity
.
Upon the table was planted a large earthen pitcher, with
an emblematic toper with his leg cocked up, in a state of
happy exaltation, displayed on the side thereof in white
wareand around the board were established a dozen
individuals
or more, constituting the chief force of the immortal
Bottom Club.
The gentlemen of the Bottom Club, as they presented
themselves at that moment to Puffer Hopkins, certainly
furnished
a remarkable spectacle; the most remarkable feature
of which was, that all the large members of the Club, by
some inscrutable fatality, were constrained and restricted
in small hats and irksome jackets, while all the small
members
,
by some equally potent dispensation, were allowed to
revel in an unlimited wilderness of box-coat, petersham and
tarpaulin. The delicate gentlemen wore great rough
neck-stocks
,
and commanded huge iron snuff-boxes on the table:
and the robust and muscular members assumed dainty black
ribbons and elegant turn-down collars, with more or less
ruffle crisping up under their broad heavy-bearded chins.
A thin, thoughtful gentleman, at one corner of the table,
was enveloped in an overgrown vest, hideous with great red
vines creeping all over it, and large enough to serve the
purpose
of a body coat: and confronting him, at an opposite
corner, sate a stout omnibus-driver, making himself as
comfortable
as he could in a waistcoat, so many sizes too small,
that it gaped apart like a pair of rebellious book-covers, and
drew his arms into a posture that resembled not a little that
of the wings of a great Muscovy gander prepared for the
spit.
4
We welcome you, said the pale thoughtful man, rising
and extending his right hand toward Puffer as he advanced,
while with his left he secured the sails of his great red vest,
We welcome you, Mr. Hopkins, to this association of
brethren
.
In us you see exemplified the progress of Social
Reform
:
we are wearing each others' coats and breeches in a
simultaneous confusion, and, laboring under a passional
excitement
,
we may yet ameliorate our condition so far as to
undertake to pay each others' debts. We are subjecting
ourselves to a great experiment for the benefit of mankind,
the interests of the total race. You see what hardships we
are undergoinghe did, for at the mere mention of the
thing, the whole Club wriggled in their ill-assorted garments
like so many clowns in the very crisis of a contortionto
test the principles of an ameliorated condition of things.
Yet, sir, we are happy, very happy to see you here to-night:
this spot on which you stand is consecrated to freedom of
opinion; to the festival of the soul. This is no Musical
Forest
,
no Hindoo Hunters' Hut, got up for effect at the
amphi-theatre
:
we haven't trees here alive with real birds! the
branches laden with living monkies! the fountains visited by
long-legged Flamingoes! the greensward covered with
Gazelles
,
grazing and sporting! Oh, no: we are a mere caucus
of plain citizens, in our every-day dresses, sitting in this
small room on rough benches to re-organize society, and give
the world a new axle: that's all.
Hereupon the thoughtful gentleman sate down; the Club
looked at each other and shook their heads, as much as to
say, This Chairman of ours, is, certainly, a born genius;
and Puffer and Hobbleshank were earnestly invited to the
upper end of the board, where they could possess the
immediate
society of the intellectual president, with the
convenient
solace of the beer-pitcher. As soon as they were
seated, and furnished with a draught from the earthen jug
to make them feel at home, (a man always feeling most at
home when his wits are abroad), the legitimate business of
the Club proceeded with great spirit.
The first subject that was brought before them was, a
general
consultation as to the part the Clubthe friends of
Social
Reform and a Re-organization of Societyshould play
in the approaching election of a Mayor for the City and
County of New-York: something striking and decisive
being
always expected from the redoubted Bottom Club. One
member hinted and proposed that there should be a general
destruction of the enemy's handbills; which was amended
so as to embrace a thrashing of the enemy's bill-stickers,
wherever found; which was still further enlarged, so as to
cover the special case of freighting a hostile bill-sticker's
cart with building-stone and breaking a bill-sticker's donkey's
back. The cutting of flag-ropes and sawing down of
liberty-poles
next came up, and passed promptlya stout man in a
small roundabout asseverating vehemently that the price of
fire-wood should be brought down, if he staid up till
midnight
three nights in the week to accomplish the benevolent
object. The Club then proceeded to preamble and resolve
that they considered the liberty of the citizens of this
metropolis
in imminent danger, and that they would protect the
same at the hazard of their lives: by which the Bottom Club
meant, that they would hold themselves prepared to breed
a riot at five minutes' notice, if found necessary to prevent a
surplus of voters on the opposite side from enjoying the
invaluable
franchise of depositing their ballots. Two sturdy
members belonging to the intellectual and highly refined
fraternity
of omnibus-drivers, next pledged themselves in the
most earnest manner, to conduct their respective vehicles, at
such time as might be most apposite, through the centre of
any well-dressed crowd that might be in the neighborhood
of the Poll, and also to indulge in such incidental flourishes
of the whip on their way, as would inevitably persuade the
gentry to stand back. As beer and brandy flowed through
the Clubwhich they did with a marvellous depth and
celerity
of currentthe tide of heady resolution deepened; and
they at length, in their extreme heat and fervor, determined
to throw off their coats to a man, and enjoy a regular
breakdown
dance about the table.
With wonderful alacrity they carried this judicious
resolution
into effect, by disrobing themselves of coats,
shad-bellies
and jackets, and casting them into a heap on a sailor's
chest established under the eagle's wing. They then, hand
in hand, Hobbleshank and Puffer Hopkins joining in,
commenced
capering in a circle, dashing down, first the right heel
and then the left, with astonishing energy, and as if they
were driving in the nails of the floor all over again;
meantime
roaring out the tag-ends of a partizan song, which
intimated
that, They were the boys so genteel and civil, That
cared not a straw for Nick nor the Devil: with other choice
sentiments metrically stated. While they were
immersed
in this elegant recreation, a single gentlemana member
of the Clubwho did not choose to partake thereof, sate
apart indulging in his own profound cogitations. He was
in many respects a peculiar personage, and seemed to enjoy
a copy-right way of his own; which copy-right might have
borne date as early as his birth and entrance into the world,
for Nature had given him a pale, chalky countenance, a
sort of blank betwixt youth and age, a pair of knavish grey
eyes, always turned upward, and a nose of the same class,
which appeared most honestly to sympathize with them: he
was of a small, shrunken figure, with a slight indication of
a hump at the shoulders, long, thin fingers, and legs of a
somewhat mis-shapen and imperfect character.
This singular little gentleman, as we said, sate apart
indulging
in his own thoughts; the purport of which appeared
presently to be, a determination to investigate and scrutinize
the pockets of the various coats, jackets and shad-bellies,
which had been laid aside by the dancers, for to this task
he now assiduously applied himself, and while his
companions
were enjoying themselves in their way, he enjoyed
himself
in his own way, by divesting them of such of their
contents
as suited his purposes, whatever they might be. In
this general scrutiny it would have been an impeachment of
his talents as an inquisitor to have charged him with
neglecting
the remotest corner or out-of-the-way borough of the
apparel either of Hobbleshank or Puffer Hopkins.
Having accomplished this undertaking to his own
satisfaction
,
he established himself at a side of the long table,
planted
a fur cap of great antiquity, after a drunken fashion, over
his brows, dropped his head upon his folded arms, and
devoted
himself with great apparent zeal and sincerity, to the
business of sleeping.
Meantime the gentlemen of the Bottom Club had wearied
of their sport, and oppressed by beer and hard work, they
dropped into their seats.
The pitcher went round, once, twice and thrice, and by
this time they had attained an elevation of conduct and
expression
that was truly sublime to behold. The
heavy-bearded
man swore and laughed, and dashed his fist upon
the table, with the uproar of half a dozen bakers at kneading
time. The two omnibus-drivers, for some unknown, and at
this remote period from the event, unconjecturable cause,
entered solemnly into a set-to, in which much muscle and
science were displayed, and which ended in a most
fraternal
embrace under the table.
A cadaverous thoughtful mannot the chairmanwho
was no talker but a wonderful deep thinker and
metaphysician
,
grew mysterious and communicative, and hinted that
he had that in the pocket of his swallow-tail which would
raise a devil of a ferment if the public but knew of it.
A fifth associate of the Club, who still retained an
insufficient
hat planted jauntily on his head, thought it would be a
capital ideaa very capital ideaa devilish first-rate idea
in the way of a social re-organizationto get together a
parcel of gilt steeple-balls, and hatch out a brood of young
churches by clapping a bishop upon them.
Another gentleman was inclined to think that the Bottom
Club had better mind its own business, by petitioning the
Common Council to have jugglers appointed Inspectors of
election, who could pass into the ballot-box two tickets for
one on their own side, and no tickets for ever so many on the
other.
A wide-mouthed member, the author of the ditty that had
been sung, and clerk and bell-ringer to a neighboring
market
,
became horribly sentimental, shed tears in his beer, and
kissed his hand to the eagle at the other end of the room.
As the entertainments were manifestly drawing to an end,
Hobbleshank glanced warily towards Puffer Hopkins, and
made for the door: but they were not let off so easily,for
simultaneous with the rising of Puffer Hopkins was that
of the entire Bottom Club; and a general friendly assault
was begun upon the person of that worthy young
gentleman
.
First, the gentlemen of the Club insisted on shaking hands
all round toward the right, and then all round toward the
left; one or two were resolved to embrace him, and did so;
and at last, after the pantomime, there was an unanimous
call for a speech from that gentleman, which summons was,
however, without a discovery of the substitution on the part
of the astute members of the Bottom Club, responded to by
Hobbleshank after his own peculiar fashion, with a very
happy allusion to the striped flag and the refreshments.
The unshorn man hoped Puffer Hopkins would come
again, and vowed he was his friend to command, from
the state of Maine to Cape May; and the metaphysical
deep thinker, struggling manfully with the beer he had
imbibed, promised next time to communicate something of
vital consequence to the welfare of this Union: with which
promises, protestations and God-speeds, Hobbleshank and
Hopkins departed.
CHAPTER IV.
MR. FYLER CLOSE AND HIS CUSTOMERS.
It
cannot be denied that Mr. Fyler Close had selected his
lodgings with commendable thrift and discretion. A single
small apartment over a bakery, and looking out upon a
public pump, supplied him at the lowest current rate with
the three primary necessaries of life; namely, warmth, from
the bi-daily inflammation of the oven for the benefit of
neighboring
familiesbiscuits, the legitimate spawn of the oven
and water, the cheap creature of corporate benevolence.
It could scarcely be expected that sundry fat spiders that
kept their webs in the different corners of his room would
be incorporated in any of the banquets of Mr. Fyler Close,
although by many people they might have been regarded as
a respectable addition thereto. With the exception of its
inhabitants, the single small apartment was almost wholly
voidthere being no covering upon the floor, no curtains at
the window, no paper upon the walls, and not the slightest
semblance of a fire, past, present or future, on the deserted
hearth-stone. To be sure, if you had opened a narrow door
on one side, you might have detected in a cramped closet a
pair of coverlids in which Mr. Close was in the habit of
sheathing his meagre limbs every night, as a nominal
protection
against chilblains and rheumatism: while the door
of the closet was carefully fastened and secured within, from
a fear which the occupant somehow or other encouraged,
that he should be roused some unlucky morning with a heavy
hand on his throat, a big grim face bending over him, and
his pockets all picked clean.
In the outer room stood a dilapidated candle-stand,
covered
with a tattered baize, with a battered inkstand and two
stumpy pens lying upon the same; three chairs with decayed
bottoms; and, in the corner of the hearth, a single long
gloomy poker, with its head up the chimney.
The advantages of these commodious quarters were, at
the present juncture, enjoyed by Mr. Fyler Close himself,
who being a short, hard-visaged gentleman, in a great blue
coat some three sizes too large for him, and a pair of
ambitious
trowsers that climbed his legs disdaining intercourse
with a pair of low cheap-cut shoes, became the
accommodations
admirably. There was another, a long, spare
personage
,
with a countenance so marked, and scarred, and
written all over with ugly lines and seams, as to resemble a
battered tomb-stone; and having old decayed teeth that
disclosed
themselves whenever he opened his mouth, the fancy
of uncouth dry bones sticking out at the corner of a grave was
still further kept up. There was something extremely
sinister
in the features of this individual, who sate in the nook
between
the closet and chimney-piece, and constantly glared
about him, in a restless manner, as if the air swarmed
wherever
he looked with unusual sounds, and as if he caught
sudden
sight of faces by no means pleasant to look upon.
I don't see that I could have managed my little monies
much better, said Mr. Fyler Close, unless I had locked them
up in an iron safe, and buried the key under the walls of the
house. There's only about four hoursand they're at dead
midnightwhen my debtors could slip away from me; and
then they'd have to do it devilish cautiously, Leycraft, not
to be heard. See, sir! I am in the very centre of all my
investments
,
and have a watch on them like an auctioneer at
the height of his sales. You see that yellow house? I make
the owner keep his shutters open, because I have a mortgage
on his pianowhich I wouldn't lose sight of for the world.
Quite an eye for music, I should think! interposed his
companion.
And a pretty good ear, too, continued Mr. Close, for
if I should fail to hear my little blacksmith's hammer in the
old forge, off this way, I should go distracted. It soothes
me very much to hear that anvil ringing from early light
down to broad dusk: and you can't tell what a comfort it is
to me when I'm sick!
Is he punctual in his interest? asked Mr. Leycraft, well
knowing that the Fine Arts must be associated in Mr. Fyler
Close's mind with some such disagreeable contingency.
Exemplary, sir:and when he falls sick and can't make
a racket himself, he always sends round word and employs a
couple of boys to keep it up, just to satisfy my mind. If the
forge stopped for two days, I should be under the necessity
of coming down on his shop with a sharp-clawed writ
which would be very painful.
Excruciating, I should think, said Mr. Leycraft, smiling
grimly; It would give you a sort of moral rheumatism,
I've no doubt!
You know it would! rejoined Fyler Close, returning the
smile. Then here's the bakerhe can't run away without
my smelling the fresh loaves as they go into the cart: and
the haberdasher over the way in front, couldn't escape me
unless she undertook to dress up all her male acquaintance
in ruffles and false bosoms, and let them out through the
alley
.
That might do, but I guess she isn't up to it: since she
lost her husband she's gone a little weak in the head, and
pays an extra cent on the dollar when she is borrowing from
Mr. Fyler Close.
These are small gains and slow ones, said Mr. Leycraft,
You might sit on spiders' eggs like these for a century,
and not hatch out a fortune. Let's have something bold and
dashingsomething where you put in no capital and double
it to boot in less than a week!
Something modelled on the Farm-house affair, eh? said
Fyler Close, leering on his companion significantly.
Will you let that subject alone, if you please, Mr. Fyler
Close! cried Mr. Leycraft, whose countenance darkened
and lowered on his companion as he spake. We have had
talks enough about that cursed house, and one too many. I
wish the title-deed was in the right owner's hands!
You dodo you? urged Mr. Close, pleasantly. Shall
I ask Mrs. Hetty Lettuce, the market-woman, when she
comes here next to pay the rent or renew her mortgage, if
she can't find him for us? Perhaps if we paid her well she
might relieve us of the property, and provide a very
gentlemanly
owner in our place. Shall we advertiseoffer
rewards
post
placards? I've no doubt if the purlieus of the
city were well-dragged, that an heir would turn up.
Stuff! Fyler Close, you know well enough that an heir
couldn't be brought alive off either one of the five
continents
that could make good his claim: and that makes you
chuckle so like a fiend. Mrs. Lettuce has lost trace of him
for more than twenty yearshas grown fat and lazy
borrows
money on bond and mortgage, and don't care a straw
about the subject:
Where's your grand project all this time? interposed
Fyler Close. Shall we have something new to practice
our wits on, or shall we rake among our dead schemes for
wherewithal to warm our brains with?
Now that you are on that, said Mr. Leycraft, rapidly
surveying the nooks and privacies of the apartment, and
bestowing a broad glare on the door and windows, I say
freely and without the lest reserve, that my head's a nine-pin
if I don't lay a plan before you will make you thrill down
to your pocket-ends with rapture: it's a neat schemevery
neat,but at the same time mighty magnificent.
Saying this, Leycraft drew close up to the side of the
broker, laid their heads close together, and bending over the
stand, he moved his finger slowly in a sort of hieroglyphic
over it, and tapping his forehead complacently, was about to
detail his notable plan, when a knock was heard at the door,
which cut short any further communication for the present.
The knock was repeated a little louder; Fyler Close
motioned
to his companion, who vanished expeditiously down
a pair of back-stairs into the yard, looking anxiously back
all the time as if under pursuit, and so through the
baker's
;
and Close, snatching from his pocket a well-worn
Hymn-book, began reciting a most excellent passage of
psalmody, in a deep and nasal intonation.
The knock was repeated three or four times before an
invitation
was given to enter; and although the broker
glanced
over the top of his book as the door opened and
discovered
his visitor, he assumed not to be conscious of the
presence of any person whatever, but proceeded steadily,
in fact with rather increased energy, in his capital
divertisement
.
Please, sir, said the visitor, a stout-built lady,
curtsying
and advancing timidly a step or two, Please sir,what's
to be done about the little mor'gage on my grounds, sir?
This question Fyler Close seemed at first altogether
unable
to apprehend, but when it was repeated, accompanied
by a slight jingle of silver in the visitor's pocket, he started,
deposited his book open upon the standas if he wished to
resume it at the very earliest conveniencelooked about
him, and pensively remarked, twitching his whiskers, of
which there was a dry tuft on either cheek, violently,
Poor old man!There's no comfort left for you now,
but psalm-singing and class-meetings every other evening in
the week. These are old chairs, madam!
5
They certainly are; Mr. Close; very old. There's no
denying facts, answered the huckster.
This is a dreadful dreary room for an old man to live in!
again groaned the broker.
Sartain! responded the unwary market-woman, I think
in that point, to do you justice, it's but next better than a
family vault, saving the death's heads and the smell.
And now you ask me, a poor lonesome man, living like
Death himself, as you admit, and that can afford to keep no
better company than three poor crazy chairs, to renew your
mortgage at seven per cent!why, a cannibal, with good
cannibal feelings, wouldn't ask it!
Mr. Close, on delivery of this speech, fell silent, and
dropped
into a profound meditation, during which he from time
to time looked up and eyed the stout person of the huckster
as if he thought it would furnish a most delicate morsel for a
Carribee. But his own method of devouring a victim differed
essentially from that adopted by the benighted heathen, and
he now proceeded to demonstrate his dexterity in his own
particular line of manipulation.
Well, you shall have it! he cried, awaking as from an
anxious reverie: I have considered ityour business shall
be done, Mrs. Lettuce.
Thank you, sir, thank you, sir! I am very much
obliged
,
exclaimed the market-woman, bowing and curtsying
with great show of gratitude, but misapprehending slightly
the meaning of Mr. Fyler Close, and promising the accruing
interest in hard dollars, punctually on quarter-day.
But I must have my summer supply of radishes! said
lose.
Oh, for the trifle of that, Master Closewe'll not differ.
I can send you down a bunch or two by the girls, every now
and then.
Every now and then will not do, madam:I must have
them regularly, for I can't live without putting a few for sale,
in the season of them, at the baker's window, below stairs.
Well, I don't mind a handful of greens in the way of
binding a bargain; so the cart shall stop every morning, if
you please, and leave you a dozen bunches.
Very good, very good, exclaimed the broker, rubbing
his hands together, you are a woman of sense;and now,
I must have my asparagus, that's a dainty herbI love
asparagus
dearlyand it sells well when it's early. Mind, I
must have early tops, or none at all! Pick me the tops that
grow near the house, close up by the foundations, will you?
Early tops, and such as he desired, were accordingly
promised, perforce: Mrs. Hetty Lettuce diving convulsively
into her pockets to make sure of such small change as she
had about her, as every thing appeared to be slipping away
from her ownership with extraordinary velocity and
despatch
.
I'll not ask you, continued the discriminating Mr. Close,
to supply me with butter nor with eggs, although something
nice might be done with them through my neighbor below
but eggs are quite apt to addle on hand, and butter must
be kept in ice, which costs two-pence a pound, and melts
without leaving as much as a thank-ye in your pocket.
Your sentiments are very excellent, sir, on that subject,
said Mrs. Lettuce, brightening up.
Yes, they are very excellent; but you'll think them far
nicer on the subject of good worsted stockings made with
your own dainty hands, three pair for winter useI should
have three pair at leastand as many more for fall: you
know we must guard against frosts and chilblains a little;
made with low tops, with red clocks to show they are your
fabric,one of the sweetest knitters in the market.
With this he fell back quietly in his chair, and reminding
Mrs. Lettuce that he should expect his first pair of fall socks
Wednesday week, he wished her good day; which wish
Mrs. Lettuce was by no means idle in accepting, for her
departure
was in fact accomplished with such expedition as to
amount almost to a precipitate flight. At this we cannot be
greatly astonished, when we consider the chance of a
requisition
being made upon her to furnish the entire outfit and
wardrobe of the broker, by way of lightening his doleful
condition
and eking out the percentage of his mortgage.
As soon as Mrs. Lettuce had departed, the broker
ascended
a chair, and after careful inspection of an old chest in
his closet, and making discovery of a single pair of
fragmentary
hose and an old stocking, he said, laughing to
himself
.
This merchandize of the old market-woman's must
go into the hands of Ishmael; that's clear. Nights are
growing sharper; a little, a very little wood, must be laid
in; and where fires are kept, socks should be
discountenanced
.
He had just stepped down from this inquisition,
when a sharp rap echoed through the hall, and without
waiting
for a summons to enter, the strange old body, Puffer
Hopkins' friend, marched abruptly into the apartment, with
a very peremptory and threatening aspect.
I have come again! said the old gentleman, sternly.
I see you have, replied Mr. Fyler Close, smiling on him
with all the suavity and mellowness of an August day.
Do you see that I am here? continued Hobbleshank.
Most assuredlyunless you are an apparition; and then
you are here and not here, at the same time, answered the
broker.
If I were a goblin, sircome in here with a thong of
leather to strip you to your skin and stripe you all over with
blowswould I be out of place, do you think?
Perhaps not much: a little, we'll say a little, answered
Mr. Close, still smiling gently on his visiter, Just to balance
the sentence.
And then if I carried your bruised old carcase,
continued
Hobbleshank, and plunged it in a gulf of boilingfire,
and held it there by the throat for a century, or sowould
it be pleasant and satisfactory?
Extremely so, answered the broker; Nothing could
be desired more charming: unless it might be a bond on
compound interest, with the interest payable at twelve
o'clock, daily.
That would be finer, you think?
Much finerbecause that would leave one the use of his
legs to get out of troubles with.
Now, sir, said Hobbleshank, who always made it a point
to subject the broker to a searching and playful
cross-examination
the
answers to which, as has been seen, on the part
of the broker, were always extremely candid and confiding,
Now, sir, I want to know of you, whether you think a
gentleman
who has stood by and seen a man's wife die by inches
in the veriest need of common foodhas seen the man go
madyes, mad, sirwith grief, and rush from his house in
utter despair and miserydo you think this gentleman, who,
when he has put the child and heir of these poor wretches
out of the wayGod knows howtakes the roof that should
have sheltered his boy's headdo you think he deserves the
use of his legs? or his cursed griping hands? or his great
devilish eyes?
Not at allby no means, my dear sir, answered Fyler
Close, blandly. It would be waste and extravagance to
allow such a monster any thing, but his neck: you know
he might hang by that!
Suppose you had'nt conveniences to hang him with
no tackleno scaffoldno murderer's cap, continued
Hobble
shank, and could'nt persuade the gentleman to lend his
neck to a noosewhat then?
What then?I confess I should be at a stand:
The case stands thus, if I apprehend you, my dear sir,
answered Mr. Close, with the same astonishing equanimity.
Here's a great villain to be punished; the law can't reach
him, he won't consent to be strung up without law, and
declines
is
it so?positively declines to come into any friendly
arrangement to be burned or bastinadoed: what's to be
done? Upon my honor, my good sir, I must allow the
knave has the better of you. I am sorry for it: extremely
sorry, but the ways of Providence are just, very just, and I
guess you'll have to wait for them.
As Mr. Close uttered these words he assumed a benign
and tranquil expression of countenance, and looked serenely
forward into empty space, as if it was a hardship, a very
great hardship, that such a case should exist, but that it was
his duty, as an exemplary citizen, to resign himself to it
without a murmur. In this seeming quietude of feeling
Hobbleshank scarcely shared.
What's to be done? he shouted, darting forward
toward
the broker. His ugly flesh is to be torn with sharp
nails, like pincers; his head's to be broken, where these
maggots
hatchwretch!
But ere he could fasten upon the broker, and exemplify
his notions of punishment, that gentleman, who had been
warily watching his visiter all through the interview,
dropped
from his chair, glided athwart the candle-stand, and
throwing himself into the adjoining closet, secured it from
within.
Having rehearsed this performance many times before, in
previous interviews with his visiter, Mr. Fyler Close achieved
it at present with marvellous dispatch. For a few minutes,
Hobbleshank made furious assaults upon the broker's
fortress
,
with his feet and clenched fists, which he dashed
violently
against the panels; all of which proceedings were
echoed from within by a hard, iron laugh, that almost set
Hobbleshank beside himself. From time to time the laughter
continued, and the rage of the old man increased, until at
length, in his extremity of passion, he snatched up the single
piece of furniturethe prime ornament of the apartment
dashed it in fragments upon the hearth, kicked open the
outer door, and rushed almost headlong into the street.
Mr. Fyler Close had no sooner heard his retreating steps
than he quietly unearthed himself, and stepping along the
hall of the building, hoisted a window in front, and putting
forth his head, watched with considerable interest the form
of Hobbleshank as it was whirled along by the rage and
desperation of its owner, without much regard to children,
fish-mongerswith which the street swarmed
wheelbarrows
,
or ladies in full dress. He then tranquilly gathered
the remains of his writing-table, tied them in a bundle with
a string, and placing them tenderly in the corner,
produced
from an upper shelf of his closet stronghold a single
sea-biscuit, and proceeded to his evening meal.
CHAPTER V.
THE AUCTION ROOM.
Anxious
to become familiar with the people in their
assemblies and public gatheringsto learn how crowds
are excited and assuaged, and made to do the bidding
of cunning men: how that which would be folly and sheer
madness with one, may, practised upon many in a confused
mass, take the hue of profoundest wisdom and justice: and
having at heart withal the suggestions of his strange old
friend of Fogfire Hall, Puffer Hopkins now made it a point
to haunt meetings and congregations of every sort,
anniversaries
,
wharf crowds and lectures, and to detect how the
Leviathan
populace is snared in a fair net of silvery words
and pleasant speeches.
At the lower extremity of the great thoroughfare of
Chatham Street, just below the theatre, lies an oblong
deep shop, into which is drawn, between the hours of seven
and nine, evening, a portion of the metropolitan life, where
it is kept raging and fumingpent up in a close massand
struggling with the black-haired demon of the place. The
genius of the oblong warehouse is none other than a gloomy
looking auctioneer, who hangs over a counter fixed on a
raised platform, calling on the individuals before himwho
are chiefly clerks, news-boys, journeymen and innocent
gentlemen
from the countryto sustain him in his disinterested
desire to advocate the elegance of binders, the instructive
and entertaining qualities of authors, and the gorgeous
genius of colorists, engravers and paper-rulers.
This gentleman is ably sustained and seconded, in the
performance of these arduous duties, by a sable-haired
associate
,
who makes it his business to stroll cheerfully up and
down the enclosed space behind the counter, rubbing his
hands from time to time, as in token of internal satisfaction
at the success of their joint efforts, and dashing down upon
the counter such wares as a sagacious glance at his audience
satisfies him are most likely to be competed for.
On some occasions, one or other of the black-haired
gentlemen
behind the counter condescends to be facetious, and
says remarkably funny things for the special benefit and
solace of the citizens underneath: this department properly
belongs to the auctioneer, but is incidentally filled by the
feeder, with such chance morsels of humor as may suggest
themselves to him as he rambles to and fro.
Into this oblong region of sale, as one of the resorts
where his plans might be furthered, Puffer one evening
made his way.
Gentlemen, cried the black-haired auctioneer with
increased
animation as Puffer Hopkins entered; discovering
perhaps in the peculiar costume and manner of that
excellent
young gentleman some indications of a melo-dramatic
tendency: Gentlemen, here's the primest article I've
offered
to-night: this is `Brimstone Castle,' a native melo-drama,
as performed one hundred nights at the Bowery Theatre,
Bowery, New York. The hero of this piece, gentlemen,
is a regular salamander, and could take out a policy in any
company in this city at a low hazard: he 's fire-proof. In
the first act, he appears sitting on a log, meditating; is
suddenly
surprised and taken by a band of savages of a
redochre
complexion, from whom he escapes by ruthlessly
cutsting
off the right leg of every mother's son of themrushes
over a bridgerescues a lady with dishevelled hair and a
small boy in her hand, climbs up a cataract, waives his
cap to the rescued lady, loses his appetite, and is finally
re-taken by the savages, and burnt at the stake for an
hourwhen he walks out of the flame, advances to the
foot-lights
,
and, with a very cheerful smile on his countenance,
announces `Brimstone Castle' for the next twelve nights,
with an extra savage and fresh faggots every night. How
much gentlemen? Going, going. How much? It 's a
master-piece, gentlemena perfect work of art. How
much?
The melo-drama was bandied about for more than a
quarter of an hour among sundry young gentlemen in
round-crowned
hats, with sleek shining heads of black hair and
broad-skirted blue coats, but finally fell to the lot of a
bidder with a stout voice, just one of those voices that are
irresistible in an auction-room, and a terror to gentlemen
that desire cheap purchases.
I now offer you, cried the auctioneer, one of the
most astonishing and wonderful works of the present day.
It's full of thought, gentlemen, expressed in the very
happiest
words
out
of Todd's Johnson and Noah Webster, as
clear as a moonbeam, gentlemen, and profound as the
Atlantic. It treats of various subjects, such ashere the
auctioneer turned the pages of the book in his hand rapidly,
after the manner of a quarterly Reviewer, with the hope of
gleaning a comprehensive knowledge of its contents, but,
judging by the face of ineffable despair he assumed after
thrusting his nose half a dozen times between the leaves,
with little success. Excuse me, he continued, smiling
sardonically on his audience; It would be presumptuous
in me, a plain, unlearned citizen, to undertake to convey to
your minds the substance of a volume like this.
Gentlemen
,
I'll read you a passage from the `Introduction,' which
explains itself. `Ponds have presented turtles in two
aspects
;
either as turtles or as not turtles. In the one, turtle,
the living, breathing, air-cased creature, the individual in his
pneumatic being, sitting on a rock pond-centred, is mighty,
supernal, vastly infinitemore than frogdom at bottom,
blind eel or muscle life: not he theirs, or for them, but they
nothing save for him. Outward worldto them,
mud-encompassed
otherwise
dead, as door-nail: in the other, slidden
from pond-centred rock down to the depths of the
unsearchable
(pond?) frogdom, blind eel and muscle lifeeach more
than turtle; he theirsbeing thick-headed, obfuscated by
lack of light and doltishand for them, he little or nothing
save a black lump, part of the general pond-bottom,
pavement
,
chips, wind, gas, snake-grass and bulrushes.'
It need scarcely be added that the lucid work on which
the auctioneer was engaged, was nothing more nor less than
a volume of Transcendental lectures. Puffer Hopkins
detected
the same burly voice bidding for thisand
triumphing
in its bidthat he had heard twice before.
At this juncture a member of the great fraternity of
laybishops
in
other words, a very worthy cartman in his
short frockcame in, and supposing, from the few words
that he caught as he entered, that the work in hand was
illustrative of some new and improved method of bobbing
for eels, was rash enough to invest seven shillings in the
purchase of a second copy. Paying his money very
awkwardly
at the counterout of a blind-pocket in his
cart-frock
he
carried his purchase to a lamp in another quarter
of the auction-room, and proceeded very slowy and
painfully
to enlighten himself on the favorite pursuit of
eel-bobbing
.
He bobbed, however, in that pond to very little
purposeand becoming confused and horribly enraged at
the constant recurrence of the phrases a oneness, an
obscure and unreachable infinite, divergence towards
central orbits, and revolutionary inwardnesses,
intemperately
sold it (for six cents and a fraction) to a
match-boy
,
who stood by with a basket ready to catch such
purchases
as might prove unavailable or disrelishing to the
buyers. There's an acre of fog-bank there, boy, said the
cartman from between his teeth, take it away. My horse
has a better head for writings, and authorships, and what not,
than the stupid journeyman fellow that spoked this wheel
together. Just away with it.
If there's a patriot in the room, continued the salesman,
a single young or middle-aged gentleman that loves his
country and the story of her achievementslet him come
forward and lay down his one dollar fifty. I offer you,
gentlemen, the `Battle of Bloody Puddle,' a narrative
poem, in six books. This master-piece of genius has nine
heroeseach one of whom accomplishes more in the way
of slaughter, swordsmanship and small-talk, from various
elevations, peaks, cliffs and hill-tops, than any nine heroes
ever let loose on the world before. The stanza is
irregular
,
to correspond with the thought, which is very wild and
super-human. The chief herothe A. No. 1,pattern
warrior, is discovered by moonlight sharpening his sword
on a boulder of granite, in two nimble-foot octosylabic stanzas
6
he loses his scabbard and temper in four Spenserian
entering a cave to conceal himself from the bloody British
foewho are tracking him about like dogs, in twenty-five
hexametersbut recovers both in an eleven-syllabled song;
in which he grows very happy about wine, war and woman
particularly Isobel the fairuntil, all at once, he
discovers
a cloud on the moon; which reminds him to prepare for
a few elegiac verses and death. He ultimately hangs
himself
in a hemlock sapling, and leaves his pocket-bookwith
a counterfeit bill and some forged letters in itto his Isobel;
bidding her, in a brief touching epistolary farewell, never to
part with these relics of his affectionnever, never! which
it is'nt very likely she ever will: particularly the
counterfeits
.
The rest of the poem corresponds; how much, how
much? Cheapgoing cheapas politicians' consciences, a
penny a dozen. It's yours, sir, at twenty-five cents. It's
perfectly ruinous to sell this work at that price, sighed the
auctioneer, wheeling round and stoically receiving from his
assistant a bundle of two dozen more of the same.
There was something in the voice of the bidder who had
borne off the chief purchases of the evening, that excited
the curiosity of Puffer Hopkins; he thought he had heard
it before, and, to ascertain the owner, now mounted a bench,
and peered over the heads of the audience towards the
quarter
whence it had issued.
In a remote angle of the auction room, apart from the
crowd, in a little domain of his own, stood a square,
broad-breasted
gentleman, with his arms folded and gazing at the
auctioneer with a fixed and intense look, that could not have
been readily surpassed by a Spanish inquisitor, or a petty
justice reproving a constable. The fury of his demeanor
was heightened by the close buttoning of his coat, to the very
throat, the inflation of his coat skirts with a thick bundle of
newspapers and a large bandanna handkerchief, the
strapping
of his pantaloons firmly down upon the boot, and still
further, by his being a gentleman of moderate stature, in
whom, it is well known, fierceness is natural and quite
becoming
.
It was this gentleman that bid for the melo-drama,
the poem of Bloody Puddle, and the volume of
Transcendental
Lectures; and now that he had attained a full view of
his person, Puffer felt quite sure that he knew him.
Pushing
through the mass of bidders, he reached the little Zahara
which this gentleman's frowns and dignity had created for
himself.
Mr. FishblattI think, said Puffer, respectfully
contemplating
the figure before him.
The same, sir, responded the broad-breasted gentleman,
starting back a pace or two, dropping his brows, and
regarding
the questioner steadily for a minute or more. You are
one of our speakers I believe, continued Mr. Fishblatt, still
maintaining his survey, one of the oratorical youth of
Fogfire
Hallam I right?
You are, answered Puffer Hopkins: I had the honor
of speaking before you at the last general meeting; you
were a Vice-President.
What! cried Mr. Fishblatt, in an earnest whisper,
you are not the young gentleman that used the simile of
the rainbow? On my soul you are; don't blush, my dear
sir, and turn every color in a minute, for that convicts you
at once. I'm glad to see you: it 's quite a treat. Take my
hand, Mr. Hopkins.
Hereupon Mr. Fishblatt took possession of Puffer
Hopkins'
right hand, shook it strenuously, and then turning to
the auctioneer on service, said:
That man 's worthy to be a Quarterly Reviewer. He
's a Jeffrey, a Babbington Macaulay, sir; an Edward
Everett
,
with the devil in him. He tells books by the smell of
the leather. And see how daintily he holds an annual up, as
a fishmonger does a bass by the tail, so as to send the
circulation
to the head, and give the eyes a life-like look. Don't
he play on the leaves and illustrations like a musical genius?
See, my good sir, how he displays that volume with colored
plates; it 's like a glimpse into the fall woods. This is the
shop for sound criticism; writers that are disdainfully treated
in the weeklies and monthlies, need'nt be afraid to come
here; if they're hacked and hewed so that their best friend
could'nt know them, all they need do is to huddle themselves
into a coarse blue-cloth apparel, and throw themselves
before
that black-haired gentleman; and they'll have a blast
sounded in their behalf that will bring every two and six
pence in the place rattling on the counter.
While the broad-breasted gentleman was engaged
elaborating
this artful encomium on his friend, the auctioneer had
produced a huge bundle of controversial tracts and almanacs,
black with wood-cuts, and dashed them upon the counter
with great spirit; at which Mr. Fishblatt started, again
grasped Hopkins by the hand, gave him the street and
number
of his residence, and urged him to call speedily.
You can't mistake the house; it 's a red front, with tall
chimney-potsgrenadier pots we call themand a slab of
brass on the door, with `Halsey Fishblatt' in large text.
Any of the hackmen on the Square can direct you, for they
can all read my plate as they stand, nearly two rods off.
Come soon!
Pouring out his passages of description and invitation
vehemently
,
Mr. Fishblatt gave Puffer a strenuous good-night
advanced and threw his card upon the counter, and
thrusting
his right hand into the breast of his coat, marched out
of the auction room with great vigor and self-possession.
Now that the chief bidder, who had held the room in
awe by his peremptory and majestic manner of calling the
price, had departed, the minor customers immediately
swelled into consequence, and a horrible conflict was
forthwith
engendered betwixt the match-boywhose imagination
always kindled at the slighest suggestion of a goblin; a small
retail clerk, who had sympathies with coffins and family
vaults, as he slept every night in an unwholesome and
grave-like
cabin at the rear of the dry-goods shop; and a
broken-down
gentlemana speculator in cemeterieswho was on
the look out for information on sepulchral subjects.
Here's a rare morsel for you, my lads, said the
auctioneer
,
whose style grew more familiar on the departure of the
majestic Fishblatt: a dainty mouthfull, I can tell you.
`
The Vision of the Coffin-maker's 'Prentice
a story in
manuscript
never
published.' It 's a copyright, boys: as good
as new in first hands. It 's said the author starved to death,
because the publishers would'nt buy his book; they could
import
goblins and bugbears cheaper than they could be grown
on the spot. The biggest bugbears always come from
abroad, said the feeder, pausing a moment from his
rambles
facing
the audience, and laying both hands on the
counter. Come, bid upwill ye? Don't go to sleep, if
you please, in that corner. Others say the author choked
himself with a chicken-bonenobody believes that. Poets
and poultry have never been on good terms, that I could
learn. Will the band be good enough to strike up!
Sixpencethere 's a dodge, cried the match-boy.
I'll go nine, said the retail clerk. That's a more
superlative
go, I know.
Nine and one, cried the match-boy, reddening in the
face, and glancing spitefully at the retail bidder.
No penny bids in this shop, interposed the auctioneer,
authoritatively. Try again, gentlemanyours, twelve and
a halftwelve and a half!
This last was the bid of the cemetery speculator.
Twelve and a half. Fifteen, fifteen, fifteenone and
nine. The bids ran on; the auctioneer chanced to turn
the volume toward Puffer Hopkins, who discovered at the
side of one of the pages, a pen-and-ink drawing of a stout
gentleman, standing in a coffin, with his right arm
outstretched
as if on the point of beginning a speech. Not
knowing but that this might be some new exercise in oratory,
and seeing at once the facilities for the pathetic afforded by
a snug-built coffin, Puffer entered the field, and overtopping
all competition by a half-dollar bid, paid the purchase money
in silverwhich it employed him some ten minutes to hunt
into a corner of his pocket and secureand bore it away.
In less than a quarter of an hour, he was at his own room
in the Fork; had called in his poor neighbor, the tailor, and
by the light of a dim candle, (snuffers not being within the
appointments of his establishment), entered upon the perusal
of his new-bought story.
The manuscript was bound in a black linen cover, worn
threadbare and ragged by much handling; was ornamented
with rude drawings of cross-bones and tombstones, with
quaint inscriptions on the margin; and the leaves were
spotted in various places, and the ink faded, as if many
burning tears had fallen on the page.
CHAPTER VI.
THE VISION OF THE COFFIN-MAKER'S 'PRENTICE.
What was more natural than that the thoughts of Sam
Totton, the coffin-maker's 'prentice, should be running on
death's heads and grinning skulls, and damp, dark vaults,
deep down in the earth; with now and then a cheerful
feeling
of the pleasantness of country church-yards, with
tomb-stones
interspersed among sweet-scented apple-trees, and
rich green palls of bright meadow-grass spreading over the
grave. Now and then, too, he might think of ghosts releasing
themselves from the grave, and taking a night's ramble, and
whistling down tall chimnies in cities, or glaring in, with
great cold eyes, at farm-house windows, and frightening the
quiet circle at the fireside with a dread token of death near
at hand, or some heavy evil about to burst on the unlucky
house. By the hour would the young 'prentice sit in tke
undertaker's shop, meditating on the sorry chances of life;
the wonderful demand for coffins in the summer months,
and the strange world into which many merry stout
gentlemen
,
and joyous ladies, would ere long be transported,
screwed close down in the cruel coffins that stood in a grim
row before him.
Some he knew would stretch themselves quietly at length,
and fall asleep; others would fight and wrestle, like very
demons, ere they could be brought to bear to be shut down
and cabined in forever; and others again, in whom life was
furious, and not to be readily extinguished, would smite and
dash their deadly hands against the coffin-lid, and would cry
out, in voices stifled in the damp thick clay, to be freed.
With this turn of mind, the 'prentice was sitting one night
in the shop, on an undertaker's stool, and watching the
various
shadows that came through the door, as the August
sun settled in the sky. Now the shadow would flit in at
one coffin, filling it only breast-high; then shifting itself, it
would take entire possession of a child's, that stood next;
and so flitting past, from one to the other, it brought into
Sam's mind the thought how these coffins would one day
be tenanted, and what manner of people it might be that
should be laid in the coffins that stood about himlarge
and smalland how soon they would all be filled and borne
silently away.
The thought had scarcely formed itself in Sam's mind,
when the shop-bell was rung very gentlya glass door that
was between him and the street was opened, and a figure,
more wo-begone, wretched and disconsolate than he had
ever before beheld, presented himself, and paused for a
moment
,
just long enough for the 'prentice to take note of his
appearance. His eyes were wild, and sunken far behind
pale, ghastly, hollow cheeks, in which there was no drop of
blood; his head was without covering of any sort, except a
shock of uncombed, matted hair, and he limped sadly
forward
on disproportioned, infirm legs, in scanty apparel, and
with an apologetic appeal in his looks to the young
'prentice
,
shambled away into a remote corner of the shop, and
planted himself as nearly upright and with as great show
of decorum as he could, in a cheap pine coffin that stood by
itself.
Sam felt strongly inclined to enter into conversation
with the Poor Figure, and to learn by what chances it had
been brought into that lean and melancholy beggary. Ere
he could do this, the door was pushed forcibly open, and a
portly personage entered, and stalking across the shop with
great dignity and majesty of bearing, proceeded to an
inspection
of the coffins; going close up to them, examining
nicely the grain of the woodyea, even smelling of it, and
turning away with an air of vast disdain whenever it proved
to be cedar or baywoodthe quality of the muslin and the
action of the hinges. After turning up a majestic nose,
discolored
slightly by the use of wine or table-beer, at
two-thirds
of the undertaker's assortment, the portly gentleman
at length pitched upon a magnificent tabernacle of
mahogany
,
with fine rolling hinges, that could'nt jar on his delicate
ear when he should come to be fastened in, and an
enormous
silver-plate, with a chased border of cheerful flowers,
that took away the very appearance of death. Having
concluded
to occupy this tenement, the portly gentleman
proceeded
to take possession, and with great difficulty crowded
himself into the coffin; forgetting, however, to put off his
hat, which remained fixed on his head in a very sturdy and
consequential position; and there he stood, bolt-upright,
staring at the young 'prentice, as if it was his determination
to chill him into an icicle. Sam was, however, not so
easily
over-awed, but on the contrary felt greatly inclined to
burst into a good hearty laugh at the comic figure the nice
portly gentleman made in his dainty brass-hinged mahogany
coffin.
As he turned away his eyes, they encountered a
spectacle
which came nigh changing their merry humor to tears
for a sweet lady, all in white, floated gently past him; of a
fair, meek demeanor, and bearing in either hand two
little
children, a boy and girl, whose faces ever turned
toward
the lady's with an expression of intense and tender
regard. Clinging to her with a firm grasp, they glided by,
and tried at first to find rest in one coffin together, which
proving ineffectual, they chose coffins neighboring to each
other, and quietly assuming their places, they stood calm
and patient, as if death had fallen kindly upon them; the
two children turning reverently toward their dear mother,
and hanging on her pale sweet look with passionate
constancy
.
Directly in the steps of these visiters, there entered a
personage, who, judging from the dotted apparel in which
he presented himself, might have been the ghost of some
black-spotted card or other, come to take a hand with Sam's
master, who was greatly addicted to the sport and
entertainment
of whist-playing. However this might be, the
new-comer entered with a couple of somersets, turned
about when he had reached the centre of the shop, took
off his piebald cap, and made a leg to Sam, and then
scrambled
into a coffin directly opposite that of the portly
gentleman
.
For a long time these two personages stood regarding
each other; the one grinning and hitching up his leg, as if
he felt the irksomeness of confinement; and the other,
with a solemn look of consequence and self-importance,
determined the very grave itself should not get the better
of him.
`This is pleasant!' said the portly gentleman, at length,
with a slight tone of irony and condescension, to his
neighbor
,
the clown.
`Very, but not so airy as the ring!' answered the
merry-andrew
.
`Nor as snug as a corporation pantry, with a cut of cold
tongue between two debates,' returned the portly gentleman.
`But then it has its advantages. No taxes, mind that, (those
tax-gatherers used to be the torment of my life), no
ground-rents
,
poor-rates; no beggar's ding-ding at the front-door
bell.'
`But consider,' responded the clown, `tho' we lodge in
a cellar, as it were, a good under-ground, six steps down,
where are the oysters and brandy? Did that occur to you?'
`I confess it did not,' said the portly gentleman, slightly
staggered, `but I was thinking now what a choice storage
this would be for half a gross of tiptop champagne, with
the delicate sweat standing on the outside of the bottles.'
`There's no room for a somerset here, either,' said the
clown.
`Nor to deliver a speech in,' answered the portly
gentleman
.
See, I could'nt stretch out my right arm half its
length, to make even my first gesture; rather a cramped,
close place, after all.'
`Vanities! vanities!' cried the Poor Figure, from his
distant coffin, unable to suppress his feelings any longer.
`Cramped and close is it! It's paradise compared to the
dark, damp dungeons on the earth, where the living body is
pent up in dreary walls, and the cheerful light of day comes
in by stealth through grim bars. When the world moves
past the poor prisoner's window without a look of
recognition
;
when no man's hand takes his in a congenial grasp
is that life, d'ye say? He is deadI tell you, dead!'
cried the Poor Figure, in a voice of piercing agony, `as if
the marble slab was laid upon his breast, and the
grave-diggers
piled mountains upon his corse!'
`Many's the jolly time,' resumed the portly gentleman,
without much heed to the Poor Figure's declamation,
`we've had at city suppers. How tenderly the turkey's
breastbought by the commonalty, purchased by the sweat
of the hard-worked millionyielded to the shining knife. How
sweetly the popular port-wine, and the public porter, glided
down the throat. Choice times were those, my good sir,
when the city paid the hackman's fare for dainty rides to
the suburbs, and when we made the poor devil paupers
stand about us licking their thin chaps, while we rolled the
rich morsels under our tongues. But now,' he added in a
rather melancholy tone, `I am little better than one of the
heathen. I smell nothing but the musty earth; my gay
apparel
is falling piecemeal into doleful tatters, and I can get
nothing to chew upon but an occasional mouthful of black
mould, that sadly impedes digestion, if one had any
digestion
,
in such a place as this worth speaking of.
`Think but of one thing, sir,' said the clown, with an
uneasy movement in his coffin, `and you cannot fail to be
content. Where are the duns in this new empire of ours?
We are as inaccessible to the vile creatures as the crown
of an ice-berg. Why, sir, there was a poor wretch of a
collector that haunted me for a vile debt of twenty-two and
sixpence, until I was sorely tempted to take his very life;
and put myself upon contrivances how I could take it with
most pain and torture to his body and soul. I thought of all
sorts of man-traps, and pit-falls in blind-alleys, and
leaden-headed
7
bludgeons; and at lengthheaven save the mark!
I pitched upon the scheme of carrying him off in a
balloon
,
and about two miles up, letting him slip with a cord
about his neck, and hang dangling by the neck until dead,
ten thousand feet high. He was got safely into the balloon
by a dexterous accomplice; was carried upand, now that
my mind was at ease as to the result, I went home to take
a quiet cup of tea, and to settle up my books, meaning to run
my pen through the twenty-two and six as a settled account,
whenthe Lord save uswho should knock gently at my
door, and march in with his old impudent smile, than my
old enemy the collector, with his customary phraseshoping
he did'nt intrudeand, if it was'nt too much trouble, he
would like to have the small amount of his bill, which, as I
knew, had been standing some time. The rope had
broken
,
sir, just as they passed over my house, the vile little
rascal had pitched upon the roof, and making the best of
circumstances, had walked down my scuttle, and availing
himself of the opportunity, had looked in with his cursed
little bill. We're free from the scamp now.I'm not sure,
isn't that he in the pine coffin?'
Sure enough, there stood the Poor Figure, leaning
toward
them, and listening in an attitude of intense regard, to
every word that had fallen from the lips of the clown.
`I am the man!' he cried with great emphasis, when the
clown had ended. `None other but I. On the little paltry
debt of twenty-two and sixpence, hung my old father's life,
who lay rotting in the cold jail: waiting for deliverance,
which I had promised him many timeswith as false a
tongue as man could. I said I would come to-morrow at
such an hour, and the next to-morrow at such an hour
naming, in my desire to bring him definite hope, the very
minute and second: and I did not come. Was not that a
lie? And did you not stand behind me, another liar? How
many lying, false tongues wagged with yours and mine, in
that little business of the twenty-two shillings and sixpence,
God only knows! I forgive you the debt: the old man's
bones are at the bottom of the prison well where he perished.
They should plead for truth from its gloomy womb, and
have a voice to shake prison walls and fetters from manly
limbs. God grant they may.'
The Poor Figure had scarcely ended when the door was
slowly opened, and disclosed a meek little man clad in a neat
suit of plain black, with two snow-white bands falling under
his chin. His gait and aspect denoted many solemn thoughts,
and with a slow pace, and a seeming consciousness of the
gloomy realm in which he was treading, he advanced to an
obscure corner of the place, and folding his arms calmly
upon his breast, stood silently in his coffinhis head only
inclined
a little to one side, as if he expected momently to
catch the sound of the last great trump, and to welcome the
summons.
Sam heard a noise in the hall, as of some person
shuffling
about in heavy boots in search of the door, and after
the lapse of a few minutes a large man in a white coat with
a dirty cape, a ponderous leather hat, and a club in his hand,
swaggered boldly in, and after looking about him for a while
as if on the watch for a ghost or apparition, walked quietly
off, and taking his station in a comfortable cedar coffin in
the middle of the apartmentobviously mistaking it for a
watch-boxfell gently asleep. From all that he saw, Sam
imagined that this was a city watchman; and the
presumption
is, that he was not far wrong.
After a salubrious slumber of some ten minutes or more,
this gentleman waked up, and thrusting his head out of his
coffin, stretched his neck, and gazed up and down the
apartment
,
and then toward the ceiling.
`How the devil's this?' he at length exclaimed, `the
lamps are out early to-night: and the alderman must have
put the moon in his pocket, I guess. That's the way they
serve us poor charleys. We wouldn't catch a rogue more
than once an age if we didn't take them into porter-houses
and get 'em drunk, and study their physiognomies, and so
set them a stealing half fuddled!'
`What's that you say, my man?' cried the voice of the
portly gentleman. `What fault have you to find with the
corporation, I'd like to know? Do you pretend to impeach
their astronomy, Sir; and to say, Sir, that the moon doesn't
rise when she is set down for in the almanac? I'd have you
know, Sir, the moon's bespoke three months ahead; and
that the oil-dealers know when they put a short allowance
in the lamps! I'll have you broke, if you haven't a care how
you speak of an alderman. A word to the wise in your
ear, Sir.'
The watchman was making up his mouth for a reply,
and it is impossible to say what choice specimens of
rhetoric
might not have been furnished between them, but at
this moment the shop-bell was rung with great fury: Sam
started up with wonderful alacritydistinguishing the ring
at once from all other possible ringsand receiving, as he
advanced
to the front of the warehouse a thumping blow on the
side of the head, was asked what he meant by leaving the
shop open at that time of night, and coffins out at the door
to be rotted by the night dew and chalked up by young
vagabonds in the street?
This was of course Sam's master: Sam's visiters
mistook
it. however, for a summons of a very different kind; the
watchman, supposing it to be an alarm of fire, rattled his club
against the coffin-side and sprang for the door: the portly
gentleman thought it a melodious supper-bell, and,
disengaging
himself, exhibited equal activity: the Poor Figure
followed
,
hobbling along like a waiter in a hurry: the clown,
for the call-boy's notice, and somerseted through the door:
the sweet lady in white, for the last peal of the Sunday
summons
,
and glided away with her children at her side: and
the little parson, smoothing down his bands and calming his
thoughts to the purpose of the hour, taking it for the
Wednesday-evening
lecture call:and so the company dispersed.
Sam busying himself in obeying the undertaker's orders,
soon closed the warehouse; and as he moved past the empty
coffins, to his bed at the end of the shop, and thought how
they had been lately filled, it occurred to him how
inopportunely
men might be laid in their graves: debtors lying
nearest neighbors to catchpoles and deputies, whose
approach
was the curse of their life: the clown and the
alderman
,
parsons and profligates, in a tender vicinage: tapsters
and favorers of the pure stream, perchance murderers and
their victims, and breakers of troth and violators of faith
pledged to woman, in a proximity so close, that the skeleton
arm outstretched might reach into the grave where the
broken
heart lay, and take its cold and ineffectual hand back
into that which had done it such deadly wrong. On
Judgment
Day, when the trump sounds among burials like these,
if aught of fiery or human passion remain, what awful scenes
will bear witness to the fancy of the young 'prentice-boy:
when forms shall start up and have life again but to glare
on other wakened formsto loathe, curse, scorn and abhor
that on which they gaze. Grave-yards would then know
a strife and passionate conflict, that battle fields could not
match, with all their sanguinary stains, and cries of horror,
vengeance or despair.
CHAPTER VII.
PUFFER HOPKINS RECEIVES AN APPOINTMENT.
Toward the close of an afternoon, a few days after the
visit of Puffer Hopkins to the auction-room, a deformed
little
personage was strolling through the street, with his arms
nearly to his elbows in his breeches-pockets, his head thrown
back a trifle, and his eyes turned up as if he were in the
very depths and profundities of a cogitation of some
consequence
:
in short, it was our gentleman of the Bottom Club,
who practiced upon certain pockets, as has been seen, on a
former occasion.
Three pair of fowls at three shillings, makes nine, said
the little gentleman, the old red rooster at five shillings
though his liver's disordered, for I smelt his breath this
morning
fourteen.
That's for after-breakfast work. Then
before
,
there 's twenty pound of hoop, twopence a pound,
and a sheet of copper, seven pound, at five pence
thirty-five
and forty; as good as seventy-five: and all the afternoon
for a holiday, to find out where this Puffer Hopkins lives, and
to hatch out an acquaintance with him. There's something
brewing in the wind 'twixt him and that shabby old lunatic,
Hobbleshank: something going on that ought to be put a
stop to; and as the Wice Chance-seller of Law wo'nt
interfere
to separate such good friends, we'll see what Mr. Small,
Ish Small, of Pell street or thereabouts, can do. He
walked
a few paces further, and again broke out, Let me catch
that old fellow trying any of his tricks on uncle Close, as he
did ten year ago, when he pitched his family watch at my
crown, and we'll see if there an't a spice of sport from it.
Strike up, old 'un, I'm here!
Saying this, he trotted down the street, turned into a
by-way
,
crossed that at a good pace, and speedily reached a
corner
building, from which a great striped flag was waving and
a tumult of voices issuing. Into this he made his way,
selected
a suitable position, and at the proper moment, (a great
deal of the same sort of business going on at the time), he
called out the name of Puffer Hopkins, which was duly
entered
by one of the clerks of the meeting upon a roll, and the
agile little performer, thereupon, departed.
This time he selected a different course, striking straight
towards the heart of the city, for several blocks, and
emerging
upon an open square. He now looked about him for
several minutes, indulging in a severe scrutiny of the
neighboring
buildings, and at length fixed his eye upon a dingy,
yellow house, which stood facing the square and forming the
fork or extreme point of two streets.
I think I should know the house by the description, he
said, measuring it again with his eye, from top to bottom, it
isn't quite a palace, that's clear: I don't believe the Grand
Signior lives here, nor his Highness the chief of the Seneca
tribes. There's considerable poverty written in dirty paint
all about the front; and, judging by the windows, I guess it's
had a hard fight with the brick-front across the way, and got
an eye or two put out. At this moment, the light of a lamp
fell from a window of the upper story, and Mr. Small,
turning
his face up towards it, exclaimed, His light, by all that
shines! It an't a astral, anyhow! He's studying a speech,
or mixing a dose of resolutions, nowand I'll step in and
surprise him! I've no doubt the stairs will hold out till I get
up and down, although they look as if they was on their
last legs.
Climbing a narrow and ill-arranged way, he attained
the topmost landing, where he stood for some time, in doubt
which door, of the many that presented themselves, to select;
when turning suddenly, as he heard some one ascending the
stairs, he stumbled, and falling against a door, dashed it open
and landed in the very centre of a room. It would be
perhaps
a sufficient description of this apartment to say, that it
was hardly large enough to fight a boxing-match in, with the
attendant spectators; that besides the person of Puffer
Hopkins
,
it held the heads of Demosthenes and John Randolph,
a solitary chair, a small auction-bought desk, and a long
fragment
of looking-glass established in one corner.
Your humble servant, sir; your most obedient! I thought
I'd just stop as I was passing, and tell you, you are a
regularly
elected member of the Vig'lance Committee of this
Ward! said the visitor, grasping his cap in both hands,
assuming
a countenance of great simplicity and innocence, and
travestying a bow, a good deal in the style of a theatrical
waiter, retiring.
By whose goodness is this? asked Hopkins, eagerly.
Mine, for lack of a better, sir:I thought it would be a
little sort of a treat, now that strawberries are out of season!
answered the little gentleman, licking his lips.
Yours, sir? exclaimed Puffer, seizing him by the hand;
I owe you a debt of gratitude for life for this. Do n't I know
you, sir? you are a member of the Club, I believe; the
memorable
,
and immortal Clubthe Bottom, I mean?
Receiving an answer in the affirmative, he ran on in a very
fluent and enthusiastic style, pronouncing his introduction to
the Bottom Club one of the most fortunate incidents of his
life; his acquaintance with the gentleman before him as one
of the greatest pleasures he had ever known; said that he was
attached to his party and his principles, no man more; and
that he was resolved to perform his duty as a member of the
Vigilance Committee with the utmost zeal, promptitude and
dispatch.
The stranger, although a small man, was not a little
astonished
at this tide of eloquence, (for Puffer Hopkins was in the
middle of a declamation to his looking-glass on some
supposed
festive occasion when the visitor had broken in, and which
declamation, in the flutter of the interruption, he applied to
his unexpected advent): we say he was not a little surprised,
but it was with main effort he subdued his mirth, when, at
the end of all these elegant promises and professions, Puffer
Hopkins asked him What he had to do?
Now, there are many things that a member of a Vigilance
Committee, giving a liberal construction to the designation,
might be supposed to be engaged in with great propriety.
Possessing the sharp eye that of right belongs to a
functionary
so entitled, he should pierce into the heart of hidden
abuses
following
them with close, wary steps, into obscure dens
and hauntsgetting at awful secrets of crime, veiled from
all other eyesdetecting, through the world, in their
thousand
disguises and hypocritical mantles, fraud, cruelty,
domestic
wrong, and the whole brood of cozenage and knavery.
It is pretty clear that it was to none of these varieties of
service that Puffer Hopkins was expected to devote his very
promising talents: and of this Puffer himself had some faint
conceptionfor when he puzzled his brain in search of the
duties of his new character, it did not occur to him that it had
ever been the business of any politician, past or present, or
would be in all future time, to subserve in any possible way
the plain, simple, every-day interests of humanity.
At this question, Mr. Small laughed; not, however, as if
any circumstance of the present interview, or relating
thereto
,
had struck him as at all humorous, but as if his thoughts
were fixed upon some remote incident, away off a good many
miles, and arising from such innocent sources as might be
supposed to move the mirth of so simple-minded a
gentleman
.
Laugh he did, however, with such violence as to
compel
him to place a hand upon one of his ribs, while he planted
his elbow against the wall to support the other.
From all which, it might be presumed that the little
gentleman
thought it quite a diverting question to be asked,
What the members of a Vigilance Committee had to do?
Laughing, and still holding his sides, the dwarf gentleman
again burlesqued a bow and hurried from the apartment:
leaving Mr. Puffer Hopkins in a state of no little wonder and
bewilderment.
Determined, nevertheless, to acquire a more definite
knowledge
of the functions and duties of this majestic office, Puffer
snatched up his hat, shifted himself into a bright blue coat
with intense brass buttons, and went forth. In the
excitement
and anxiety of mind resulting from the sudden
knowledge
of his appointment, he had enjoyed a brisk walk
of two squares or more before it occurred to him that it
would greatly further his inquiries if he would take a minute
or two to consider where they should be made.
After many misgivings and fluctuations of opinion, he
at length fixed on Mr. Fishblatt, and, for a variety of
reasons
,
selected that gentleman as an adviser in his present
emergency: to whose residence he turned his steps with
all becoming expedition. Glancing about for an
overgrown
door-plate and a red front surmounted with gigantic
chimney-pots, Puffer was not long in discovering the domicil
of which he was in search; which domicil was, however,
adorned, beyond the description of Mr. Fishblatt, by an
oblong
sign stretched across the entire front, and cutting the
house unpleasantly into halves, indicating that the safe, cheap
and accommodating corporation of the Phnix Fire
Insurance
Company harbored within.
Mr. Halsey Fishblatt, therefore, inhabited a second floor;
and after a due performance on a door-bell, and ringing all the
customary changes, Puffer was led by a frouzy-haired servant
girl through the hall, up one flight of stairs and into a small
supplemental building, in a small room whereof
comprehending
the entire breadth and length of the samehe came upon
Mr. Fishblatt, seated grandly in a very high-backed chair
holding in his outstretched arms an enormous newspaper, on
which his eyes were fixed as keenly and comprehensively as
if he expected by the perusal of the sheet before him at that
very time and the mastery of its contents, to become one
of the finest scholars and profoundest critics in the
country
.
He was assisted in the achievement of this mighty
purpose
,
if he entertained it, by a gorgeous spirit-lamp which
was fed by a ball, and blazed away on a table at his side,
like a meteor.
On the entrance of Puffer Hopkins, the reader sprang to
his feet, cast down the paper, and rushing anxiously towards
his visiter, fixed upon his right hand with the tenacity of a
griffin. My dear fellow, cried Mr. Fishblatt, earnestly,
I 'm glad to see you. Down with your hat. Make
yourself
at home: this looks like home, does n't it? Every body
thinks so that comes here. I do n't suppose you could find a
snugger room of the kind in the whole planetary system:
you see how cosy and quiet it is; here are all my books
around mepamphlets, sermons, speeches, documents from
Congress, documents from Legislatures, catalogues, tracts,
and lexicons. Is n't it very nice?
I certainly think it is, answered Puffer, contemplating the
questioner with considerable astonishment.
There's something on your mind, continued Mr.
Fishblatt
,
scarcely waiting an answer, I know it: I see it
plainly
,
something that harasses and worries you. You don't
sleep, you can't rest, it troubles you so. Come, out with it,
my boy; let's have it, at once. What is it that makes you
look so anxious?
To tell the truth, I 'm a member of the Vigilance
Committee
,
and do n't know what my duties are, answered
Puffer. And I have taken the liberty to come and ask you
what I shall do, in my new capacity?
If I was a member of a Vigilance Committee, said Mr.
Fishblatt, regarding Puffer Hopkins with great gravity and
steadiness. I should consider it my duty to have immense
telescopes constructedand I would plant them, sir, where
I could look into the very interior of every domicil in the
8
ward, and know what was in every man's pot for dinner six
days in the week. This may not be your view of duty, sir;
but I should feel bound to have great ledgers keptwith
leaves that opened like doorsand there write down every
man's name in large letters: and I 'd have a full length of
him drawn on the margin, and colored to the life. I 'd give
his dress, sir, down to the vest buttons, and if there was a
mote in his eye, I 'd have it there to be cross examined, when
he came up to vote. Now don't say you can't do thisyou
have n't the physical strength to keep such a set of books.
Would you inquire so very particularly, asked Puffer,
timidlyfor he felt abashed by the grand conceptions of the
imaginative Fishblattinto the private habits of voters?
I would, sir! answered Mr. Fishblatt, peremptorily;
I 'd know whether they slept in trundle-bedsteads or
high-posts
;
whether they preferred cold-slaugh cut lengthwise or
crosswise of the cabbage; whether their shoes were
hobnailed
or pegged. Can you tell why I 'd do this?
Puffer Hopkins frankly and heroically confessed that he
could not very readily, without the aid of Mr. Fishblatt.
I knew you could n't, said that distinguished
rhetorician
.
Don't you see that the public conduct of the man is
foreshadowed in his personal habits? A man that wears red
flannel shirts is always for war: a man that employs
nightcaps
is opposed to riots. The voters that browbeat their
servants at home, sir, always cry out for strengthening the
Executive. Go into that man's house over the way, sirthe
house with the meek, salmon-colored door:that door is a
hypocrite and deceiver, sir! Climb to the fourth shelf of his
pantry, and you 'll find two red-handled rawhides:that man
approves of despatching the Florida Indians by drugging their
brandy with ratsbane. That man 's on his knees every
Sunday
,
in the Orthdox chapelwears out a pair of knee
cushions every yearand has breeches made without
pockets
,
to escape the importunities of beggars in the streets and
highways. Put him down in your journal, sir, as a knave, a
villain, a low base fellowwill you?
The laws hardly reach such men, suggested Puffer.
I 'd make them reach, said Mr. Fishblatt, confidently,
I 'd stretch 'em till they did reach. I 'd hang such men
higher than Haman: I 'd invent every kind of rack and
thumb-screw, and worry their lives out by inches: I 'd fill
their houses with bugs and alligators: they should have
pirates
to wait on them at table: and they should sleep with
bandits swarming about their bedsgreat black-whiskered
banditswith pistols charged to the muzzle and always on
the full cock. Would that serve them right?
I think it wouldstrictly speaking, answered Puffer;
But as member of a Vigilance Committee, should I
undertake
to spy out such abuses?
Oh, no: your business ishave I told you what your
business is?to go along the wharves, and up into alleys,
and down into cellars, and inquire for votersdisseminating
the right doctrine by the way, and making every body of
your opinion, by having no opinion at all. Are you on the
Dock Committee, or one of the Alley Committees?
Neither, answered the young politician; I think mine
is known as the Rear-Building section.
Are you advised whether there are any old women there
to give iron spectacles to? or small childrento nurse with
gingerbread? or any recent deaths in any of the families
that you may sympathize in the bereavement, by wearing a
strip of crape on your hat?
I have no instructions, answered Puffer Hopkins.
Then you had better go prepared for all emergencies
you had better carry a piece of calico under your arm, to
cut into gowns; half a dozen papers of confectionary in your
pockets; a gross of clay-pipes, for the superanuated voters
or their aged relatives; a bale of corduroys; and, perhaps
I only suggest thisa basket of sheep's pluck.
What is this last for? asked Puffer, gaping with
astonishment
at the personal services required of him, as a member
of the high and mighty Ward Vigilance Committee.
To wheedle their dogs with, answered Mr. Fishblatt, if
they happen to keep any in the front yard.
Surprised and perplexed by the requisitions of the
Vigilance
branch of the serviceas expounded by Mr. Halsey
Fishblatt, the extraordinary fervor of whose fancy Puffer
Hopkins had not yet quite learned to appreciatehe
directed
his steps towards his lodgings in the Fork, striving his best
to project the means by which he should procure the articles
enumerated, and the kind of conveyance by which they were
to be transported to voters' houses.
As to the latter, his mind wavered between a porter's
go-cart
and a small boy, with broad shoulders,and as to the
first, he had not reached a conclusion when he reached home;
where he was opportunely relieved from further perplexity
for the present, by having a dirty billet placed in his hands,
inviting him to a meeting of the very Vigilance Committee
itself, at the Head Quarters, at half past seven that evening.
Disposing of a thrifty meal, consisting of two cheap slices
of bread, a saucer of onions in vinegar, (an excellent thing
for the voice), and a bowl of black tea, he whirled his hat
half a dozen times about his left hand, applying to its nap,
meantime, the sleeve of his right arm, buttoned his coat as
smartly as he could, and leaving word that he had gone to a
public meeting, the young politician put forth.
A few minutes' rapid walkingfor he was behind his time
brought him to the room in which the Committee
assembled
,
and halting for a moment for a general survey, he
entered
,
and assumed his seat on a bench against the wall with
his fellow-laborers, who were present in great force, looking
as vigilant and shrewd-minded as their station required. A
member was on his legs, expounding, in very animated and
felicitous style, the glory to be reaped by any adventurous
canvasserwho, in the service of his country and impelled
by a desire to transmit a name to his children, should plunge
down a certain cellarwhich he describedand secure the
names of several desperate villains who there harbored with
the intent of coming forth as voters at the spring election,
and perjuring themselves in the very face and eye of heaven.
This gentleman was followed by a second, of equal power
and comprehensiveness of vision, who declared, on his
personal
honor and well known character for integrity, that they
might look out for a riot; and one of a very serious cast. He
had said serious cast, because the size of the clubs in
preparation
was unusual. He had a friend (thank Heaven!) whose
confidence he believed he possessed. He was a turner: he
had been secretly employed to furnish a gross of heavy
bludgeons
in
the disguise of balustrades. For this fact they
might take his word. He did n't mention it to alarm any
gentleman present. He did n't wish any gentleman to stay
at home or to put himself at nurse on election day, to avoid
anything unpleasant that might be abroad, in the shape of
clubs or bludgeons. For his part, he had nothing to fear
he only wished to put gentlemen of the Committee on their
guard, and to drive them to take into serious consideration
the expediency of reviving the use of the ancient helmet.
These words had scarcely escaped him, when a pale young
gentleman sprang up from a table at the corner of the room,
and offered a resolution embodying the suggestions of his
friend; which was promptly seconded by a respectable and
worthy tinker, across the room, who had a presentiment that
the helmets in question must be made of sheet-iron quilted
with tinwhich would all fall in his line of trade. The
resolution
was, notwithstanding this able advocacy, doomed not
to become an heroic determination of the Committee
corporate
,
being extinguished and quenched forever by a flood of
invective and ridicule issuing from a gentleman who
condescended
to perform journey-work in a hatter's establishment,
and who properly enough regarded such an attempt as an
invasion
of the rights of the guild.
The early part of the evening proved, therefore, very
tempestuous
and windy; but as soon as the various gusts of
debate
and declamation had blown over, a very plain-looking
gentleman, at about ten o'clock, rose; and beginning in a
very soft voice, which seemed to grow softer as he advanced,
proved himself to be a very sensible fellow, by calling the
attention of the meeting to some little particulars which had
been overlooked. These particulars consisted of the
division
and organization of the Committee into sections, enrolling
their names in a book, each section having its own head or
chairman, and the allotment of their duties to the various
members of the Committee.
There was the Dock Committeethey wanted a gentleman
on that, who would n't feel the inconvenience of a tarpaulin
hat, a wide-skirted shaggy box-coat with two sepulchral
pockets
,
for his fists to be carried in, at the sides, and who could n't
well live without a cigar. Then, they wanted a short man
for cellars and areas: a thin man to go up the allies: a
spruce-looking
member to visit at the quality houses: a supple man,
of an enterprising turn, for rear-building and garret service:
and a jolly-looking portly dog to talk with the landlords and
tavern-keepers.
The plain man described, in a few words and with
becoming
modesty, what he thought the duty of the members of
the Vigilance Committee then and there assembled: they
should be keen-eyed in discovering voters, artful and
insinuating
in approaching them, copious of tongue, subtle in
argument
,
and prepared to clinch anything they might choose
to assert.
He thought vilifying the opposition was n't bad, if it was
done in a christian-like wayand by describing them as
some persons, or, there were people who he (the
member
)
knew could n't bear the poor; who would take the last
potatoe out of a poor man's pot, and similar fetches of
expression
.
When this gentleman had occupied the floor for about an
hour, Puffer Hopkins very discreetly held himself to be as
well advised as to the services required as he was ever likely
to be; and determining in his own mind not to be easily
outdone
,
and to set about his portion of the task on the morrow,
he departed.
CHAPTER VIII.
ADVENTURES OF PUFFER AS A SCOURER.
The sun had certainly made up his mind, that morning,
not to see company; and if all the Vigilance Committees in
the seventeen wards had turned out expressly for that purpose,
it would have been impossible for even their well-known and
extraordinary astuteness to have detected the slightest glimpse
of his benevolent features anywhere in the very murkiest
sky of a November day. The forty-five spirited
fire-companies
of the metropoliswho had seen proper, at a very early
hour in the day, to take a run at a horse-shed near Bowling
Green, which had extinguished itself the moment it was
discovered
nothing else could catch from itmight with equal
propriety have turned in and staid at home, smoking
longnines
and talking over past achievements: for the rain came
down in torrents, and kept every combustible plank in the
city as nice and moist as heart could wish.
Omnibus-drivers and hackmen carried a proud head, and
looked down on the sinful world of dry-goods men and
indoor
trades-people, from their box seats, with an air of
pleasant
disdain; and the proprietors of livery-stables peered
forth from their small office-windows, smiling and making
themselves happy and comfortable at the prospect, as Noah
might have done, on a similar occasion. Pedestrians with
umbrellas looked melancholy, and buried themselves in their
blue-cottons and brown-silks, to indicate their misanthropy;
and pedestrians without umbrellas looked small and
miserable
,
and making the most of their wrappers, hurried along,
in a supreme unconsciousness of the inhabited character of
any window they might pass, or the identity of any possible
friend in the street.
Others pushed along, thinking more of the respective
errands
on which they were bound than of any violence of
weather, and heeding the plashing shower no more than if it
had been sunshine and fair walking. Among these was the
resolute Hopkins, who, embowered in a cheap blue-cotton
umbrella, strided along, bent on the thorough and faithful
discharge
of his arduous duties as scourer or canvasser of the
Ward.
He had selected for the first visitation, a rear-building in
a bye-street, inhabited by sundry gentlemen of doubtful
politics
,
and making all proper speed, he arrived in a short time
in the neighborhood where he intended to operate.
Opening
a blind gate, which worked with a pulley and closed
swiftly behind him, Puffer found himself in a square
enclosure
,
filled with carts, fragments of boarding, old iron pots,
broken pieces of garden-fence standing against the walls, two
cistern-heads, and, at the rear, a row of cheap wooden houses,
with the windows dashed out, sundry breaches in the casing,
and various red-pots, supposed to contain stunted specimens
of horticulture, arranged in the upper windows. Directly
in the middle of the yard, there stood, under one large
ivory-handled
umbrella, a couple of well-dressed white-haired
individuals
one
of whom was very stout, portly and
commanding
,
and the other very shrunken, round-shouldered and
obsequiouslooking up at the buildings; the portly
gentleman
staring at them with great severity and talking
boisterously
,
and the round-shouldered, glancing up at the portly
gentleman, meekly, and making minutes of what he said.
Draught of the chimneys, heavy: note that down, will
you? said the portly gentleman, peremptorily.
I will, said the meek man, It 's down, sir.
Supposed equal to two factory furnaces, with the blowers
on: down with thatand put my initial to it, if you please.
I have, in large capitals, said the timid gentleman.
That 's right, said the portly gentleman, promptly.
Skuttles always open, and children allowed to smoke burnt
rattans: I see one of 'em at it now. Will you mark
that
down? cried the stout gentleman, evidently very much
enraged
,
and with a startling emphasis that caused the meek
man to jump out from under the shelter, which compelled his
superior to order him back, twice, very distinctly, before he
could be induced to return to his duty, and chronicle what
fell from the stout gentleman's lips. They dry their hose at
No. nine, on the back of a rocker before the fire; and use a
decayed Duch-oven at No. eleven,this last attributable to
the extravagance of the lower orders, who are too proud to
patronize the baker.
That 's a very happy observation, said the meek man,
Shall I print it out large, like the play-bills?
Stuff! cried the portly gentleman, smiling haughtily,
just mind your business, and recollect that all private
feelings
are absorbed in the Company's interestswill ye?
I 'll try, said the meek man, timidly.
Do! and just say, if you please, that the first floor 's
occupied
by a journeyman lightning-maker.
A journeyman lightning-maker! echoed the meek man.
None of your nonsense, now, Crumpbut down with
what I tell you: a journeyman lightning-maker, in the employ
of one of the theatres. Say, we are informed, that he lives
on brandy, (brandy 's a pretty inflammatory article, I
believe
,
and cases of spontaneous combustion have occurred:
put that reflection in a note, and mark it J. B. in the corner),
and makes lightning in the garret. Now, for the cisterns.
Have you smelt No. eleven?
I have, sir, answered the secretary, making a wry face,
and it 's uncommon noxious.
Do you know the cause? asked the portly gentleman,
disdainfully.
I do not, sir? answered the meek gentleman, groping in
his pockets.
A childa juvenile small childthat went to a Public
School, took his own life in despair, one day, in that very
cistern, sirbecause he could n't spell phthisic, sir!
That was strange, was n't it?
Very strange, Crump. The child came home in the
afternoon
,
with the same green bagtake notice, sirthe same
green bag on his arm that he 'd carried for fourteen months,
and said, `Mother, there 's a pain,' laying his hand on his
head, `a great violent pain here.' That was all he said, and
then he went up stairs, made up his little couch, tied his
wooden horse to a bed-post, with a new ribbon about his
neck, put on his Sunday hat and a clean apron, and stepping
stealthily down stairs, walked comfortably into the cistern,
and ended all his agonies.
That's a remarkable affair, said the secretary, with his
mouth and eyes wide open. Do n't you think it's a serious
argument against the Public Schools, sir?
It's a smasher, Crump: an extra-hazardous smasher,
said the Insurance President, for that proved to be his official
station. There's something wrong in the system, you may
depend on it; or children would never destroy themselves in
this way because they can't spell dipthong words of two
syllables
.
Now, to business, if you please. Say, it's the
opinion
of the President, that no engine will ever consent to draw
water from the cistern of No. eleven; that engines can't be
expected to take little boys or little girls into their chambers
and extinguish their bereaved parents' burning dwellings with
the rinsings. Firemen have feelings, (this is a moral axiom,
for the benefit of the Directors), engines have works: and
although the coroner did sit on the cistern-lid the better part
of an entire night, inquiring into this melancholy case, and
sent down several courageous small boys with boat-hooks,
and called patriotically into the cistern himself, yet add, the
boy was never found; and from the fact of deceased's never
having been seen to come out, a strong suspicion prevails in
the neighborhood that he is still in: but what makes the corpse
so very outrageous and stubborn, nobody can say. Is that
it, Crump?
All down, sir, answered Mr. Crump.
Stand out from the umbrella, then, if you please, Mr.
Crump: business is over. You're Crump and I'm Blinker.
And the Insurance President looked down upon his assistant
in the most commanding fashion.
Crump obeyed, and, withdrawing from the brown-silk
protector, stood outside, awaiting the further pleasure of the
portly gentleman.
This is a sweet day, Crump, said the President,
contemplating
with evident satisfaction the huge drops that pashed
in one of the puddles.
Charming! said Crump, slily inserting a cotton
pocket-handkerchief
between his coat-collar and the back of his
neck, for Crump was slightly rheumatic.
Stocks should rise, in weather like this, said Mr. Blinker.
The roofs are all good and wet, cellars under water, and a
good number of garrets flooded. Now, if we could have a
9
little rain horizontally, the second stories would be nice and
safe. To be sure, families might suffer a little inconvenience
but it would be morally impossible for fires to show
themselves
,
and I should look in the papers for two or three
melancholy
cases of incendiaries' having made way with
themselves
.
It's a pelter, Crump.
That, I believe, is admitted, answered that worthy
individual
,
with a slight tinge of impudence in his manner
buttoning
up his side-pockets, which began to fill, and throwing
his hands behind him under his coat-tails, which arrangement,
as he stooped forward, formed a commodious roof for the
rain to run off at.
It's lucky we're not in the marine line, continued the
President, glancing at the Secretary: Goods, not under
hatches, will be nicely soaked, I'm sure; particularly
woolens
and drabs.
Now it so happened, that the unfortunate Crump was the
owner of a very pretty pair of woolen drabsrather old
fashioned
,
to be surewhich, very singularly, he was wearing at
that very moment, as he stood in the shower in the open yard:
but as Mr. Blinker was well known as a benevolent-minded
gentleman, and above all manner of personalities, Crump was
bound to regard his observation as one of those happy
general
reflections for which he was equally remarkable.
The shower comes down so nice and straight, said Mr.
Blinker, erecting his umbrella, and drawing himself close
under its centre, at the same time consulting his watch, so
nice and straight, that it must put out a good many
kitchen-fires
;
which all helps:but it's time to be at the office. Do
you go on, Crump, and have the grate well pileddon't spare
the coals, for I am chilly. But stopwhose buildings are
these, did you say?
I did n't say, answered Mr. Crump, flushing slightly.
Whose? cried Mr. Blinker, in his official key, which
started the secretary into a small pond.
Fyler Close's, sir, answered the intelligent Crump,
speedily.
Humphvery well, said Mr. Blinker. Go on: and
don't forget to wheel my chair out, and warm my slippers.
And if the lime-dealer calls for his policy, tell him it isn't
made out, and that he may call the first fair day. This is fine
weather for slacking that article, Crump; excellent weather
to set houses on fire with water and white chalkdo you
understand
?
Go!
At this, the secretary picked his way through the yard,
carrying his head obliquely, to avoid the rain that dashed
directly in his face, and holding the gate for a moment, was
followed by the superior functionary, in great state; who
paused once or twice, however, and turned about to take a
glance at the buildings under survey for insurance.
Very well, said Puffer Hopkins, stepping out from under
a shed, where he had ambushed himself during this
instructive
conversation: These gentlemen must be on the
relief-committee
they
have a wonderful tenderness for poor
people
,
and wouldn't see 'em made martyrs of by a
conflagration
,
for all the world. Let me see: I think I'll visit the
lightning-maker in the garret, first. He's a genius, no doubt
and, belonging to the melo-dramatic school, may dazzle two
or three weak minds in the neighborhood.
With these words, the young politician proceeded to the
house which had been pointed out as the residence of the
lightning-maker, and knocked gently at the door.
The summons was answered by a small girl, with an
unclean
face and eyes that twinkled through the dirt like a
ground-mole's, who gave him to understand that the
gentleman
in question was at that moment in the garret of the
building, busy upon a two-quarter, and that he, Puffer
Hopkins
,
if he went up stairs, had better come upon him
cautiously
,
lest he might, in the confusion of a sudden surprise, let
slip a volcano, or something horrible of that nature, in the
combustible line.
Taking to heart the suggestion of the small adviser, Puffer
walked up stairs, and knocked at the door of the artizan's
laboratory with great discretion, beginning with a rap in the
very lowest key, and ascending gradually to a clear
doubleknock
.
Hold a minute, cried a voice from within, till I mix in
a trifle of red and blue. If you should come in now,
continued
the voice, pondering and speaking a word or two only
at a time, at if it was interrupted by some manual operation,
you'd lose us three good rounds with the pit. They always
loves to see a sheet of red fire, provided there's a cross of
blue in it.
In a moment Puffer was admitted, and discovered a lean
man, bending over a mortar, with great staring eyes, and
cheeks discolored with brimstone or yellow fumes of some
other kind; and surrounded by black bottles, two or three
broken pestles, an iron retort, and various other implements
of his trade. Puffer introduced himself, and proceeded at
once to the exercise of his function as a scourer.
This profession of yours, said Pufferhe dared not call
it a trade, although the poor workman was up to his eyes in
vile yellow paste and charcoal-dustThis profession, sir,
must give you many patriotic feelings of a high cast, sir.
It does, sir, answered the lightning-maker, slightly
mistaking
his meaning: I've told the manager, more than fifty
times, that lightning such as mine is worth ninepence a bottle,
but he never would pay more than fourpence ha'penny:
except
in volcanoesthem's always two-quarters.
I mean, sir, continued the scourer, that when you see
the vivid fires blazing on Lake Eriewhen Perry's working
his ship about like a velocepede, and the guns are bursting
off, and the enemy is paddling away like ducksis not your
soul then stirred, sir? Do you not feel impelled to achieve
some great, some glorious act? What do you dowhat can
you do, in such a moment of intense, overwhelming
excitement
?
I
generally, answered the lightning-maker, with an
emphasis
upon the personal pronoun, as if some difference of
practice might possibly prevail,
I
generally takes a glass of
beer, with the froth on.
But, sir, when you see the dwelling-house roof, kindled
by your bomb-shells, all a-blaze with the midnight
conflagration
the
rafters melting away, I may say, with the intense
heat, and the engines working their pumps in vaindon't
you think then, sir, of some peaceful family, living in some
secluded valley, broken in upon by the heartless incendiary
with his demon matches, and burning down their cottage
with all its out-houses?
In such cases, answered the lightning-maker, I thinks
of my two babies at home, with their poor lame mother
and I makes it a point, if my feelings is very much wrought
up, as the prompter says, to run home between the acts to see
that all's safe, and put a bucket of water by the hearth:
isn't that the thing?
I think it is: and I'm glad to hear you talk so feelingly,
answered Puffer Hopkins; our next mayor's a very
domestic-minded
manjust such a man as you areonly I don't
believe he'd be so prudent and active about the bucket on
the hearth.
At this, the lightning-maker smiled pleasantly to himself,
and unconsciously thrust a large roll of brimstone in his
cheek.
Is this your natural complexion that you have on this
morning? resumed Puffer Hopkins, seeing how well the
personal compliment took, and glancing at the
lightning-maker's
yellow chaps. If it is, the resemblance between
yourself
and the gentleman I have mentioned is more striking than
I could have expected: his nose is a copperisn't yours
inclining
a little that way?
I believe it is, answered the journeyman
lightning-maker
,
complacently.
Your eye is a deep grey, I think, as far as I can see it by
this light: that's what the Committee of Nomination, when
they waited on the next Mayor, thought was his.
In the flutter of nerves created by the scourer's instituting
these pleasant comparisons, the lightning-maker unadvisedly
brought together a couple of hostile combustibles, which
occasioned
the premature bursting of a small bottle of azure
lightningwithout scenery to match; and a small sky-light
was opened thereby, through a decayed shingle in the roof.
Instructed, by this, of the tropical climate of the
lightning-maker's
garret, and thinking that a sufficient train had been
laid for a future vote, Pufferwho had been advised of the
residence of a stout cobbler in the neighboring attictrotted
up a ladder and through the open skuttle, and scrambling
over the pitched roof, plunged down a similar opening in the
next house, and came very suddenly upon the object he sought.
The burly shoe-maker was seated on a cobbler's bench,
working
away merrily enough: at his side was laid a long
clay-pipe
,
filled ready to be lighted, and hard by him a bundle
of chattels, corded up, and arranged, apparently, for instant
transportation.
How is this? cried the cobbler, as his eye caught the
person of Puffer Hopkins: This isn't fairnor is it legal
in any courts, whether of Chancery or common law. Writs
don't descend, sirI know enough for that: no deputy
sheriff was ever enough of an angel to come from above. I
resist processdo you hear that?
Saying this, the cobbler started up, and seizing his bench,
planted it on end in front of the corded bale of chattels, and
standing between the two, he glared fiercely, through the
circular broken seat of the bench, on the suspected deputy.
A few words, however, calmed his agitation: he threw
down his bench, resumed his seat, and in token of his
perfect
satisfaction and pleasure in the explanation Puffer had
given, of the character in which he visited him, he kindled
his pipe and smoked away in good, long, hearty puffs.
Growing communicative, as their intercourse continued,
Puffer at length learned that the gentleman was the
proprietor
of the Dutch oven down stairsthe terror of Mr.
Blinker
,
the Presidentwas greatly distressed by creditors, who
hunted him with catchpoles and marshals from morning till
night, that all his proprietary interest on the lower floors lay
in the oven aforesaid and a very comfortable little fat wife,
(whose pride and comfort consisted in a turkey browned
before
a slow fire), and other little necessaries allowed by law.
The corded bale, held his valuables; and with these,
he was prepared to mount, at a moment's warning, through
the scuttle, and to convey himself to the peak of the house,
where he made it a point to sit in the shadow of a broad
chimney and smoke his pie at ease, until the cloud of
pursuers
was fairly dispersed or blown over.
They shall never catch me, while I live, cried the
cobbler
,
energetically. If they come on the roof, I'll climb
down the lightning-rod with that bundle on my back; I can
do it:and if one of the rascals attempts to climb up to me,
I'll drop it, and break his neck off, shortdepend on that.
My dear fellow, I'd be at the expense of the board, lodging
and education of a South American Condor, and teach him
to bear it off in his beak, before they should touch a thread
of it. Now you know my mind!
At this, he struck a thick heel, on which he was at work,
a thumping blow with his hammer, and kicked his lapstone
across the whole breadth of the garret.
Puffer Hopkins of course applauded the spirit of the
cobbler
,
and artlessly suggested that no man, with the soul of a
man, would submit quietly to such impertinent intermeddling
with his private affairs.
However, my friend, he continued, scouring as
industriously
as he well knew how, I trust this will not always
be so. These gentlemen of the law may yet have their
combs cut: I don't think they will always be allowed to
crow and chanticleer it over honest men!
Why not? asked the cobbler, looking at Puffer Hopkins
anxiously, and planting his great hands upon his knees.
For no very particular reason, answered the scourer,
except that I have heard it suggested that our new
Common
Councilmind, I say our new Common Councilwill
abolish the office of sheriff, and all others that interfere with
the enjoyment of a man's property by himself. They'll do
away with writs, and executions, and all that sort of thing,
said Puffer, coolly, that's all!
Say you so? shouted the cobbler, springing from his
bench and seizing Puffer by the hand: I'm your man!
Now try your luck on the down-stairs peopledon't let me
keep you back a minute. Try the bereaved mother, down
stairs: her husband's a'waveringhave him, by all means.
Dogs! you've done me more good than the sight of the big
boot in the square the first time I set eyes on it. God speed
you! Luck to you!
With these ejaculations, the cobbler dismissed his
comforting
visiter, who hurried below, and opening, according to
the instructions he had received, the first door to the right,
arrived at a new field in the domain to be canvassed.
Taking a rapid and comprehensive survey, Puffer Hopkins
was aware that he had entered the apartment of the
bereaved
motherfor there upon the mantel in a glass case, dressed
in crape, stood the identical wooden horse, with the ribbon
about his neck that had been attached to the bed-post by the
little misanthrope, on the day he had taken his own life in
the cistern.
As he discovered this, a gloom suddenly came over the
countenance of the scourer, and he approached the afflicted
parent with an aspect as wo-begone and dolorous as the
wood-cut frontispiece of the most melancholy Mourner's
Companion ever printed.
Mr. Hopkins, of the Ward Committee, said Puffer,
advancing
and taking the bereaved one by the hand. The
good man of the house is not in, I think?
No, he isn't, sir, she answered; it's very little that he
is in now, since the event. He can't bear the sight, poor
man, of that grievous monument therepointing to the
quadruped in the glass casealways in his sight. It e'en
a'most drives him mad.
Puffer Hopkins wonderedif the sight of a miserable
caricature of a horse in wood, under a glass cover, was so
near making a lunatic of himwhy he didn't go mad at
once, like a sensible man, and shiver it all in atoms, which
would have done something towards making it invisible: but
he didn't utter these thoughts, but on the contrary kept them
hidden in the very darkest recess of his bosom.
You do right, madam, continued Puffer, to keep that
constantly before your eyes. It's a softening objecta
mellowing spectacle for the heart to contemplate. Oh, no;
there is nothing, there can be nothing, pursued the scourer,
in a voice choked with agony, and turning away as if he was
too manly to expose his feelings, like a mother's grief. A
mother's griefit is a sacred and a solemn thing: and when
the affliction comes thusin this ghastly shapeit's too much
to think of. Who can repress their tears at the thought of the
agony of this family on the day of this fatal discovery? the
father frantic with sorrow and exertions to get the body;
sisters and brothershow many have you, madam?
Five small onesone at the breast.
Five little ones, shouting for the departed angel: and his
motherhis poor, bereaved, broken hearted motherwhen
she thinks of the suit he had on, his nice, tidy Sunday suit,
bends over the cistern and drops in her tears till it overflows!
Oh, there's a picture for the moralist and the patriot!
Don't, sirdon't, cried the afflicted mother. Don't
your eloquence quite breaks my heart: it makes me feel
it all over again.
I will not, said Puffer, I'll resist my feelings, and say
no more about it: not if you'll be good enough to take this
little order on the dry-goods dealerjust so that the poor
boy, if he should ever be found, may be put in a decent
shroud; he was a small boy, I thinkthe order's for a small
boya very small boy. And oblige me by telling your
husband
that Puffer Hopkins, of the Vigilance Committee,
called. Good day: good daypoor child. Uttering these
last words with a pathetic glance at the toy on the mantel,
and heaving a profound sigh, the scourer closed the door.
With the door, he closed his labors for the day, and
shaped his course homeward, satisfied that he had done his
country some slight service, and that two or three minds, at
least, had been sufficiently enlightened to vote the proper
ticket at the next charter election.
CHAPTER IX.
AN ENTERTAINMENT AT MR. FISHBLATT'S.
A few mornings after his adventures as scourer, Puffer
Hopkins was sitting at his desk in the Fork, earnestly
engaged
in the preparation and composition of a handbill,
for the approaching election. That this was a sufficiently
arduous undertaking for the young politician, was proved by
the great multitude of model placards strewn about the floor,
from which he at intervals solaced himself with a line or
two; by the blank looks with which he at times entirely
halted in his task; and by the painful gaze he occasionally
directed towards the wall, as if he expected to discover there
handwriting wherewith to eke out the unfinished sentence.
Having a good eye for catching phrases, and considerable
readiness in sounding words that would tell well in the
popular
ear, the composition presently flowed apace; line upon
line lengthened out, Puffer reciting each aloud as it was
finished, and in the course of about two hours, a thundering
manifesto, doomed soon to echo back from wall, shutter,
bulk-head
and house-side, great words of fearful import, and to
set the whole world of meeting-hunters and politicians
astir, was completed.
Puffer Hopkins was clearing his throat and preparing for
a grand rehearsal of this master-piece, when he was
suddenly
confronted by a frouzy-headed small girl, who had got
into the apartment, it seemed to himfor he had no notice
of her entranceby some underhand jugglery or
legerdemain
,
and who, assuming a face of great mystery, levelled
at him a diminutive billet, with a faint streak of gold about
its edges, and his own name written elaborately on the back.
Complimentshopes as how you'll comeand wishes
the bearer to say, wouldn't feel cheerful if Mr. Hopkins
should fail, said the frouzy-haired girl reciting something
that had been evidently ticketed and laid away in her mind,
to be delivered when called for.
Three lines of writing and a date within, worked out
obviously
with painful toil and a great variety of pens,
explained
the object of the small visiter, in a request that Mr. P.
Hopkins would favor Mr. H. Fishblatt with company at
seven o'clock this (Thursday) evening, at the sign of the
10
brass plate and chimney-pots, as before; giving him at the
same time street and number.
Puffer was in fine spirits, for he had been successful in his
literary laborsand what author's heart is not a-glow when
his invention proves ready, and his hand runs free across the
page?and he accepted the note with great complaisance,
and bade the frouzy-haired messenger (who stood staring at
the huge text scattered about the floor, as if the great black
letters might be ogres, giants, or some other monsters),
inform
Mr. Fishblatt he would attend his summons with the
utmost pleasure.
He was as good as his word; and two hours before the
time named in the invitation, Puffer began to prepare for the
party at Fishblatt's. First and foremost, he drew forth from
a case, in the corner of his lodgings, a brass-buttoned blue
coat, of a popular cut, and fell to beating it over the
shoulders
and down the back with a yard stick, as if he had under
his hand the body and person of his direst enemy in the
world: then he twisted the right arm up and dashed at the
place where the ribs might have been; then he fell upon the
breasts and pumelled them horribly; and then, casting aside
his stick, he fastened fiercely on the collar and gave the whole
a mighty shaking, as if he would have the very life out of it.
A pair of light drab cloth pantaloons, dragged from the same
confinement, shared in like manner at his hands; a striped
vest was stretched on the back of a chair like a rack; then
his boots were forced into a high polish, the pantaloons drawn
on, the vest released, and the coat occupied by its legitimate
lord, and Puffer, first attitudenizing a little before the long
glass, and running his fingers through his hairto get his
head as nearly as possible into the model he had in his eye of
a great politician, whose portrait was in the gallery at the
museumwas ready for the party. Sallying gently forth,
and marching steadily through the streets, with a secret
conviction
that every eye in the metropolis was fixed
immovably
upon him, he shortly discovered the great brass plate of
Halsey Fishblatt gleaming through the dark, where he
knocked
,
waited for a minute in a state of awful suspense and was
admitted, as before, by the message-bearer, who came to the
door with a face wrinkled with smiles, and strongly
suggestive
of something very nice and choice to be had within.
The small girl asked Puffer to be good enough to go to the
third-story back room, and thither he proceeded;
encountering
on his way, and at the base of the second flight of stairs,
a fry of dolorous-looking gentlemen, who lingered about the
parlor door, pulling down their wristbands and contemplating
it, as it opened and shut, with as much dread as if it had
been the gate of the doomed; while others hovered about the
great balustrade of the stair-case, in waiting for the descent
of their lady partners from the third-story front room above.
Every now and then an angelic creature, in a white gown
and abundant pink ribbons, came down this Jacob's ladder,
and fastening upon the arm of one of the sentinels, they
marched into the parlor with great state. Returning from
his toilet up stairs, Puffer Hopkins followed the general
current
,
and discovered a scene the solemnity whereof was
exceedingly
impressive and disheartening.
The walls of the parlor upon which he had entered were
lined all round with well-dressed ladies and gentlemen,
sitting
as erect as corpses, and gazing into the empty space in
the middle of the apartment, as if some curious
meteorological
phenomenon were going on there, in which they all had a
special interest. At the announcement of Puffer Hopkins by
a pale young gentleman at the door, the corpses waked up a
little, some twittered spasmodically, a few moved uneasily in
their chairs, and by the time Puffer had attained a seat in a
corner, the company had again subsided into its condition of
tomb-like repose.
They were presently, however, again wakenedand with
rather more successby the entrance of the host, Mr.
Fishblatt
himself, bearing before him firstly a huge ruffle, which
stood straight out from his bosom like a main-sail, and
secondly
,
reposing in the shadow of the said ruffle, a black
teaboard
of proportionate dimensions, garnished with small jugs
or tumblers of lemonade.
Mr. Fishblatt walked very erect and majestically, and
holding
the waiter at arm's lengthsmiling pleasantly, as a
gentleman
always does when he's engaged in a business he knows
himself to be altogether too good for, but which the crisis of
affairs requires him to look afterpresented it to the ladies
all around, beginning at the left hand as he was bound to
do and skipping ever so many thirsty gentlemen who
gloated on the small jugs: and then coming down toward the
right hand, as he was likewise bound, he allowed the thirsty
gentlemen to glean from the waiter the tumblers that
remained
.
It is not to be supposed that Mr. Halsey Fishblatt
all this time held his peace: on the contrary, the bearing of
the waiter was not a tithe of his toils, for he kept strenuously
urging wherever he went the propriety of taking a tumbler
the necessity of a draught of the lemonade to cool
themselves
,
and particularly soliciting and entreating the ladies
to make a paradise of his (Mr. Fishblatt's) parlors, by
enjoying
themselves with all their might and main.
The lemonade had scarcely vanished and the empty
tumblers
been gathered and borne out of sight, when it was
announcedto the discomforture and confusion of the
companythat the celebrated and distinguished
representative
of the Thirteenth Ward in the city Councils
Alderman Punchwind, by namewas in the house: having,
as it was understood, done Mr. Fishblatt the honor to call
in and partake of the agreeable hospitalities that were then
and there going forward. Mr. Fishblatt, at the thought of
so august a presence, recoiled a little, but recovering
speedily
,
a deputation was immediately sent out, consisting of
Puffer Hopkins and two young gentlemen who wore large
watch seals, and were rather ambitious of office and
employment
of this kind, to wait upon his eminence. In a
few minutes a heavy tread was heard upon the stair, a
commotion in the entry, and in stalked, in a
broad-brimmed
hat, a portly, capacious and solid gentleman, of such
dimensions as to resemble not a little a great school-globe,
stepped out of its brass ring, and taking a walk of
pleasure
:
in he marched, accompanied by his delegation, who
clung close to his skirts to watch the impression his
presence
might make on the commonalty assembled.
Puffer Hopkins had a glimmering reminiscence of a
broad-brimmed hat, very much like the Alderman's,
escaping
into a pantry at the end of the hall as he came in at the
beginning of the evening, worn by Crumpcould it be so?
Crump, the meek secretary who had been so brow-beaten
in the shower by Mr. Blinker. His brows overshadowed
by the huge hat, and his chin buried in a capacious collar,
Alderman Punchwind paused for a minute at the door,
glanced about slowly and with an air of solemn importance,
and then, without removing his hat or uttering a word,
stalked across the parlor, proceeded to fill a glass from the
side-board where relays of refreshment in liberal quantities
were arranged, and at this moment, deigning to turn around
and recognize the company, he intimated by a look that he
would drink
all
their good healths; which he did, very
emphatically absorbing his wine much as the Norwegian
Maelstrom might if it were a corporate Alderman and fed
at public charge. Having disposed of the wine, the
Alderman
next devoted his attention to the cake and other
eatables
,
of which great batches disappeared from time to
time; with a pause now and then, to allow him to vary
the entertainment with a friendly return, just to show he
had n't forgotten it, to the decanter; which proceedings were
watched with painful interest by Mr. Fishblatt's guestswho
were horrified at the miraculous disappearance of the
provision
for the party, and who looked upon the
performance
much as they would at the elephant at the menagerie,
feeding with a bale or two of hay, or the pagan anaconda
at the museum, lunching on a pair of fowls and a live
rabbit
,
without so much as a grace to the meal.
As soon as Alderman Punchwind had concluded his
corporate banquet by stripping the board of something more
than two-thirds of its contents, solid and liquid, he wiped
his lips, and marching steadily toward the centre of the
rooms, there planted himself by the side of a column and
looked abroad upon the company: fixing his eye, now
and then, with peculiar sternness on some young lady who
happened to be fairer than her neighbors.
After he had enjoyed this recreation for some time,
various
members of the company were brought up by
Mr. Fishblatt and introduced (by consent) to the
distinguished
functionary, who kept his ground manfully and
received them all with an air of bland and gracious
condecension
;
allowing each of them to take him by the hand
and to enjoy a few minutes contemplation of his very classic
and expressive features, and then pass off, making room for
others.
While this was proceeding, attention was drawn toward
the door by the entrance of a very uppish gentleman, of a
severe aspect, who carried himself with great state and
port, and cast his eyes disdainfully about, as if he held the
individuals of both sexes and all ages there assembled
supremely
cheap and of no account whatever in making up
any thing like an accurate scale of society.
This disdainful and evidently select personage was no
other than John Blinker, Esq., First Director and President
of the Phnix Fire Company below stairs, who, as soon
as he had heard there was a live Alderman in the room,
came forward extending his hand and smiling pleasantly,
quite anxious, it would seem, to conciliate the favor of a
mighty Alderman and Common Council-man. These
overtures
on the part of Mr. Blinker were received by the
Alderman
,
however, with an air of slight disdain, which caused
the President to cower and fall back a little until Mr.
Punchwind thought proper to relax his features, when the
President advanced again, and had the satisfaction at last,
and after many difficulties, of taking him by the hand.
Do I understand that the fire-limits of the city are to be
extended? asked Mr. Blinker, whose mind hovered about
the fiery principle of his calling like a moth about flame,
after waiting in vain for a communication from the
Alderman.
The question was asked, but not answered: for
Alderman
Punchwind, reclining his head a little toward his
questioner
,
allowed a smile to spread over his featuresas
much as to say, you don't know how important, how
critical
and how solemn a question you have put to meand
said not a word.
I think it would be an advantage to the city to have
them extended, sir. I hope I am not so unfortunate as to
differ in opinion with Alderman Punchwind! said Mr.
Blinker, meekly.
The Alderman only smiled againintimating thereby,
apparently, that there were state reasons why this anxious
interrogatory of the great President's could n't be answered,
just then.
At this moment, Puffer Hopkins, who had overheard the
questions of Mr. Blinker, and entertaining a becoming
reverence
for the distinguished individual before himfeeling,
too, perhaps, that a modicum of metropolitan information
from the very fountain head, on a subject in which he felt an
interest, from his frequent professional pilgrimages to
political
meetings, lectures, and other night-resorts, might be
serviceable
impelled
by some, or all of these considerations,
Puffer proceeded to ask, in a tone of profound respect,
Whether they were to have new windows in the public
lamps?
New lamp-windows, did you ask? retorted the
Alderman
,
as plainly as he could without the trouble of opening
his lips.
I did, sir, reiterated Puffer Hopkins, beginning to feel
rhetorically inclined, and so understanding the learned
gentleman, and knowing the interest felt in the answer, and
your ability to give us a clear and decisive reply, I put it to
you in this public mannerwhether we are to have new
glasses in the public lamps! A gust of wind in our streets
of a dark night is equal to an eclipse of the sun in broad
day, in their present dilapidated condition. The darkness
of Egypt overspreads this city, sir, at times; a Siberian
darkness, where bears and catamounts might dwell, perhaps,
if it were not for the city police and our vigilant
magistracy
.
The Alderman paused, and looked about him with a grave
and majestic air. He seemed reluctant to respond.
It's your duty, sir, said Mr. Fishblatt, coming in at this
crisis, standing directly in front of the Alderman, and
looking
him steadily in the face, to inform us of your views on
this all-important subject. The happiness of this community
is dependent on it, sir. There'll be an immense oversetting
of hacks, breakage of legs, and fracture of skulls, if things
remain in their present condition, I can tell you. This
metropolis
is as black now, sir, at night, as the bottom of an
ink-bottle, and people float about the streets at random, like
so many bugs on the surface of a dark pool. What's all
the crime of this great city owing to, sir? Some will say,
its intemperance, and a neglect of the public pumps.
Others
will say, its ignorance, and neglect of the public schools.
Some will tell you, it's because we've got too many
penitentiaries
and houses of refuge, and others will tell you,
it's because they're too few. Pumps, penitentiaries, and
public schools, can't explain it;it's your miserable public
lamps, sir! It's your knavish oil-men, and your rascally
glaziers, that are corrupting us every day and every night
more particularly at night. They're the origin of your
dissolute
sons, your profligate daughters, your sinful judges, and
your dishonest clerks. Nobody comes out at noon and
makes a beast of himself in the street. Keep the city
welllighted
,
and you keep it virtuous, sir. You should have a
lamp at the front of every tenement; and where the streets
are so narrow that the houses might catch from the wick,
you should have men moving up and down with great
lanterns
,
and keep all the thoroughfares and alleys in a glow.
You would n't have a murder once in a century, and as for
burglaries and larcenies, they'd be forgotten crimes, like the
Phnix, sir, and the Megalosaurius!
At the termination of this earnest appeal, the company
had gathered in a body about the person of the Alderman,
and stood waiting, with intense interest, for his answer.
Alderman Punchwind hereupon canvassed the assemblage
with great deliberation, and having finished, elevated the
fore-finger of his right hand, and passed it significantly down
his nose, dispatched a sagacious wink toward Mr. Blinker,
with his sinister eye, and mildly muttering Smoked beans,
departed.
Can it create surprise to know that the company there
assembled by invitation of Mr. Fishblatt, were astounded at
this strange and unseemly exit of the distinguished gentleman
from the Thirteenth Ward? that Mr. Fishblatt was horrified
and stricken with amaze? that Mr. Blinker was indignant?
that the delegation that had waited upon the Alderman felt
slightly humiliated and abashed at the conduct of their
superior
?
That Puffer Hopkins was profoundly penetrated
with a sense of the uncertainty of human affairsfor had
there not been here an individual occupying but a minute
before the very highest conceivable pinnaclethe very
Himalayah-top of human greatness attainable at a small
partyand had n't that individual, with most suicidal
rashness
,
pitched himself off headlong into the very centre
of a low, vulgar kitchen-garden, by an allusion to
fumigated
beans?
The entertainment was now, in truth, at an end; and
although
fragments of cake and fag-ends of decanters
generously
left by Alderman Punchwindwere from time to
time brought forward, the spirits of the party flagged. Mr.
Fishblatt hung his head; and when, at a few minutes of
midnight
,
the Insurance President disappeared, the party
gradually
broke up; two or three, at first, leaving at a time, and
then a shoal of half a dozen, and in less than an hour the
rooms were deserted.
Puffer Hopkins, who had gallantly assumed the charge of
a young lady, with a pair of piercing black eyes, who lived
in a remote suburb, with which Puffer was by no means
familiar, spent the remainder of the night, up to three o'clock,
in piloting the young lady homeward, and the balance, till
dawn, in discovering his way back again, through divers
crooks and crosses, through streets that ran at first directly
for half a mile into town, and then directly for half a mile
more out again; getting now and then into a road that had
no outlet, and then into one that had an outlet that led into
nothing.
The mysterious proceedings of Alderman Punchwind, it
should be stated, remain to this day unexplained. On
inquiry
,
a few days after the entertainment, Mr. Fishblatt was
assured, that on the night in question, Alderman Punchwind,
the authentic and accredited representative of the Thirteenth
Ward, was in his own room laboriously employed on a report
of fifty-three pages foolscap, on the subject of spiles and pier
heads, and had n't left it for a moment, except to step over the
way to his neighbor the timber-merchant, to get a few facts
to put in his report. It therefore only remained for rumor to
say that this was the apparition of the Alderman; which was
confirmed with the superstitious by Mr. Punchwind's being
carried off just seven days afterward by an apoplexy, at one
of the city suppers. Others thought it might have been all a
dream and delusion on the part of the company, who may
be reasonably supposed to have been at the time under the
influence of Mr. Fishblatt's good cheer: and others again
and certain mysterious smiles on the part of the
frouzy-haired
servant girl hinted as muchwould not be beaten from
the belief that it was Crump; Crump, the humble secretary
of the Phnix Fire Company, himself; who had adopted this
method, it was suggested, of enjoying one first-rate banquet,
which his own salary did n't admit of, and at the same time
of retaliating the severities of his superior; having the entire
pleasure of both amusements, the feast and the revenge,
to himself, which was very characteristic.
For ourselves, we rather incline to this last solution,
inasmuch
as the subject of Mr. Fishblatt's party was, from the
time of the starting of this hypothesis, a forbidden subject
thenceforth and forever in the office of the Phnix
Company
,
by express order of Mr. Blinker, who said it was
altogether
too frivolous to think of.
11
CHAPTER X.
HOBBLESHANK AT HIS LODGINGS.
The interest with which Mr. Fyler Close watched the
flight of Hobbleshank was by no means diminished, when
he discovered faring forth from behind a stable-door, where
he had lain in ambush, and keeping, at an easy distance,
diligently in the track of the wrathful old gentleman, no
other than Ishmael Small. Speeding along in a very
eccentric
route, sometimes on the pavement, again in the
middle of the road, and then, with one foot on the curb
and one in the gutter, Hobbleshank made his way through
the straitened purlieu of Pell street: Pell street that lies
just off of the great thoroughfare of the Bowery with a
world of its own, where great mackerel-venders' trumpets,
nearly as long as the street itself, are blown all day long,
where vegetable-waggons choke the way and keep up a
reek of greens and pot-herbs until high noon, and where, if
all the signs and omens that pervade the streetsights,
sounds and smellsare of any worth, the denizens lead a
retired life, with a lenten diet, ignorant of what the great
world beyond may think of beefless dinners or breakfasts
after Pythagoras.
Through this choice precinct they sped, Hobbleshank
pushing
swiftly on, and his pursuer following at a distance with
equal pace, darting in at entry doors and out again in a
glance, to avoid discovery, if the old man should look back;
and so they soon entered the mouth of Doyer streetthe
Corkscrew lanethrough which it needs skilful pilotage
to bear one safely, every house a turn, and every curb-stone
set at a different angle, for thus, like a many-jointed snake
Doyer street creeps out of the damp and green-grown
marsh of Pell street, upon the open sunny slope of
Chatham
Square.
Following the whim of the street, which must needs have
its way, they got forth into the broad region of the Square,
along which Hobbleshank speeded at a good round rate,
while Mr. Small regaled himself with an eleemosynary ride
on the foot-board of a hackney-coach, where he sat
comfortably
balanced and keeping the old man in view until
they reached Mulberry street, when he dismounted,just in
time to evade the crack of a whip from the box-seatand
followed Hobbleshank warily into a building some dozen
or two paces off of the main street. It was a dark, ruinous,
gloomy-looking old housebuilt on a model that was lost
twenty years ago and never found againand had a wide
greedy hall, that swallowed up as many chairs, tables and
other fixtures, as the various tenants chose to cast into it.
Up the broad rambling stairs Hobbleshank ascended,
and by the time he had attained a cramped room at
the head of the second flight, Mr. Small had accomplished
the same journey, crept along and clambered up a narrow
cornice in the throat of the hall, and gaining, by an exercise
of dexterity peculiar to himself, a small window in the wall,
was looking very calmly and reflectively through the same
at two aged women upon whose presence Hobbleshank had
entered.
One of them sate by the hearth: she was small and
shrivelled, with a pinched and wrinkled countenance; so
shrivelled and thin, and seemingly void of life-like qualities,
as if she hovered only on the borders of the world, and was
ready to go at any moment's summons. The other was stouter,
though she too was bowed with years and bore in her
features
traces of many past cares; which she seemed zealous
to make known by larding her discourse with great sighs,
which she heaved at the rate of twenty a minute, while she
bustled about the chamber and busied herself in various
household offices.
These scarcely noticed the entrance of Hobbleshank, who
opened the door gently, and stealing in proceeded to a
corner
of the room, where, taking a chair and turning his back
upon them, he bowed his head upon his hand and was
silent.
I tell youyou have been a blessed woman, Dorothy
that you have, cried the elder, in a sharp wiry voice from
the chimney-corner, where she was painfully employed in
rubbing her withered palms together over the blaze, a
blessed woman. There was my first born, Tom, with as
handsome a pair of blue eyes as mother ever looked at,
did n't he fall into the old Brewery well, and die there,
like a malt-rat, shouting for help, which came, of course, just
the minute after he was stifled. Always soalways so, I
tell you!
Whose roof was blown off in the great September gale
yours or mine, Aunt Gatty? I'd like to know that,
rejoined the other, heaving a sigh of course. Whose son
was buried in a trance for three days and better, and when
he comes to again has to be taught his alphabet all over
like a suckling child? Your lossLord preserve us!
was a drop in the bucket, so speaking, when the brewers
wound it upnothing more.
And the stout old lady laughed gently at the thought of
the brawny brewers tugging away at the rope for so lively
a hoist, and then fell straightway to sighing.
Why, you talk like a simpleton, answered the other
sharply, a natural simpleton in a dotage: there was a
child of mine, Dorothy, you mind it wellyou used to say
he had hawk's eyesso wild and bright and glancing.
That boy went mad, I think, and struck at meme, his
motherand that you know too, for many's the look you've
taken at the old scarme, who had watched his steps all
through infancy and childhood and boyhood, up to the very
manhood that gave him strength to strike: smote her down
to the earthwas it he or the fiend that did it?and
would have snatched her life away, but for the men who
beat him off like a dog? There was Joe, too, my dear,
continued aunt Gatty that went down of a dark
drearisome
night, in the wild Gulf Stream, crying Heaven's help!
in vain, and snatching at the waves, as old Buncle,
the ship-master, told me, like a madman. The old
woman shook as in a palsy, and waved her head painfully
to and fro, as she recited these passages of past trouble.
True, true, true, said her companion, who had paused
in her labor and watched her for a moment, true; just as
true as that Jacobmy Jacob, I used to call him,
but now he's anybody's or nobody'swas carried off to
prison by cruel men, ten times fiercer than your Gulf
Streams and your Tornadoeshad his limbs chained, and
was put to hewing great blocks of stone like a devil on
penancetaken away from good day wages and bound in
a jail
Peace! you foolish praters! exclaimed Hobbleshank,
starting up at this moment from the deep silence in which
he had been buried, turning toward them and lifting both
his arms tremblingly up, Peace! while I read you a page,
a black page, out of the book of lamentationsthat should
make the blood creep in your old veins like the brook-ripples
in December. There 's a quiet serene farm-housea quiet
serene farm-housewith a father, a mother, yes, merciful
God! a young, happy, beautiful mother. He paused and
bowed his head, but in a few minutes he proceeded, and
a young child that has just crept out upon the bleak
common
of this world of ours, lying in her bosom, as it might
be Adam and his spouse, in some chosen corner of their old
garden. Some devil or other secretly engulphs all the
fortune
of that household, tortures with a slow, killing pain,
the father of the family, by ever-lending to him and
ever-driving
him for horrid interestsmaking him toil and moil
in that great, inexorable mill of usury and borrowing: till
his brain turnshis old reason totters like a weak tower
that shakes in the wind:he flies from his home
wandering
to and fro, he knows not whitherstraying back to it
at times, after long lunatic absences; and one daythere 's
a word that should prick your foolish old hearts like a
sword's pointcoming suddenly back, he finds his fair
young wife deadyes dead!starved into a skeleton so
pale and ghastly that anatomists and men of death would
smile to look on itand the boythe boy that should have
gone with her, she loved him so, into the grave she had
traveled to through hunger, or have staid back to inherit
that roof that was his and cheer up this sad old heart that
is minesnatched away, secretly, nobody could tell how,
or when, or whitherand the very nurse that should have
tarried to keep company with death in that house of sorrow
was likewise fled; and I, an old, shattered, uncertain
poor creature, left alone in the midst of all this desolation
as if it became meand had only waited for me as its
rightful master and emperor. Well; God's blessing with
youand if you have seen greater trouble than that, you
have borne it merrily and are miracles of old women to have
lived through it to this day!
Saying this, the old man started up from his chair, and
staggering across the room, trembling in every limb,
he hurried into a small chamber at the end of the
apartment
and cast himself upon his couch. The two old
women, abashed by the passion and energy of the speaker,
were silent for a while and moved not a limb. They both
sate looking toward the door where Hobbleshank had
entered
,
as if they expected him, momently to emerge.
A sad tale; a sad tale, in truth, at length said the
younger. Was the boy never heard of?
Never, that I know, from that dark day to this, answered
the other, mumbling as she spake and shrinking back into the
chimney, as if what she recalled stood shrouded before her
in a deadly form; Search was not made for him, until
years after the mother's deaththe worms' banquet had
been set and cleared away many a daywhen the old man,
who had wandered away, as soon as the funeral was
over, the Lord knows whither, came back, and loitered
and lingered about his former residence, the old farm-house,
in the suburbs of the city, day after day, watching in
vain, hour by hour, for the forthcoming of some one who
could tell the history of what was past. The building is
closed and deserted, and has no historian but itself, or such
as would not tell, if they could, the fate of the lost child, or
the secret of his death, if dead he be.
And where is the nurse?
Absent; missing; drowned, or murdered, or dead in
due course of nature; nobody can tell. The house is
deserted
and gone to decay, and is said to belong to a
wretched miser, whose right came, somehow or other,
through the child's death. There's the whole story, and
this old man, who came to live with me so long agoeven
before you knew meand has never once spoken of it till
this night, is the only wreck of the troubles and cares and
crosses that howled about it, till they found entrance,
twenty years ago! Something has stirred him strangely,
or he would not have spoken this night.
Perhaps his mind is failing, said the other: for when
that 's ebbing away, it always uncovers what is at the
bottom
,
and brings to light things hidden in its depths for
years.
He may have seen some object associated with
old times that has touched him, answered aunt Gatty
visited, perhaps, the farm-house itself; or have chanced
upon some person connected with these terrible events.
It may be so. But let us to bed, my dear old friend,
and pray that the Spirit of Peace be in the old man's
slumbers
.
Amen! said her companion: and extinguishing their
light, and carefully drawing a curtain before the
chamber-window
where Hobbleshank lodged, that the morning beam
might not disturb his repose, they were soon sheltered in
the quiet and darkness of night that wrapped them all
about.
Ishmael Small, who had greedily watched them all
through, after stretching his blank features forward into
the gloom of the apartment to catch any further word that
might chance to fall, crept down from his post of
observation
and stole cautiously away.
CHAPTER XI.
MR. LEYCRAFT RAMBLES PLEASANTLY ABOUT.
By the time Ishmael Small had returned to the street,
darkness had set in, and was growing along all the
thoroughfares
into the wide-bodied mantle worn by so many
stragglers and evil-minded persons, and supposed to be a
commodious cloak for all sorts of villanies and
misdemeanors
.
As Ishmael came into the open way, his eye fell upon
a tall, gaunt figure, that kept before him, not altogether in a
straight line, but winding about through the crowd of
laborers
and 'prentices that began to set up Chatham street at
this hour, in a strong current; not halting at any time,
exactly
,
but pausing every now and then in its progress, and
glancing about into the faces of those it encountered. Mr.
Small observed that the tall figure occupied itself exclusively
in gazing into men's faces, and into none of these save such
as seemed to be in the early prime of life. The figure
would look about and contemplate a face in this way for a
moment, and then disengaging itself from the crowdas if
thwarted in its purposewould hurry forward, until it
plunged
again into another, and renewed the never-ending scrutiny.
On the traces of this personage, Ishmael hung, until they
reached Doyer street, and into this crooked by-way it
hastened
,
first casting a swift glance back upon the throng that
speeded by, and Ishmael Small followed.
The tall figure glided stealthily along, close up by the
house-walls, and peered in wherever he could at the
casements
,
coming at times to a dead pause, putting his face
against the window and looking long and painfully within,
as if he were bound to have an inventory of every article
in the apartment.
In this way he toiled through the street, until he had
reached its farthest extremity, where he crossed,
entered
a covered stable-way, and took up his station against
the wall, his eyes still gleaming restlessly about, and his
body bent forward into the partial darkness to catch sight
of any face that chanced to pass.
Evening, Emp'ror, said Ishmael Small, crossing over
at this juncture, and approaching himlifting his cap at the
same time with an air of profound respecttaking the
census, eh?
I wish I was, said the other, sternly, plucking his hat
over his brow, I'd have a chance then of learning whether
he lives among men yet.
You have the queerest fancy for faces I ever did see,
Mr. Leycraft said Ishmael, turning his own delightful
countenance comically up towards Leycraft's, the very
funniest taste for juvenile noses that was ever heard of.
Nothing 'll serve you but a first-swathe mug, about
twenty-three
year old, with a small black-berry mole under the left
eye. Is that it?
That describes the childthat was put foully out of the
way, answered Leycraft, so long ago, that it seems as if
all had passed in another world, and yet as fresh, by heaven!
as if it belonged to yesterday.
There 's a plenty of boys in this street, answered
Ishmael
,
and in the next, and the next to thatthat 'ud
answer
,
Emp'ror: you can have your pick, perhaps you won't
get the black-berry under the eye, but then you can get lots
of hair-lips, and boar-teeth; burnt faces and scald heads,
and what do you say to a lad with a portmantle on his
shoulders, like Ishmael Small, for example.
Do you think Fyler Close has any clue to the boy
dead or alive? asked Leycraft, paying no heed to the
suggestion
of Ishmael.
Lord! He know anything of the scape-grace,
exclaimed
Mr. Small, turning about so that the light of a
stable
lamp that hung above them should fall directly on his
blank visage, bless you, Mr. Leycraft, he 's ignorant as
the Mogulthe great grand Eastern Mogul, that takes tea
with the moon. He knows nothing, nor cares nothing!
Mr. Leycraft grasped the seat with both hands, and
bending
down, looked sternly into the countenance of his
companion
,
but discovering there nothing to the purpose, soon
returned to his former position, and standing almost bolt
upright, gazed straight forward, as if he would pierce the
utmost limits of the darkness with his glance.
I 'd give my soul if the boy were alive! he at length
exclaimed, with startling energy, reining in his breath as
he spake, and discharging each word with the force of a
missile; alive! Ragged though he might be, maimed,
blind, in prison, the commonest vagabond, or vilest felon
that stalks a prison-hall; yea, though he stood before me
now, and with his raised hand should strike me to the earth,
I 'd leap up to greet him, and would bid him welcome back
to God's light, readier than his mother's lips hailed his first
coming into life!
Why do 'nt you go to bed and sleep off this nonsense?
inquired Mr. Small; the youth 's abed somewhere or other,
I 'll warrant; if not in a four-poster, may be in a
church-yard
crib. Sleep 's the physic for your Excellency.
Curse it! I can't sleep, rejoined Leycraft, I have put
myself on board sloops and dirty coal-smacks, and toiled
away at the ropes till my palms were blistered; have let
myself to carry logs and great iron sticks of timber, by the
day, and yet, when night camenight, that 's nothing but
a hideous dream to men like meI 've laid down and shut
my eyes, and just as slumber began to come pleasantly upon
me, a hand, a small hand seemingly, but as strong as a
giant's
,
would be laid on my arm, would shake me, and
rousing
,
I beheld that accursed child's eyes looking steadily in
mine, broad awake and glittering, but not half so cheerful,
as broad day; and then shaking its head mournfully, for a
minute or two, it would move away, leaving me gasping
and struggling for breath, on the hard couch, like a
drowning
man. Blast my face, I 'm but a dead-alive, after all;
pleasant company this, every night, but a little too much
of it!
While Leycraft ejaculated this passage in an
under-breath
,
Mr. Small stood aside, and grinned cheerfully, as if
at an imaginary spectacle of a very pleasant nature, which
might be going on at a short distance before him; at one
minute he leaned forward with an ideal opera-glass at his
eye; then he clapped his hands gently, as if the sport were
well-conducted, and then he fell back, as against a
comfortable
support, and laughed, as if it were too much for him.
12
All this he did as if entirely unconscious of the
presence
of Mr. Leycraft or any one whatever.
Blast you! cried Leycraft, fixing his eye sharply
upon Ishmael, You don't make a mock of medo you,
young Radish-legs? eh!
Lord bless your Excellency! rejoined Mr. Small,
waking, as by surprise, from an agreeable reverie, You
can't seriously mean such a thing. I was thinking just
then of a cumbat I had seed once at the thea-ter,
betwixt
a fine speckled India tiger, and a little pock-marked
man in a military jacket. The brute-beast was too much
for him I guess, continued Ishmael smiling pleasantly
directly in Mr. Leycraft's face: the way he got the fangs,
first here and then there, now in the head, now in the
bosom, was very agreeable to a young operative surgeon
what was aside o' me in the pit, very agreeable I can
assure
you.
In God's name, Ishmael, said Leycraft, his mood
changing abruptly from that of extreme fierceness, to
one of earnest entreaty, Tell me what you know of
this matter! If the child be dead, let me go and gather
up his bones and give them decent burial at least!
Suppose the lad died where you think he did,
Emp'ror, said Ishmael, evading a direct answer, It
was a natural death, without drugs or doctors: that's a
comfort, I'm sure.
A natural death, do you call it! cried Leycraft,
the death of a pilfering weasel, or a foul mud-rat rather.
There's plenty of nature in great black woods, that swarm
with bats and hideous birds of darkness: where no step
comes but that of villains fled from city justice; and where
the earth is dank with slime and sluggish ooze. A cradle
and a calm pillow, with a face or two to look in upon
it when one dies, is rather nearer the mark!
And it's a very pleasant subject to talk of too, said
Ishmael. There's no place like a open stable-way
for an agreeable interview; unless it's in the jail entry.
`Mr. Leycraft's case is a very bad one,' says the keeper
with his twist in his mouth. `Not so bad, after all,'
says the keeper's man, knocking the bunch o' keys agin
his leg. `It was only a juvenile boy.'
Blast you again! exclaimed Leycraft, seizing
Ishmael
this time by the collar, and holding him in a hard
gripe, Do you mock me for journey-work I've done
for that old devil, pointing toward the lodgings of Mr.
Fyler Close, Do you tell me I may come to hang for
the job! There'll be three pairs on the tree, my brave
fellow, the day John Leycraft swings: Three ripe
villains
and you'll be the youngest, and that old chap who
begins to smell over-ripe, shall have the middle place,
out of respect to his talents!
Ishmael again protested that he was friendly, and that
he was only striving with his little wit, to help Mr.
Leycraft
realize a pleasant scene that he might one day
come to be a party to: to which explanation Mr. Leycraft
would, however, by no means hearken, but dragging
Ishmael forth by the collar into the street, he pushed
him from him with great vehemence, and while Mr.
Small reeled off laughing to himself as he staggered,
Leycraft turned his back upon him and hastened away.
At first he hurried forward, with his head down and his
hands clenched like one bound on a task that must be
performed; but presently, as he got into the throng of a
thoroughfare, another purpose seemed to enter his mind,
and raising his eyes suddenly he began to peer about like
one wakened from a dream. Then he watched every
face that passed him; sometimes singled one out from
all others, and followed it for a while until it crossed a
light, and then he fell back as if he had made a fatal
mistake; and then taking up another, and another, and
another, he renewed the pursuit, and again fell off into a
state of blank despair. At times, too, he would strike
from the crowd into by-streets, lone and deserted, where
no soul was to be seen, and walking here for awhile, cast
his thoughts back upon what had passedwould to God,
there were no such past time, he thoughtyears and years
ago.
I remember well, he said to himself, in one of these
pauses, how the old devil brought the work about:
`Leycraft,' said he, with a very pleasant and cheerful
smile on his countenance, `There's a sweet childit 's
young, quite young, that 's never been in that piece of
woodland,' pointing to the hemlocks to the north-west,
`in its life, near as it is. Now it 's quite a warm evening
and the wood will be much cooler than the close room; the
mother 's dying within there  she can't last above a
couple of hours  not beyond day-break at the best,
and I 'm quite curious, as she must go to Heaven, for
she 's a delightful woman as ever was made; I 'm quite
curious to see which 'll get there first, the mother
post-marked
by the doctors, or the young lad franked by the
night air. It 's a very curious little problem, is'nt it?'
I of course, fool, double-woven, three-ply ass that I was,
answered to his wish, and when night fell, having the
very sighs and moans of the poor dying lady in my ear,
bore the child away. An apoplexy the first step I had
taken would have been Heaven's blessing on the job.
At that moment a sick man was borne by in a curtained
litter; Leycraft heard a groan, as of severe suffering and
anguish
from within; and this goaded his restless and
uncomfortable
thoughts anew.
He, the generous, noble-hearted gentleman that he
is, allowed me a lodging in the garret as long as I chose,
said he, or rather recited to himself as he formed the
thought in his own mindI might as well have lodged
in the oven of eternal flame; the whole house cried out,
from peak to foundation, against the deed I had done.
The first nightgood Heaven, can I ever forget it?I
slept well for a few hours, the agony of doing the crime
had exhausted me; but when I awoke, it was from a
dreadful, dreary phantasm, made up of howling crowds in
pursuit, dark, chill woods, and a whole army, it seemed,
of innocent children, surrounding and pleading with me,
or cursing, I do'nt know which. Before mein a gloomy
corner of the garret I sawwhere the moonbeam fell
upon it through a rent in the roof and dressed it in
ghastly light, the very child I had slain. It stood like
a spectre, stiff, cold, threatening and rebuking me with
its snake's eyes and visage of church-yard marble. At
first I was smitten aghastbut soon the devil stirred
within me, and rushing from my bed I seized upon an
old revolutionary sword, one that had been dyed long
ago in a black Hessian's blood, and stood at the
bed-head
and
advancing upon the apparition, struck at it.
It moved not. I struck again and againit was still
dumb. In this way I wrestled with it, grasping my sword
fast with a death-hold, all night, at least till I fell down
where I had fought, like one in a swound. When morning
dawned, I turned my eyes fearfully toward the quarter of
my adversary, and then discovered that I had been battling
all night long with nothing but the picture of a little old
manin all seeming an ancestor of the murdered child;
and that I had pierced it at a hundred points. A hideous
nightGod, thanks be to him, sends few such to men!
Whenever his thoughts ceased to toil with visions like
these, he renewed his inquisition among the crowds through
which he was passing, or which he hurried on to meet.
In this way he struggled with himself or speeded forward
the better part of the night. Toward day, when one
might suppose he would have sought home and rest,
wriggling his way through lanes and crooked streets, that
plunged down into the heart of the city, he entered an
alley of ten-pin players, and casting aside his coat
without
a word, joined a grim-looking man who had amused
himself with tossing the balls, one over the other, against
flies upon the ceiling, till Leycraft came in. They rolled
away for hours; bowling at the pins as if they had been
men, and knocking six at least in head at each stroke.
CHAPTER XII.
A FURTHER ACQUAINTANCE WITH FOB, THE TAILOR.
It was in the peak of the Fork, even higher up than
Puffer Hopkins, that Fob the tailor lodged, and there
Puffer, ascending by ladder steps, one pleasant morning
about this time, found him nestling like a barn-swallow,
under the eaves, with his legs gathered under him, after
the immemorial fashion of the craft.
The room which was occupied by Fob, was scarcely
more than an angle in the roof: the ceiling was formed
by the slope of the house-top, and it was lighted by a
small dormer window which bulged out of the roof like
an eye, and, being the only dormer in the neighborhood,
stared boldly down into the yards and alleys adjacent.
It enjoyed the further privilege, from its great elevation,
of peering off beyond the river, into a pleasant country
prospect, in the suburbs of Williamsburgh, and furnished
many cheerful rural images to any one that looked forth.
Besides this paramount advantage of the dormer, there
was within the apartment, a pair of glass bottles on a
small mantel garnished with sprigs of asparagus stuck in
at the top; a chain of birds' eggs hung against the wall
over the shelf; an old fashioned clothes-press, very much
broken up and debilitated, at the foot of a dwarf truckle-bed:
parts of old spinning wheels, rusty stirrups and sur-cingles,
the back of a mouldy and moth-eaten saddle, and other
ancient trumpery in a corner, and suspended at the
window
,
overlooking a pot of plants, a cage with a
black-bird
in it, busily engaged in passing up and down from
a second-story perch to the ground-floor of his tenement.
Although Puffer had many times before visited the
lodgings of the little tailor, he had not failed, each time,
to express, by his manner at least, a degree of surprise
and bewilderment at the peculiar appointments and
furniture
of the apartment. To come up out of the noisy
and brawling street, where every thing was so harsh and
city-like, into a little region, where every thing was
quietly contrived to call up remote places, with the
thought of a life so different, so simple and pastoral,
compared with the dull tumult below, was like magic,
or playhouse jugglery; and such a feeling betrayed itself
in the countenance of Puffer Hopkins.
You wonder I doubt not, to see this black-bird here
don't you? said the tailor, detecting the question which
Puffer's looks had often asked before: What business
have I with a black-bird, unless I might fancy that I
could catch the cut of a parson's coat from the fashion
of his deep sable feathers. That blackbird, sir, is to me
and my opinions, what the best and portliest member of
Congress is to the mind of this metropolis. He has
come a great way out of the country, from the very fields
where I was born, and where my childhood frolicked,
to remind me of the happy hours I have passed, and the
sweet dreams I have dreamt, in the very meadows where
he and his brethren chattered on the dry branches of the
chestnut tree. He stands to me for those fields and all
those hours and occasions of the past. I am a fool for being
so easily purchased to pleasure: and so I am!
Puffer had indicated by the attentive ear and
glistening
eyes with which he had regarded his poor neighbor,
that, although a politician and crowd-hunter, he had yet
something in his heart that answered these conceits of the
fancy-stricken tailor.
This pot too, of worthless flowers, continued Fob,
my neighbors every morning and evening, see me water
them, and wonder how I can so waste my time. They
see in it nothing but a few coarse weeds in a cheap
earthen pot. I, and thank God for it, recognize in it
the great, green wood where summer and I haunted when
we were young, together. I hear in every breath that stirs
them, the rustling of the noon-day wind, as it spake to
me long ago, in a quiet nook of the old ancestral
woodside
;
and the pattering of the rain on their leaves renews
the sound of that ancient brook, whose voice was like a
prophet's, to cheer and encourage all that green region
in its growth. From its banks these flowers were plucked
and brought into this heart of humanity, to give me a
thought at times of the good childhood that was buried
by me long ago where they had their birth.
Puffer still listened and said not a word.
Oh how many delicious discoveries in the tall grass:
how many stealthy approaches; how many swayings in
perilous branches and mad antics in tree tops; how many
boisterous pursuits of the young bird and lucky arrests of
winged fugitives, resound and come back and repeat
themselves
in this speckled string of birds' eggs hanging against
the dingy wall!
As he spake, the large black eyes of the tailor grew
more lustrous, and still the more from the tears which
stole out and back again with the emotions that stirred him.
Fob had scarcely finished his earnest declamation, when
they heard creaking steps upon the stair, and in a minute
or two while they listened, the door was thrust open, and
a person of no little consequence, if his own countenance
was to be taken as a commentary on his pretensions,
came forward. He was a fine, sleek, well-fed gentleman, of
a good middle stature, apparelled as daintily and cleanly
as one could wish; and judging by his jet black hair
and whiskers which shone again with oil or some other
ointment; his shapely and well-cut coat which sat to his
back like a supplementary skin; his pantaloons so straight
and trim that the legs must needs move rectilinearly or
not at all; his hat with its smooth, glossy nap; his boots
quite as polished and serenely bright; and the massy
gold chain that stretched like an arc of promise over the
azure heaven of a deep blue vest: judging, we say, by
all these, this personage must have been the first
favorite
of all the guilds and craftsmen, whose business it is
to prepare a gentleman for a promenade.
Are those pants finished, Fob: I mean the superior,
with open fronts and patent straps? said the sleek visiter,
swelling as he spake and staring over the little tailor's
head very fiercely, as if he meditated boring a couple of
holes in the wall beyond with his glances. Curse it,
sir, my boy sate up in the ware-house 'till midnight,
expecting
you every moment. What do you think I'm
made of, he continued, dashing his elegant heel on the
floor, cast-iron or New Hampshire granite? Eh?
I worked, sir, answered Fob, looking up timidly into
the face of the sleek gentleman 'till my needle grew
so fine I could'nt see it: and by the time I had got down
the right leg, the moon was set; my candles all burnt
out, and I fell back on my lap-board, sir, and slept 'till
dawn, when I took up my last stitch with the rise of the
sun. You shall have them by three this afternoon, if
you'll be good enough to wait.
Rot your slow fingersdo you call that work?
pursued
the visiter. Get in a new supply of lights, and
keep it up all nightyour wages would bear it. Here am
I paying you at the extravagant rate of nine-pence an
hour for your labor, and you grumbledo you?
I do not, sir, said Fob meekly, I am satisfied,
perfectly
satisfied. I'm bound to make clothes for gentlemen,
and it pleases me to see gentlemen wear them, if they suit.
Do you know, Fob, that it's my private opinion,
continued the sleek visiter, my private opinion, if you
had fallen a corpse on that board and had never got up
againit would have done you great honor.
Fob assumed a puzzled look at this, as if he did'nt
exactly
fathom and comprehend how that could be.
I should like to know, resumed the well-apparelled
visiter, whether it is'nt as creditable to a man to lose
his life on a pair of patent-strapped, open-fronted
pantaloons
,
as in a ditch with a ball in his head, or a great
bagnet in his bellytell me that, will you? If some man,
you for instance, would only make a martyr of himself,
in getting up a new-fangled coat, or a vest extraordinary,
the craft of clothiers would make a saint of him:
overwork
yourself, Fob, and be found by a coroner's quest
stone-dead, with the pattern griped in your hand, and I'll
bury you at my own expense! 'Gad I willand that as
soon as you choose!
To this pleasant proposition Fob made no answer, but
smiled doubtfully and glanced up at his bird in the cage,
thinking perhaps he'd rather be black and idle, and in
prison like him, than a feeble-bodied tailor, working for
journeyman's wages, with a delightful circle of calling
acquaintance, like the gentleman there present, among
Broadway masters and down-town clothing merchants.
Never mind that now, said the master, you may
think of it. Don't fail to run down at three with the
pants on your arm: mark me now Fob, and he shook his
finger as he turned for the door. I've got a wedding coat
to give out to you, to be ready for Monday evening, so
there may be a little light Sunday work for you. You
need'nt put any button-holes in the coat-tails as you did
once before, if you please. The blunder did'nt take with
the fashionables, although it was quite original and fresh.
Down by three, or I cut you off from our shop!
With this solemn admonition and menace, the high and
mighty master-tailor from Broadway descended the narrow
steps with great caution, and getting once again into the
free and open street, and on a good level pavement,
launched out into some of his finest paces, at which he
was soon so well pleased as to begin smiling to himself,
and kept on in both recreations, smiling and launching out,
until he reached his shop-door, where he entered
majestically
in.
After the Broadway master had departed, Fob laid
aside his implements and the garment he was busy on,
and getting down from his lap-board walked to the
window
,
where he stood gazing earnestly out, beyond the
river, for several minutes.
I am sometimes surprised, he at length said,
returning
and taking a seat on the corner of his board, while a
little globule, that wonderfully resembled a tear, stood in
the corner of his eye, I am sometimes surprised, said
he, at the passionate fondness with which my mind
dwells on the country. But it has always been so. When
I was a mere child, and my father lived then in the city,
how I used to yearn after a sight of the green fields. I
watched the months as they waned away, with one hope,
13
and that was that August would soon be here and take
me with its holiday coach away to the dusty turnpike,
the long green lane, and the low roof of the Homestead.
At school I bent over my desk, and folding my hands
upon
my eyes to help the labor of fancy, would strive with
all my might to call up vividly some little scene or spot
that I loved or preferred to others. When the world was
rough with me, even at that early time, I would hie
away in thought to the side of a shady pool that I
knew of, and quench my thirst and drown my troubles in
waters, purer and more limpid, as it seemed to me, than
any other that ever flowed or bubbled up from the earth.
In explanation of the character of his poor neighbor,
Puffer afterwards learned, that the homestead of Fob's
ancestors, for poor and wretched as he now seemed, the
fanciful tailor once had ancestorsthe homestead which
Fob loved next after his own soul, every rood of which
was fairy ground to his memory, peopled with lovely
shapes, having power to stir the fountain of tears, every
nook and angle associated in his fancy with precious
hours long passed away; that this dear homestead had
been wrested out of the hands of its rightful heritors, and
was, by law and custom, a forbidden realm to him. In
spite of this, it was Fob's wont to visit it secretly every
year, at mid-summer, to wander silently about its familiar
fields and dusky woods, and returning when he had
gathered a store of pleasnat thoughts and fancies to last
him a twelvemonth, to bring back such memorials and
relicslike those that garnished his garretas would
suggest to his mind the kindliest recollections of his
favorite
haunts.
Among many images which perpetually come into
my mind associated with that old past time, resumed the
little tailor, after a pause, there is one more distinct,
more fixed and impressive than any other. I know not
why, nor do I know how it should occur to me so forcibly
now that you are here. There was a strange old man
who many years ago was a wanderer along the Scarsdale
roadthey said he had spent his school holidays some
where thereI marked him and loved him for thatand
whose wild actions were a constant theme at half the
country fire-sides. I saw him onceat midnight, or very
near that timeupon the shore of the Sound, where I had
been walking up and down, for I chanced to be a sorrower
myself: He had cast off his hat and stood facing the
water with his hair streaming wildly back, and his eyes
gleaming forth upon the wave, with all the splendor of
madness. He cried aloud as if in discourse with the
billows
.
`Has't any thing to lend to-day? I must have
moneydisgorge, or I shall starvemy wife is hungry
my boy cries for bread. Foam will not feed himnor
will these loud-sounding rebuffs of yours! Wave on
wavecent per centhow they jump, and frolic, and
climb each other at a compound pace. Oh what a ledger
of interest must there be on the other shore, when we
reach it. God's there, keeping count!Mark that.'
The Sound was in a stormy state; a ship was passing
that wrestled fiercely with the billows that tumbled
against her sides, and rushed in the way of her prow,
and kept her in a perplexing grasp, struggling in
vain to get free. The old man caught sight of this.
`Dash and howl, and drag her down, will you?'
he shouted, `That's the true death-grapple, and old ship
you must yield. See, she shivers against the rock and
down she pitches,' at this the vessel struck a bulging crag,
and was in a moment broken into a thousand fragments.
`Pull her in pieces, joint by joint, and make shreds of
her, as I do of thisyes, this cursed scroll that the old
engulphing miser gapes for in the city! Soso, thus!'
Saying this he snatched from his breast what seemed a
large square of parchment and tearing it into tatters,
scattered
it with the wind, along the beach!
What became of the fragmentswere they never
gathered? asked Puffer Hopkins.
They wereand by me, answered Fob.
And where are they now?
The Lord, that hath a record of all things lost, only
knows! he answered. I collected them, patched them
together, and after passing from hand to hand, without
much advantage to any, they were thrown into some old
trunk or garret, where doubtless, they are mouldering now
and in all human chances, passing through the same
process their once ownerthat poor, wild, sorrow-stricken
old man is undergoing in some alms-house burial ground!
Do you recollect nothing of the purport of this
recovered
paper? asked Puffer Hopkins.
Only this much, answered Fob, that it was a
conveyance of house and land, with the singular provision
that no transfer or sale of the property could be good and
sufficient while the child or son, I forget now his name,
was living. The names, the dates, much more the
boundaries
,
have all fled from my memory: but I shall
never forget the wild tones and eager looks of the old
creature that made the deed into fragments; whose voice
seemed to echo the Sea, and who borrowed from it the
method of his acts!
It suddenly entered the mind of Puffer Hopkins, whose
attention had been strongly fastened upon the narrative
of the little tailor, that the old man, that this sufferer,
of so long since, and who was supposed by Fob to lie in
his grave, might be none other than his kind and singular
companion whom he had followed from the Public Hall.
He was full of the thought and interchanging scarcely
another word with the tailor, he left the garret, pondering
on what he had heard, and striving to gather out of it
something that might bear on what seemed the distracted
fortunes of Hobbleshank.
CHAPTER XIII.
THE ECONOMY OF MR. FYLER CLOSE AND ISHMAEL SMALL.
Recovering
from the blow administered by Mr.
Leycraft, Ishmael promptly regained his legs, and
putting
them into active service, he moved down with good
speedthe night air was sharp and pinchingupon a
neighboring shop window, and knocking up his cap-front
employed a minute or two in gazing through the pane,
at what lay inside.
There's fine slices of liver in there, said Ishmael
to himself, and excellent chops; and all sorts of greens.
A pound or two of chops would be very nice, with carrots;
and so would a slab of liver. But I guess I'll take a small
porter-house steak, without the bone, for this time only!
He accordingly proceeded to invest a small sum in the
delicacy in question, skewered it, and concealing it in an
ingenious brown paper hood, bore it exultingly away.
Something to wet the fibres of course, he resumed,
as he approached a grocer's, something to drown the
young critters in: a pint of fresh cider from the Newark
keg; the very choicest squeezin's of a thousand pippins!
That'll do! This beverage was procured and, in a
borrowed
pitcher, was put in company with the steak; and
skipping along faster than ever, bounding nimbly over
any obstacle that crossed him, he was in a very few
minutes in the hall that passed the broker's door.
Lightly
as he stepped along, the ear of the old man was too
quick for him, and in answer to a summons from within,
he halted, placed his steak and pitcher privily on a
chair in the corner of the hall, and turning a baker's
measure that stood by over them, for a screen, entered.
The lodgings of Mr. Close, were, as Ishmael now
entered
them, if anything, more desolate than ever. There
was the dull bare floor, the naked walls, the great cold
chimney, breathing, instead of warmth and comfort, a
dreary chillness through the room; and the shivering
broker
seated by the hearth, as if he would coax himself
into a belief that a cheery fire was crackling upon it.
The only light the apartment was allowed, came in
through the open windows in the rear, and was
contributed
by the various candles and lamps of the neighborhood.
In this half-lighted gloom, Mr. Small entered, removed
his cap, and stood by the door. He was hailed at once,
but in a very feeble voice, by Mr. Close.
Don't stand there, Ishmaeltake a chair by the
hearth; it's much pleasanter than by the door. Ishmael
came forward and did so.
Don't you perceive a difference? said Mr. Close,
as soon as Ishmael was seated. Don't you think of the
many pleasant fires that have blazed on this very hearth,
and does'nt that make you feel cheerful?
Ishmael confessed that it was a comforting thought.
Yet pleasant as it is, pursued Mr. Fyler Close, as
this is a Thursday, I'd like to be out: out in the open
air, hurrying through the streets at my best pace. What
do you think of that?
To class-meeting, of course, suggested Ishmael, with
the faintest possible smile on his delightful features.
To be surebut my age and infirmities, Ishmael,
won't allow me, you know, answered Fyler, pleasantly,
to attend those delightful social and moral gatherings,
as I'd like to.
Certainly not, rejoined Mr. Small, grinning slightly.
Nor to be at Missionary Lectures, dropping in my little
mite for the heathen, continued Fyler, nor at the
Chapel, listening to the Native African giving an account
of the vices and wild beasts that beset the aboriginal
negro in that benighted country. What a loss to an
evangelical mind!
Dreadful, sir, answered Ishmael. And there's the
privilege of subscribing to a new cloak for the minister,
and helping make up a box of trowsers and clean linen
for the Tuscaroras!
Very true, Ishmaelvery true! I'm a melancholy
old fellow, doing nothing but sit here all day longwith
people coming in and begging me to take twenty per
cent interest, coaxing me with tears in their eyes, to ruin
'em: and when I have done it, coming back to break my
furnitur' up, like old crockeryjust to get me into
temper
,
and make me mar my christian deportment. That's
what I call ingratitude, Ishmael.
The very basest sort, sir, said Mr. Small, caught
in the wild state, caged, and marked on the peak of the
den, `This ere's the Monster!'
Providence is a wonderful thing, Ishmael, continued
Fyler Close.
Very much so! answered Mr. Small, lifting his
knavish grey eyes to a great spider on the wall, sitting in
the middle of his web, where the light of a bright lamp
shone from without, in waiting for a gold-spotted fly
caught by the legs in a mesh.
Now I suppose you followed old Hobbleshank
providentially
,
down to his deneh! Ishmael? said Fyler,
leering on Mr. Small. Ishmael replied in the affirmative.
And no doubt you happened to put your head through
the window and overhear what the old gentleman said.
He was'nt very noisy, I hope.
Not more than the Hen and Chickens in a storm!
answered Ishmael. Why sir, he made a speech that
'ud have done honor to a United States Senator: and the
two old women whimpered like a couple of water-spouts.
A delightful speech, sir, and all about that boy again.
Ha! ha!and did'nt he tell 'em how like a father I
had been to him; and how I advised him not to bother
his head about what was past and gone for goodand the
old women, had'nt they something to say too, Ishmael?
Not muchthe old story, answered Mr. Small, about
the old house, and the nurse, and all that sort o' thing.
All in the dark as much as ever? asked Fyler,
pulling
his whiskers with all his might, in order to throw an
expression of great suffering into his countenance.
I guess so; and old lunatic's wits are breaking under
him, and won't carry him through the winter. That's
better yet. Don't
you
think it is?
O no, by no means, responded Mr. Close. We
should always hope for the best. It would be a very
painful thinga very painful thing indeed, Ishmael, to
have the worthy old gentleman go mad, out of mere
ugliness and spite, because he can't find a boy that he
thinks he's the father of. Don't you see that?
Very melancholy indeed, said Ishmael, who began
to think remorsefully of the neglected cheer in the hall,
so much so that I don't feel equal to conversation on the
subject. Won't you be good enough to excuse me?
CertainlyI have too much respect for your feelings.
Go by all means, Ishmael, and the sooner you're abed,
reflecting
on the wilfulness of man and the mysterious ways
and goings-on of Providence, the better for you! Good
night; you'll be in bed at once I hope. Keep yourself
nice and warm, Ishmael.
I'll try sir, answered Mr. Small, artlessly, Altho'
it's a piercer out o' doors, and partly aside, What a
precious old man: a perfect martyr to his feelings.
The door was closed; the old man leaped up and
dancing about the room, running forward every now and
then to the window and staring into the open casements
that furnished the free light to his chamber, rubbed his
hands together with very glee.
Ishmael paused for a moment without, to look through
a private crevice in the wall and enjoy the spectacle;
then uncovered his steaks and pitcher, and taking
them in his hand, bore them up stairs, and entered the
apartment immediately over Mr. Close. This was
scarcely
more than a loft at the very top of the house; with
beams and rafters cutting it crosswise and lengthwise in
every direction; which beams were garnished with a great
number of suspended market-baskets; coils of ancient
iron hoops; great pieces of tarred cable; and here and
there, bunches of rusted keys of all possible sizes;some
perfect giants, suited for great warehouses, and others
scarcely large enough for ladies' writing-desks. The room,
poor and parti-furnished as it was, had an air of comfort
from the circumstance of the walls being lined on every
side, with coats, trowsers, vests, roundabouts, and cloaks,
hung upon pins about, in great abundance and variety:
and when Ishmael, stepping gently about the room,
gathered together from corners and hiding-places, fragments
of wood and shaving, heaped them in the chimney and
lighted a fire that blazed and crackled up the flue,
throwing
out a wavering flame into the gloom of the apartment,
it seemed as if the room swarmed with visiters, who
stood shrouded in their various apparel against the wall,
and only waited an invitation from Ishmael to come
forward
and make themselves merry over his fire.
When Ishmael saw how cheerily the fire sparkled
on the hearth, he could not hold from laughing
gently
,
and thinking of the old gentleman below stairs.
Then he took down from the wall, an old rusted
gridiron
,
planted it upon the coals, and spreading his steak
upon the bars, watched the process that followed with an
eager eye. In a few minutes it was finished to a turn, and
while a pleasant savor steamed up and filled the garret
with a grateful smell, Ishmael arrayed his cheer on a
blue plate on a little mantel or shelf that overhung the
hearth; placed a small loaf (a perquisite from the baker)
with a knife and fork at its side; and drawing a well
worn counting-house stool from a corner, vaulted upon it
with an easy leap, and first perching his heels upon a
round near the top, and placing the blue plate on his knee,
entered with steady glee upon the business before him.
The meal was dispatched, as all meals are that are
relished hugely; and when it was fairly at an end, Ishmael
jumped up, and standing for a minute on the very top of
the stool, and raising his hand above him, he brought
down from a beam a long clay pipe and a handful of well
dried tobacco; bent down and lighted it with a coal; and
balancing his seat upon its hind legs, fell back against the
wall, and watched the smoke complacently, as it was lost
among the rafters.
All this process seemed to operate with a kindly
influence
upon Mr. Small, and as, from time to time, he
removed the pipe from his lips, he discovered that he was
in a fine narrative humor, and having no one to talk to,
was driven, from the sheer necessity of the case, to talking
to himself.
That's not so bad, said Ishmael, glancing about at the
various distenanted garments that filled the room, four
pence a day for trowsers, and sixpence for the use o'
respectable
men's coats with skirts: all for honest voters
that goes to the polls in other people's clothes out o' respect
to their memory. Nick Finch 's a capital 'lectioneerer,
and dresses up his voters as pretty and natural as any man
ever did; but if Nick's friends only knew what dignified
gentlemen had wore their coats and trowsers before 'em,
they 'd carry their heads more like lords and commodores
than franchise citizens. Here's this nice suit of
crowblack
,
pursued Mr. Small, turning about and fixing his
eye upon the garments in question. There was 'nt a
nicer parson in the whole hundred and forty pulpits, than
that gentleman afore he took to private drinks, and began
to borry money of uncle Close on his gilt-edge prayer
books and great Bibles out o' the pulpit. He used to look
quite spruce and fine, I can tell you, when he first come
here; then his beard began to stubble out; then his boots
was foxy; and then he 'd come with his hat knocked in,
and his pockets full of small stones, which he tried to pass
off on the old 'un for change. When he got to that,
uncle Close had him took up by the police for a deranged
wagrant: and that was the last of you, old fellow!
Volunteer firemen is queer chaps! continued
Ishmael
,
casting his eyes upon a shaggy white overcoat
with enormous pearl buttons. Bully Simmons was one
of the primest: and 'ud play a whole orchestra on a
fire-trumpet
,
on the way to a one-story conflagration. But
fires was too much for himthey come on too thick and
shiny on wet nights! First, Bully lost his appetite, and
then he sold out all his red shirts; then he lost the use o'
his legs, and could 'nt travel a ladder, with a pipe in his
hand; and that made him part with his best figured hoists,
every one of'em; and, one night, Bully tried his voice agin
14
a norwester that was howling among the flames of a big
factory, and when he found himself beaten out, he stood
at the back of old forty and shed tears into an engin' bucket
like rain; stopped at the old gentleman's on his way
home and sold out his fire-hat, his belts, his boots, and that
great rough jacket, for a song; borrowed a coal-heaver's
shirt to go home in, and turned agin' engines for life!
Bully's a very moral man, they say, now, and takes in
the tracts by handfulls every time they come round, for
shavin' paper.
As Ishmael sate perched upon his stool, framing, in this
way, a memoir of each boot, vest, and overcoat, or
meditating
the course of the next day's business, a humble tap
was given at the door, the door solwly opened, and a
forlorn-looking personage, in a shabby hat, covered with
dust, as was also his whole person, from crown to boot, and
having under his arm a small parcel, came in.
Advancing
timidly, removing his hat and standing before Ishmael
while he looked piteously in his face, he accosted him.
Please, sir, said the stranger, is there no corner of
a bed a poor traveller might have! with a morsel to keep
down the famine of a long day's march?
To this appeal Mr. Small made no answer, but
reclining
against the wall, assumed to fall into a profound
slumber.
Do, for heaven's sake, hear me! continued the
stranger. Wake, and hear me! I have come from
burying an only child, in the country, and have neither
crust nor couch to keep off the cold and hunger this night.
Hallo! What's all this? cried Ishmael, feigning at
that moment to waken from his sleep. Who's here?
Thieves! Thieves! Do you mean to murder us in cold
blood?
The poor stranger stood shivering before him, with his
hat crushed in his hand.
There are no thieves here, said the stranger, as soon
as he could be heard. No man's life to be taken but
mine, from sheer lack of food!
Oh, you 're a beggar, are you? said Ishmael, rubbing
his eyes with his knuckles. Why did'nt you stop below,
at the old man's? He would have helped you, I'm quite
sure.
So he wouldso he would, sir, said the traveller,
but he's poor too; poorer than I. His health was
broken, he told me; he 's cut off from all his religious
comforts; and sits watching there, in that cold room, the
pleasure of Providence. He's a nice, a worthy old man;
that I judged by what he said. He referred me to you:
there was a benevolent young gentleman up stairs, he said,
that would do anything I asked.
He did, eh? And so you come to me, said Ishmael,
smiling mildly upon the stranger. Lodgin' in a garret,
and old clothes cem-e-tery; as if I had a scrap to spare.
You 're a wag: I know you are: but you should 'nt play
off your humor on poor lads that lives in the roof. Oh, no
it won't doand just, by way of apology for your
rudeness, be good enough to give my compliments to the
first watchmanyou know what watchmans are, I guess
you meet at the door. Tell him to lend you his
overcoat
he's
sure to do itborry his rattle for a cane; rattles
make first-rate walking-sticks, and waddle home as fast
as you can! Good night, turnip patch!
The poor stranger dropped his head, and, without
murmur
or answer, went away.
Mr. Small now felt that he was wrought to as
comfortable
a state, intellectually and physically, as was attainable
by such a gentleman as himself: and turned his eye
bedward
.
Casting his coat off, and dexterously jerking a
boot from either leg as he stood, into a remote corner, he
pulled down from their pegs, every one of them, all the
coats, vests and other garments in the apartment, into a
heap upon his truckle bed, and creeping under the same,
his knavish grey eyes, alone, peering out from under the
mass, he fell into a tranquil sleep.
CHAPTER XIV.
PUFFER HOPKINS ENCOUNTERS HOBBLESHANK AGAIN.
There could be no doubtapart from what had occured
to Mr. Smallthat a general election was close at hand;
and that the city was rapidly falling into a relapse of its
annual fever. The walls and stable-doors broke out all
over with great placards and huge blotches of declamation;
an erisypelas of liberty-temples and muscular fists clenched
upon hammers, appeared upon the forehead of the pumps;
the air swarmed as with forerunners of a plague, with
ominous flags streaked from end to end with a red and
white and spotted inflammation; journeyman patriots and
self-sacrificing office-seekers began to shout and vociferate
as in a delirium; in a word, unless the customary
blood-letting
incident to a charter contest afforded relief, the
patient was in a fair way of going stark mad, and losing
the humble share of sense with which it looks after its
washing and ironing, and provides for its butchers and
bakers' dues during the rest of the year. It could scarcely
be expected that Puffer Hopkins should escape the
general
endemic; on the contrary, it being his first season, the
symptoms were in him extremely violent, and furious.
From morning till night he sate at his desk like one
spell-bound
,
fabricating resolutions, preambles, and reports of
retiring committees, by the gross; or starting up every now
and then and stalking the room vehemently, and then
returning and committing the emphatic thoughts that had
occurred to him in his hurried travel, to the record
before
him; varying this employment with speeches
without
number, delivered in all possible attitudes to
imaginary
audiences of every temper, complexion and
constitution
.
Sometimes he had very distinctly before him, in his
mind's eye, an assemblage where the carting interest
prevailed
,
and where the reduction of
Corporation-cartmen's
wages, for instance, might be undergoing an
examination
.
Gentlemen, said Puffer, to the prospective audience,
Gentlemen, I put it to you whether twenty cents a load
will pay a cartman and a cartman's horse? Gentlemen,
I see a prospect before me for any man that undertakes to
work for such prices. In six month he is a pauper, his
children's paupers, his horse's a pauper, and what's better,
walks up and down the Avenue, where he's turned out
to die, like the apparition of a respectable dirtman's horse
that had been: meeting the Aldermen as they ride out in
their jaunts, and rebuking 'em to the face for their niggardly
parsimony. Has'nt a cartman, a dirt-cartman, rights,
I'd like to know? Has'nt he a soul; and why should
he submit to this inhuman system: why should the sweat
of the poor man's brow be wrung out to fertilize the soil
of the rich man's field? (Imaginary cheers, beginning
in a gentle G' up, and ending in an earthquake
hurrah!)
Then his audience consisted of a great number of
individuals
,
who from their being clad in nice broadcloth
coats, and always having their beards closely trimmed,
are supposed to be gentlemen and Christians.
Fellow citizens! cried Mr. Hopkins, We all see
what they're driving at; alluding to the other party,
of course; They're at work undermining the pillars of
society. That's what they would have! Not a man of
'em but would plant a keg of powder under every pulpit,
on Sunday morning, and blow all our respected clergy to
heeven in a twinkling. They're infidels and agrarians,
fellow-citizens, and when they'd done that, they'd let
the pews out for apple-stands, and fall straightway to
eating soup out of the contribution plates. If you don't
beat 'em at the next election, if you don't rouse
yourselves
in your strength and overwhelm these monsters and
Jacobins, I despair of my country. I despair of mankind;
and you'll have a herd of vipers saddled on you next
year for a corporation!
Abandoning this disagreeable region, Puffer relieved
himself by the fiction of a room full of stout, rosy,
comfortable
looking gentlemen, who groaned in spirit under
a great burthen of city charges, and whose constant
saying
it was, that they, figuratively only, were eaten up with
taxes.
The city aldermen, the common council of this
mighty metropolis, said Puffer, is nothing but a
corporation
of boa-constrictors; a board of greedy anacondas,
that swallow lot after lot, house upon house, of the
freeholders
,
as if they were so many brick-and-mortar
sandwiches
.
Commissioners of street-opening run the plough
through a man's sleeping-room of a morning before he's
out of bed; and clap a set of rollers under his dwelling
and tumble it into the river, as if it were so much old
lumber. Will you submit to this? Never! The spirits
of your forefathers protest against it; your posterity implore
you to snatch their bread, their very subsistence, from the
maw of these gigantic wolves in pacific apparel! The
little children in their cradle raise their hands and ask
you to save
them
from ruin!
It is impossible to conjecture to what regions of rhetoric
and simile-land the imagination of Puffer Hopkins might
have conveyed him, now that he was fairly on the wing;
for at this moment, and in the very midst of these pleasant
fables and suppositions, Puffer received by the hand of a
messenger, a notice from the chief or executive committee,
directing him to proceed forthwith to the house of Mr.
Nicholas Finch, an electioneering agent, and secure his
services. Now Puffer had heard of Nick Finch, as he was
familiarly entitled, before; believed him to be as
thorough-going
,
limber-tongued and supple-jointed fellow as
could be found in the county; and therefore relished not
a little the honor of effecting a negociation for his
distinguished
talent. Without delay he hurried forth; rousing
by the way the messenger, who being a fellow besotted
by drink and stupified with much political talk, in
tap-rooms
and elsewhere, had halted in one of the landings,
and there, retiring, penitentially, to a corner, had gone off
into a profound and melodious slumber. Performing this
agreeable duty, and lending the gentleman an arm to the
street, Puffer proceeded to the quarters where he
understood
Mr. Finch held his lair. He soon approached the
precinct, but not knowing it by number, he put the
question
to one of a group lads playing at toys against a
fence side. A dozen started up at once to answer.
Nick Finch!Nick Finch, sir,over here, sir,this
way, through the alley! And word having passed
along that a gentleman was in quest of Mr. Finch, Puffer
was telegraphed along from window to window, area to
area, until he was left at the foot of an alley, by an old
woman who had galloped at his side for several rods, who
shouted in his ear, Up there, sir, up there! and
hobbled away again. Left to himself, Puffer entered by
a gate, and making cautious progress along a boarded
lane, arrived in front of a row of common houses, to
which access was obtained by aid of outside steps fastened
against the buildings. Ascending the first that offered, he
rapped inquiringly at the door, was hailed from within by
a decisive voice, and marched in. The apartment he had
invaded was an oblong room, with a sanded floor, a desk
on a raised platform at the farthest extremity, a full length
George Washington in perfect white standing in one
corner, and a full length Hamilton, bronzed, in the
opposite
;
against the wall, and over a fire-place in which a
pile of wood was crackling and blazing, was fastened the
declaration of Independence, with all those interesting
specimens of hand-writing of the fifty-two signers, done
in lithograph; and across a single window that lighted the
room, where he had entered, was stretched a half
American
flag, cut athwart, directly through all the stars, and
suspended by a tape.
The owner of the voice, a short, thick-set man, with a
half-mown beard, a hard, firm countenance, and
apparelled
in a cart-frock, stood in the middle of the apartment,
and before him, ranged on a bench, sate a dozen or so
ill-dressed fellows, whose countenances were fixed
steadily
fixed on his.
Come in, sircome in, said the thick-set man.
Don't hesitatethese are only a few friends, that are
spending a little time with me: paying me a sociable
visit of a day or two, that's all. It occurred to Puffer
that if these fellows were actually visiters of the gentleman
in the cart-frock, that he had decidedly the most select
circle of acquaintance of any one he could mention.
I'm glad you 've come, sir, continued the
electioneerer
.
I've been expecting you some days.
Then you know me? said Puffer.
Of course I do, answered the other. Allow me to
introduce you to my friends. Gentlemen, (turning to the
line of ragged gentry on the bench) Puffer Hopkins, Esq.,
of the Opposition Committee. Rise, if you please, and
give him a bow!
The ragged gentry did as they were bid: and
straightway
sate down again, as if the unusual exertion of a
salutation had entirely exhausted them.
I am afraid I interrupt business, said Puffer. You
seemed engaged when I came in.
I was, answered the electioneer, and you entered
just in the nick of time to aid me. You must act as an
inspector of election; you have a good person, a clear
full voice, and will judge my voters tenderly. Take
this chair, if you please! Saying this, he at once
inducted
Puffer in a seat behind the desk on the raised
platform
,
placed before him a green box, and proceeded to
distribute among the gentlemen on the bench, a number
of small papers curiously folded, which they received
with a knowing smile.
Now, gentlemen, go up as I give the signal, said
Mr. Finch. Mr. Peter Foil, will you have the goodness
to deposite your ballot?
At this, one of the company who had found his way,
by some mysterious dispensation, into a faded suit of
blackit was the broken-down parson'sbut whose hair
was, nevertheless, uncombed, and his hat in very reduced
circumstances, shambled across the floor, and made a
show of inserting a vote in the green box before Puffer
Hopkins.
That will never do, sir, said the electioneerer rather
sternly, as he was crossing back again. You shuffled
up to the counter as if you were shoaling through the
market, according to your well-known habits, stealing
pigs' feet of the butchers to make broth of: and when you
attempted to give the inspector your ticket, any one could
have sworn you had been a fish-vender's secretary,
thrusting your hand in a basket to pull out a flounder or
a bunch of eels. Try it again.
Mr. Foil renewed the attempt: this time with greater
success.
That's better, said Mr. Finch, encouragingly,
worthier the respectable man whose clothes you 've got
on: more of the air of a civilized being. Now, Mr.
Runlet.
At this, a heavy built personage proceeded to perform
his duty as a franchise citizen; but in so cumbrous a gait
and with so weak an eye to the keeping and symmetry of
his part, as to call down a severe rebuke from Mr. Finch.
You pitch about, as if you were on your own ploughed
land at Croton, and not down here earning handsome
wages on the pavement for doing freeman's service.
You must walk more level, and not up and down like a
scart buffalo: carry your arms at your side, and don't
swing them akimbo, like a pair of crooked scythe-sneaths.
You'll do better with your dinner to steady you!
After Mr. Runlet, a third was summoned, who wore
the garments of the volunteer fireman; but was
condemned
as failing most lamentably in his swagger, and
missing to speak out of a corner of his mouth, as if he
carried a cigar in the other. After several trials, he
amended his performance, and succeeded at last in
bullying
the inspector with a grace, and getting his vote in by
sheer force of impudence.
Another was called, who, springing up with great
alacrity
,
endued, in a pair of stout corduroys, with a shirt of
red flannel, rolled back upon his arms over one of white:
a great brawny fellow, pitched about from one quarter of
the room to another, putting it into imaginary antagonists
with all his might; at one time, knocking one on the head
with his broad hand, then teasing another's shins with a
sideway motion of the leg, and discomfiting a third with a
recoil of a bony elbow; to the unqualified satisfaction and
delight of Mr. Finch and all lookers-on: and then retiring
to his seat, apparently exhausted and worn out with his
savage sport.
About half the company had been drilled and exercised
in this manner, when a door was suddenly thrown open at
the lower end of the apartment; a shrewish face thrust
in, and a shrill voice appertaining thereto called out that
dinner was ready, and had better be eaten while it was hot.
Puffer Hopkins caught sight of a table spread in a room
that was entered by a descending step or two: the voters
in rehearsal started to their feet, and cast longing eyes
towards
the paradise thus opened to their view; and before
Mr. Finch could give order one way or the other, they
had broken all bounds, and rushed down, like so many
harpies, on the banquet spread below.
If my eyes are not glandered, cried Mr. Finch, as
soon as they were gone, this is capital sport. Dang
me, Mr. Hopkins, if I would 'nt rather drive a tandem
through a china-shop, than manage these fellows. I 've
polished 'em a little, you see: but they're too thick on
the wall yet, they daub and plaster, and do 'nt hard-finish
up. You 'd like to have 'em for a day or two, would 'nt
you?
Puffer, descending from the inspector's seat, which he
had filled during the rehearsal, with all the gravity he
could command, and, complimenting Mr. Finch upon the
show of his men, admitted that he would; and that he
was there on that very business.
There is'nt a better troop in town, tho' I say it,
pursued
the agent, a little rough, but there's capital stuff
15
there. I don't flatter when I assert that Nick Finch gets
up finer and sturdier rioters than any man in town: only
look at that chap in the red shirthe 's a giant, a perfect
Nilghau with horns, in a crowd.
Puffer answered that he thought that proposition could
'nt be safely denied.
Perhaps my sailors, an't got the salt water roll
exactly
:
but they'll pass pretty well I reckon for East River
boatmen, and Hellgate pilots, and that's full as good; you
want twelve men for three days' work, in how many
wards?
The whole seventeen if you please: answered
Puffer. I'm afraid to try 'em in so many; continued
Mr. Finch. You might have 'em for five river wards,
and one out o' town: and the volunteer Fireman, (he's
first rate when he's warm'd with a toddy,) for any
number
.
Terms, twenty-five dollars per diem, as they say
in Congress.
It's a bargain, sirsaid Puffer, seizing the virtuous
gentleman by the hand. You'll bring them up yourself?
I willyou may depend on it: your'e a lucky man
the other side offered me twenty, and as much oats as my
horse could eat in a week; but it would'nt do.
With this understanding, Puffer left; the agent crying
after him to call in on Monday week, when they would
be finally broken inYou make a capital inspector; all
you want is age and silver spectacles to make you as
respectable
a rogue as ever sat behind a green box!
Breathing the word mum in an under tone, and
shaking his head in reproof at the hardihood of the agent
Puffer descended into the yard.
He had reached the ground, and was turning to leave
the place, when he discovered moving across the
extremity
of the yard and passing into a house many
degrees
poorer than the agent's, a figure bent with years;
he walked with a slow shuffling gait, and pausing often,
wrung his hands and looked keenly into the earth, as if
all his hopes lay buried there. Puffer knew not whether
to advance and greet the old man, as his heart prompted,
or to withdraw; when he raised his head as if he knew
the footstep that was near, and discovering Puffer
Hopkins
,
started from the dotage of his walk and manner,
hastened across the ground, and while his face brightened
at every pace he hailed him from the distance.
God bless you,God bless you, my boy! cried
Hobbleshank
.
Where have you tarried so long? You have
not forgotten the old man so soon, eh? If you knew how
often I had thought of you; you would have paid me but
fair interest on my thoughts to have called at the old
man's lodgings, and asked how the world, a very wilful
and wicked one, had gone with him? Am I right?
You areyou are, answered Puffer, who could not
fail to be touched by the kindly eagerness of the old man.
I have abused your goodness, and was repenting of my
folly but this morningI meant to call. You did!
said the old man quickly. Well never mind thatbut
come with me.
With this they entered a low building, the roof of
which was moss-grown, and hung over like a great
eyebrow
,
and the door sustained by a single hinge, stood ever
askew, allowing snow, tempest and hail to beat in and
keep a perpetual Lapland through the hall. Opening
the first door, they entered a square room, cold, bare and
desolate-looking, with no soul apparently present.
How is this? said Hobbleshank. I thought Peter
Hibbard dwelt here.
So he does! answered a broken voice from the
corner
of the apartment. Peter Hibbard's body lodges
here. Heaven save his soulthat may be wandering in
some other world.
Are you Peter Hibbard? asked Hobbleshank,
approaching
the bed-side where the speaker lay.
Peter Hibbard am I, he answered, as far as I can
know: though I sometimes think Peterone Peterdied
better than a score of years ago. When a man's soul is
killed and his heart frost-strickenthen he's dead, is'nt
he?
He should be! answered Hobbleshank. But
Heaven
is'nt always so kind. Sometimes the body's dead,
and the soul all alive, like a firedriving the poor
shattered
body to and fro, on thankless tasks and errands that
end in despair: that's worse.
There's no despair for me! pursued Peter, disclosing
a lean haggard face, and leering at Hobbleshank from
under the blanket. There's nothing troubles me; I've
got no soul.
Where's your wife Peter? asked the old man.
I've got none, answered the other. No wife, nor
child, nor grand-child, boy nor girl, nor uncle, aunt,
sister
,
brother or neighbor: I and these four walls keep
house here.
But where are your old friends? continued
Hobbleshank
.
Ah! my old friendsthere you areare you? oh,
ho! There was Phil Sherrodhe died in his bedof
an inflamed liver; Phil died finely, they say singing Old
Hundred. Don't believe it: he yielded the ghost choking
the parson with his bands. Parker Lent, at sea; Bill
Green, in jail for a stolen horse; it was St. John's pale
horse, they say; Charlotte Slocum, she married a Long
Island milkman and was drowned. There was another,
continued the bed-ridden man, rising in his couch and
pressing his hand upon his browand peering from under
it towards Hobbleshank and Puffer, another.
Yeswhat of her? asked Hobbleshank quickly.
What of her? he replied. Are you sure it was a
woman? Yes, by Heaven, it wasit was; a rosy
buxom girl, but never Peter Hibbard's wifewhy not?
With this question he fell back and lay with his eyes
wide open and glaring; but still and motionless as a
stone.
Why not? said the bed-ridden man waking
suddenly
from his trance of silence. Why should Sim Lettuce
win where I lost? That was a flaming carbuncle on Sim's
nose, and many's the laugh Hetty and I have had
thinking
of it; and yet she married him spite of it.
And Sim diedwhat then? asked Hobbleshank,
watching the countenance of him he questioned with
painful earnestness. What then, my good sir, what
then?
Let me seeSim died; the carbuncle struck in and
turned to a St. Anothony's fire, and carried him off: Hetty
turned nurse. Did you know that? Nurse to a lovely lady;
she died too one day. Hetty went offI followed her.
Yes, yes, you followed her, repeated Hobbleshank,
anxious to keep the wandering wits of the sick man to
the subject. Go on.
I followed herdid'nt I say so! On my honor,
red-nosed Sim's widow would not have me, eh! eh!
not she. Off she slipped, to keep a garden in an out
of the way place, I can tell you. Peter Hibbard watched
her many a year; but she never would be Mrs. Hibbard,
and here I lie this day, without a wife, or child; chick
nor grandchild, boy nor girl, nor uncle, aunt, sister,
brother or neighbor. We have a merry time, these four
walls and I.
It was in vain that Hobbleshank attempted again and
again and by various devices, to bring back his mind to a
narrative humor; he kept reciting the incidents of his
hopelessness and desolation, and after a while fell into a
wild jumble, where every thing pointless and trivial was
huddled together; and then he declined into a senseless
torpor, where he lay dumb to every speech and entreaty
of the old man.
Leaving him in this mood, Hobbleshank and Puffer
turned away from his bed-side, and sending in a neighbor
that had stood watching at the doorfor on such chance
aid the bed-ridden man trusted solely for lifeto
minister
to his wants, they escaped swiftly from the place. In
perfect silence they walked through street after street
together, until they reached a corner where their way
separated.
All is lostall is lost! said Hobbleshank grasping
Puffer Hopkins by the hand, as tears flowed into his eyes;
and parting without a further word, in gloom and silence,
each took his way.
CHAPTER XV.
PUFFER HOPKINS INQUIRES AFTER HOBBLESHANK.
All is lost, all is lost
! The piteous look and tone
with which the old man had uttered these words,
lingered in the ear of Puffer Hopkins, long after they had
parted, and came up in every interval of business and
labor, to fill the pause and excite in his mind a vague
wonder as to what they might refer. Some deep trouble
some profound grief, reaching through years, and
embracing
the whole hope of the old man's life they seemed
to point at. He resumed the pursuit in which the
messenger
had found him engaged, but every now and then,
there started out of the papers before him the woe-stricken
face of Hobbleshank and he heard his voice, repeating
again and again, that all was lost, lost. Wavering in this
way between idleness and toil, night drew on; a dark,
stormy and troubled night; winds howling about the
Fork, clamoring at the chamber-windows, where he lay,
as if demanding entrance; subsiding, springing up afresh,
and suggesting to the watcher, to whom the turmoil would
not allow sleep, thoughts of poor sailors far abroad,
sailing
on the wide ocean, reefing and gathering canvass, or
lying-to, for shelter's sake, in cold harbors, or drifting
along on the pitiless tide.
Perplexed by thought of storm and tempest, in the
midst of all which his mind had recurred to the subject of
yesterday, Puffer awoke, and after in vain endeavoring
to shake off the gloomy shadow of the old man, that still
haunted his chamber, he resolved to call at the lodgings
of Hobbleshank and seek there further confirmation of
the good or evil of his thoughts.
Making good speed for the fulfilment of this purpose,
he was soon apparelled and in the open air. The sky
was clear as if no cloud had ever crossed it; the house-tops
lay basking in the early sun; and the streets, half shadow,
half light, were filled with a throng of people come forth
to enjoy the tranquillity of the morning. The distance
was not great, and he found the place he sought at once,
and in a moment was directly at the entrance of the
chamber, where he knew by his description, Hobbleshank
lodged.
The door was ajar, and Puffer entered without notice.
On either side of the hearth the two old women were
seated, discoursing in a whisper. A night-taper flickered
in its socket on the shelf; the fire was smouldering and
expiring in its own ashes, and the sun-light, as it streamed
through the small window in the wall, showed the
features
of the two women, haggard, care-worn and anxious.
The elder was speaking as he came in.
Why do you say me nay, when I tell you it must have
tumbled in such a night; I'm not deaf, good woman,
though seventy and pastHeaven save us! Do you
think I did not hear the storm, howling and raging?
Your own eyes saw the chimney fall, and the same wind
that blows down chimney-stacks must overturn steeples
and church tops. Let me seeit was built before the
war, so it had lived to a good old age, and was cut down
not a minute before its time.
Why do you vex yourself with thinking in this way,
Aunt Gatty? asked the other, laying her hand gently
in her arm and looking her anxiously in the face. The
storm was heavy. God help our poor old friend that was
abroad in it; but the city still stands!
Be not too sure of that! answered the other. Have
a care! Are you quite clear that the fire-bell was not
ringing all through the night? I heard it in every pause
of the storm; and what is not blown over, you may be
sure was burned up.
Grant it so, said Dorothy. Grant as you say, that
the city was ravaged and torn from end to end by fire and
tempest, it was no fault of ours!
No fault of ours, do you say? cried Aunt Gatty,
turning suddenly about, and laughing hysterically in her
face. Then all that howling of winds meant nothing?
All the ships that went ashore or were dashed against
piers and wharves, did it in mere sport!Ha! ha!
Children that perished in the streets, or in dwellings
drearier than the open street, and beasts frozen in the
field, were all in a frolic?ha! ha! No, no, she
continued
,
dropping her voice to a fearful whisper, these
were judgments: come near to me and I'll tell you
how.
Dorothy, at this bidding drew close to her side, and
watched for what she said.
Where was the old man last night? she asked;
can you tell me that?
Heaven knows! echoed the other. It's morning,
and he has not come.
Did we go search for him?Did we waken neighbors,
and raise the cry that a good old man was perishing
somewhere
,
and hurry off in hunt for him? Did we ring bells
and alarm all sleepers through the townthat we do,
when even a worthless old building of boards is burning
why not for a dear old friend? No, nohe's dead, she
cried in a voice that pierced the ear to the quick. Dead
somewhere, and his blood is on our old idle heads! Dead!
dead!
With this she turned away, and, heeding no further
any speech that was addressed to her, sate in the corner
of the hearth, mumping, and muttering unintelligibly to
herself. At this moment Puffer Hopkins came forward,
and made inquiry for Hobbleshank.
Good Lord! you did not know then that the old man
has been absent all night long! she answered, sighing;
she knows it: she knows it too well!all night in the
rough weather: Heaven send that he has found shelter in
some shed, or under some poor roof, although it's not to be
hoped. Have you seen the old man of late? you are his
friend.
I am; and saw him but yesterday morning,
answered
Puffer. I expected, from what passed then, to find
him downcast, but safe at home at least.
Good angels help us all! cried Dorothy, fixing her
eyes upon the ceiling; was he calm when you left him,
or was he stirred with a passion?
Greatly moved, I must confess: cut to the very heart,
if I might judge by what fell from him, answered Puffer.
He was in despair, and left me weeping, hurrying
swiftly away!
I knew it would be so, exclaimed DorothyI
knew it would be so! Arouse, Aunt Gatty, arouse, she
continued, bending down to the ear of her companion,
and crying at the top of her voice. This gentleman has
seen Hobbleshank; and has seen him fly away from him
like one distracted!Do you hear me?
Did you say Joe was dead? answered Aunt Gatty,
gazing at the other like one in a dream. I thought such
a storm was too much for him! And she relapsed
again into silence, or mumbled in confused and broken
words.
Poor thing!she thinks of her Joe that was drowned
half a lifetime since: watching all night through, with
age and infirmity, have bewildered her brain. She thinks,
sorrowful creature, that St. Paul's steeple, too, fell in the
storm last night: nothing can drive it from her mind; and,
because a neighbor's chimney was overturned, and a few
tiles blown through the street, she will have it that the
storm has made a wreck of the city, leaving no stone
upon another!Poor thing!
Then you have no tidings of Hobbleshank, and
cannot
tell where he passed the night? asked Puffer.
None whatever. He left us, said Dorothy,
yesterday
,
a little after noon in cheerful spirits, for he had
learned, by a poor stranger that came in from the country,
something relating to his child that was lost many years
ago. He said that a few hours would bring him back a
happy man: it will be happiness enough for us, alas!
for this poor old woman, that has been his friend and
companion for fifteen years, if he come back alive!
Who was this poor stranger, that you speak of?
continued Puffer. Is he known to any one here? or did
he utter his news aloud?
The stranger, answered Dorothy, was stained
with travel, and bore with him a parcel, which he did not
open in our presence: Aunt Gatty thought it might be
some garment of the child's that was lost. They spake
apartthe stranger pointing often to the parcel under his
arm; something was said of a bed-ridden man, whom we
could not guess; and then they went forth together.
Since then the old man has not returned.
What noise was that? cried Aunt Gatty, starting up
at this moment, and looking up earnestly into the face of
Puffer Hopkins. A heavy wall has fallen; you heard
the bell jingle as it fell?it tolls for him!
For Heaven's sake give her comfort, said Dorothy,
appealing to Puffer, who stood aside, not knowing how to
answer this sudden question; tell her the city is not in
ruinsthat no church-steeple is cast down.
St. Paul's stands this morning, answered Puffer,
where it has stood many thousand mornings; the sun
shines upon its weathercock as high in air as ever. Would
that Hobbleshank could be found as securely as that!
Hobbleshank! echoed Aunt Gatty, I knew him in
his life-time: he was an excellent old man; and sorely
tried; let me see, where was he laid? In Trinity yard;
oh, no, that was too full. In the middle burying-ground.
He had no right there, poor man; he was not stout enough
to fill a grave. Ha! ha! I have it, it was in the old
brewery well, where Tom was drowned; they buried him
there, because he knew Tom, when the poor boy was
alive.
16
Does she indeed think her old friend to be dead?
asked Puffer, looking from one to the other.
She does, and its that that has unsettled her mind,
answered Dorothy: Her life seems to hang by some
strange link, an invisible thread, on that of the old man:
with him she seems to think the sun is blotted out and
all things fallen into decay, like herself. For her sake,
I would that Hobbleshank might return.
There was no mark, then, by which you could guess
his purpose, or the course he might take to bring it about?
said Puffer Hopkins; nothing by which you could judge,
further than it involved a thought of the lost childon
what his mind was fixed?
Did I say there was nothing more? I was wrong.
He wore with him when he left, he came back for it, a
woman's likeness, painted in a breast-pin; the pin was a
great square one, and the lady a mild lovely creature,
with gentle eyes. He took it from the closet, and fixed
it in his breast, where it had not been, in my knowledge,
ever before. His look softened when his eye fell on it;
and his step was slower, it seemed to me, and more
thoughtful, when he left, than it had been when he came
in. I thought the lady's face had touched his heart.
It's all darkness and shadow to me now, said Puffer,
pondering and fixing his eyes upon the ground,
darkness
,
with a single ray of light: you have told me all?
All! But do, I pray you, bring back the old man;
seek for him, as you would for your own father! Spare
no time, night or day to track his steps. There is some
deep trust rests upon himsome great wrong to be
avenged
.
If he die in the streets, with sealed lips; if his old
life should be taken by wicked handsand such may be
watching for himwho shall answer? Will you try,
will you seek him out? Promise me on your truth!
As the woman spake she raised both her hands, and
letting them fall, as in benediction, on the person of him
she addressed, she watched him silently for an answer.
I am but poor and helpless myself, answered
Puffer
,
with few friends and narrow means; I know not
what I can do, but, in God's name, I will do what I can;
what a friendless and fatherless young man may hope to
do.
For his sakefor her'sfor your own humanity's
sake, be true to what you would do! exclaimed Dorothy,
glancing from the helpless old creature at the hearth
toward
Puffer, who stood, glowing with his good resolution,
by the door.
She had uttered the entreaty; turned to the old woman,
who began to speak again; and, when she had turned
again, Puffer was gone.
CHAPTER XVI.
THE NOMINATING CONVENTION HATCH A CANDIDATE.
To
what purpose had Puffer Hopkins pledged his efforts
in tracing and recovering Hobbleshank? What clue
what single clue remained in his hand, now that he
reviewed
all that had fallen within his knowledge, relating
to the old man?
At one time it had occurred to him that light shone
through upon his fortunes, from the chance discourse of
the tailor: that hope was at an end, for, on a
re-questioning
,
he extracted no more than he knew already, and that
was nothing to the purpose.
Any hope that had arisen from the wish to enlist the
personal services of his poor neighbor in a further search,
was idle; for Fob, from overwork, feebleness of body, and,
as it seemed to Puffer, some secret care that was preying
upon him, was failing every day. To be sure, Fob dwelt upon
the incident he had first recited the same as ever; spoke
of the look and voice of the old man; his wild talk with
the billows and breakers; and his final act in rending the
parchment in pieces. Of what avail was this? It might
be a mere fantasya useless humor of both, that this man
was Hobbleshankthis paper, the bond and tenure by
which he held or relinquished his rights. Then Fob
would pass from this topic to talk of the old subjects,
the country, the wood, the field; dwelling upon them with
more enthusiasm than ever, and pausing, at times, to
bedew their memory with a tear. While his strength
lasted, the little tailor performed his daily tasks
manfully
,
murmuring not once, repining not at all, save over
the remembrance of his country life.
Any hope, therefore, built by Puffer on the services of
Fob dwindled day by day. To what purpose, then, had
Puffer Hopkins proffered aid in tracing and
recovering
Hobbleshank? To none whatever! Feeling this,
and admitting to himself how completely darkness
hedged him in on every side, he determinedas most
people do in such emergenciesto let the world take its
course, but at the same time was ready to seize promptly
on the first opportunity that offeredand, to do him
justice
,
fervently hoping it might be near at handto
execute his trust. In the meantime, and while the
fortunes
of Hobbleshank were so full of shifting currents that
hurried onward or eddies that tarried and were lost in
themselves, the tide of public life rushed on, swelling
steadily. Puffer had learned by this time that pausing is
to a politician, ruin; and so kept himself abroad in the
stream. He was now known as an active and zealous
partisan: was regarded as a promising and rising young
man; and somehow or other had found himself, by some
secret agency, which he could not guess, (it was the kind
old man toiling for him in silence) pushed forward
steadily
,
and appointed to offices of confidence and trust, as
they arose in the due progress of his career. A
convention
to nominate a Mayor for the city of New York, was
soon to be held and assembled at Fogfire Hall: a
delegate
to this he was likewise appointed. Prompt in
the performance of all his duties of this nature, Puffer only
waited for the evening of its gathering to make his way to
the Hall. The night was somewhat stormy, and the
streets were muffled and shrouded in mist; but this did
not prevent its being quite apparent that something more
than usual was a-foot at Fogfire Hall.
Brighter lights streamed through the tap-room windows
as he approached; a din of voices was heard issuing forth
and silencing the turmoil of the street, whenever the door
opened; and quick feet hurried in and out, and kept up a
constant commotion at the door. The tap-roomat all
times a resort of gossips and talkersswarmed with
politicians
and quid-nuncs, some of whom were gathered in
knots, from which a gusty voice would spring up every
now and then above all others, and then subside again;
some walking the room in couples, arm-in-arm at a
hurried
pace; some lounging about easily, with sticks in
their hands, from group to group; and others dropping off
from the knots of loud talkers, would saunter to the bar,
and arraying themselves in front of a long round polea
liberty-pole shaved down and shod at either end with
brassreplenished the thirsty spirit without stint. The air
of the place was close and odorous, and every man's face
was flushed and wore a burnt and heated look, as if the
tap-room lay directly in the fiery zone. Through this
torrid region Puffer passed, recognizing a friend or two by
the way, and pausing for a grasp; and emerging at a side
door upon the hall, ascended a flight of stairs and was
presently in the committee-room.
The delegates, there assembled in great numbers, stood
about the floor, talking in groups and growing red and
excited, as they plunged, by degrees, deeper and deeper
into the topics of discourse. In a few minutes, when the
room was quite full and the hubbub at its height, a pale
man in whiskers stood up at the other end of the
apartment
,
holding his hat in one hand and knocking with the
knuckles of the other, with great vehemence, on a table
at his side. This sound caused a sudden silence, and the
members wheeling about in a body, contemplated any
further movement on the part of the pale man in whiskers,
with great interest; which united gaze, the pale man met
with another quite as bold and decided, and, drawing a
deep breath, he nominated, in a loud voice, Mr.
Epaminondas
Cobb, as chairman of the committee; which
was unanimously acceded to; then a couple of secretaries
then a door-keeper; all of whom with due ceremony
assumed their respective stations, and the committee was
organized and in session.
Then Mr. Epaminondas Cobbwho was a short,
brick-complexioned
gentleman, with dim eyes, and a pair of
stout silver spectacles astride a dignified, but by no means
massive nosestood up and asked them if it was their
further pleasure to proceed to the nomination of a Mayor
for the city and county of New-York? To which question
no response being given, it was concluded, (the chief
wisdom of public bodies in such cases lying in the
observance
of a profound silence) it was; and they accordingly
entered at once upon the exciting and engrossing business
of nomination.
Candidates were forthwith put in nomination by
members
,
with great rapidity; some were merely named;
others proclaimed and sustained, and advocated at length,
in formal harangues. There was one committee-man, a
little, shrunken, dried-up gentleman, who was up and down
every five minutes, with a speech in advocacy of the
extraordinary
and unquestionable claims of Thomas Cutbill,
butcher: the said Thomas Cutbill being the great man
of his neighborhoodthe good Samaritan of his ward;
and furthermore, a luminous expounder, to the delight of
the little committee-man and a knot of cronies, of
profound
political doctrine at a familiar bar or
coffee-room
,
where Mr. Cutbill condescended to be present of a
Wednesday night and take a hand in backgammon or
other intricate games, there going forward.
I knows Thomas Cutbill, said his champion, and
his claims is decided; pig lead is 'nt surer. A
benevolenter
gentleman, and a more popular one was never
known. To Mr. Cutbill the people was indebted for the
new fish-market; and asking who it was that invented
the mode of ringing alarms by districts, he'd beg leave of
the committee to say, Cutbill was the man! Cutbill had
been vilifiedbut there never was a nicer man to the
poor, a more lovely friend of the pauper than that
aggravated
individual. He was proud of Mr. Cutbill. Mr.
Cutbill should have his vote!
When the little champion had uttered this vindication
something like half-a-dozen timesa very mild
gentleman
remarked, that what the gentleman opposite had
said was true enough; Mr. Cutbill
was
a very
benevolent
and worthy individual, for he had to his knowledge,
on several occasions arrested lads, ragged and unclean
lads in the street, and advised themin good faith advised
them, laying his hand kindly upon their headsto go
home and wash their faces, and put on clean clothes!
What had the gentlemen of the committee to say to that?
On another occasion he had known Mr. Cutbill lift a
poor woman out of the gutter, take her by the arm and
lead her directly into a respectable neighboring house,
seat her on a sofa in the front parlor, and call out, with a
vehemence worthy of himself and the charitable object
he had in view, for a jug of hot negus immediately, and,
if that could'nt be had, for half a dozen Seville oranges,
for the poor lady. Was'nt that man worthy of their
suffrages
,
he
would like to know?
Just as this speaker was concluding, there entered the
committee-room in great state, a gentleman enveloped in
a long brown over-coat, buttoned to the chin; an ample
bandanna muffling his lower features and his head carried
erect. He entered in a straight line, aimed for a blank
corner
of the room, looking about as if surprised that the
committee
could be in session and he not thereattaining
which, he cast off his over-coat, unmuffled his chin,
and rising at once bolt-upright in his place, proceeded
to deliver himself of his sentiments, first taking his hat
by either rim and fixing it on more firmly than ever.
A single case was nothing this way or that, said the
new comer. Did Mr. Cutbill make it a habit, he would
like to know, to send ragged boys home for clean clothes?
Did he go about encouraging them to dismiss their broken
garments?that was the point. Was or was not Mr.
Cutbill privately associated, in interest, in some clothing
or ready-made linen establishment? Was Mr. Cutbill a
tall man or a short man? Did he wear red vestings or
white? Was he lean-featured or rubicund? He would
not vote for any man as candidate for the mayoralty of
this great city until he knew his person, his principles,
his private habits to a hairto an inch! He might as
well tell the committee, at once, that he had his eye on a
gentleman that would make the very candidate they
wanted. On reflection, the gentleman alluded to had
differed from the community in some slight particulars:
he was a man in years, of a very venerable appearance,
but somehow or other had fancied that all his
grand-children
were vinegar-cruets, and tried to unstoppel them by
screwing their heads off. This had occasioned his going
into the country for a time, and this would, perhaps,
prevent
his running at the approaching election.
Opposite this speaker sate a thin, thoughtful
gentleman
,
rather grotesquely habited in a red vest, which
wrapped him round like a great Mohawk blanket, who
watched what fell from him, touching the eccentric
candidate
,
with extraordinary interest.
The other was no sooner seated, than this individual
started to his feet, and stared wildly about.
The man he desired to see presiding over the destinies
of this vast metropolis, was the very one that Mr.
Fishblatt
had just mentioned; but he could'nt be had! Who
then should it be? Not the Cham of Tartary, he was
quite sure: not the Imaum of Muscat, nor the King of the
Pelew Islands. He must be honest; honest by all means.
He must be in favor of the largest libertyboundless
liberty, he might say; also opposed to all private rights.
He wanted a man in favor of all colorsof no color
himself
.
In a word, he must be opposed entirely to the present
condition of things: but what condition of things he must
be in favor of he (the speaker) would'nt at present
undertake
to decide. This is no musical forest, concluded the
gifted declaimer, reiterating sentiments he had expressed
many times before, but more particularly to our knowledge
on Puffer's introduction to the Bottom Club. This is no
musical
forest, no Hindoo hunter's hut, got up for effect at the
amphi-theatre. We have'nt trees here alive with real
birds!the branches laden with living monkies!the
fountains visited by long-legged flamingoes!the
greensward
covered with gazelles, grazing and sporting! Oh!
nowe are a mere caucus of plain citizens in our
every-day
dresses, sitting in this small room on rough benches,
to re-organize society by giving it a new mayor worthy of
ourselves! And thereupon the illustrious chairman of
the Bottom Club sate down.
At the conclusion of this powerful and majestic effort,
the committee might have laughed, had they not reflected
that the speaker controled a couple of hundred votes or so
the disciples and dependents of the Bottom Cluband
they, therefore, on the contrary, looked extremely grave
and respectful.
Candidates now began to be proclaimed by the score;
sometimes they were let slipone by one in quick
successionthen half a dozen propounders would rise
and discharge their names among the committee in a
body. The chairman was constantly up shouting order;
and whenever a pause occurred some member or other
would spring to his legs, and call their attention to the
undoubted claims, the unsurpassed, unequalled, and
unrivalled
services of the Smith or Brown whom he
happened
to advocate.
At length, after a great number of ballotings, and a
great variety of fortune, the contest was narrowed to two
candidates; upon these the divided members of the
Convention pitched their whole strength and stripping
themselves to a final rencontre, they respectively entered
upon the public and private history of the gentlemen in
question, with a minuteness and eagerness of biographical
ardor quite astonishing.
One of these was Mr. Bluff, a wholesale grocer; the other,
Gallipot, a retail painter. Mr. Bluff was a stout, comely
gentleman; Gallipot thin and livid, as became his trade;
Mr. Bluff leaned toward the elegant and ornate in dress;
Gallipot, to the vernacular and home-spun. Mr.
Egbert
Bluff exercised his wholesale ingenuity, in
disposing
of pipes, puncheons, casks and merchandize in
gross; while the revenues of Gallipot accrued from the
embellishment, by retail, of the houses of the
middle-class
,
the adornment of tradesmen's boards, and the
displays
of professional literature on attorney's signs. Mr.
Bluff, the master of every elegant accomplishment, from
the delicate swaying of a cane, up to the cock of a hat
and the proper wearing of a rufflebelonged to the Ionian
order of candidates; Gallipot, rough in dress, blunt of
speech, rude of grasp, was of the sterner Doric.
The two candidates, so contrasted, stood palpably
before
the mind's eye of the committee; and it was their
present and immediate duty to determine, not the
separate
value of each of their qualities in itself; but their
aggregate influence in either candidate on the community
and their value when translated in good current votes.
How many streets? how many blocks, squares, wards,
could they respectively command? All they had done,
through many years of struggle and endeavor in their
various callings, for they were both men in middle life,
was now to be nicely weighed against ballots, little
talismanic
papersthe secret prescriptions of the public acting
as the physician; the whole life of each to be tallied
off against so many of these mystic counters.
As for Mr. Bluff, said Mr. Fishblatt, who was always
the first to deliver his views on the topic before the
committee
,
I beg to know, whether it is true, as I am informed,
he is the gentleman that wears a lepine watch with five
jewels? Before receiving an answer to this, I would
inquire, whether Mr. Bluff keeps a carriage, with a black
footman in a silver-buckled hat and white cambric pocket
handkerchief? Also, could any member of the committee
instruct him whether Mr. Bluff's pew was lined with red
damask and fastened with copper tacks, rotten-stoned
17
every Saturday morning by one of his servants, privily
admitted to the church? Mr. Bluff might dress his children
in scalloped collars and laced pantalettesthe children
of a public man did not always belong to the public (
although
he sometimes made it a present of them when he
died) but what business had Mr. Bluff to put two stone dogs
on his stoop? If they had been lions, he (Mr. Fishblatt)
might have forgiven him; two great roaring
open-mouthed
lions; even a pair of elephants. These were
noble animals. But dogs! Had any gentleman of the
committee kept a diary of Mr. Bluff's doings for the past
fifteen years? Was any one prepared to say what had
been his private and personal habits, during that time?
If not, the committee were entering upon a most solemn
and important business, with very imperfect materials in
their hands. He had heard that there had been a lurking
committee of five or more to institute a watch upon Mr.
Bluff; to have an eye upon all he did and said from the first
moment he was contemplated as a candidate. Where was
that committee? They had followed him, Mr. Bluff, he
had been informed in confidence, for more than two
weeks; knew all his opinions as expressed in various
places of public and private resort. Mr. Fishblatt would
like to see their minutes. He had been told that Mr.
Bluff had been measured in all the past fortnight, for two
new coats, and a new double vest of black velvet. What
was the meaning of this?
Mr. Fishblatt had spoken in his hat, which he insisted
on, in despite the remonstrance of the brick-complexioned
chairman, as being more formidable, and more according
to strict congressional method, when at this juncture,
occasioned
by the loud and peremptory character of his
oratory
,
or from some other adequate cause, a brass trumpet
fixed against the ceiling was dislodged, and striking
Mr. Fishblatt on the crown, buried him to the eyes.
Before
he could fairly emerge from this sudden midnight and
renew his appeal, another speaker had possession of the
floor.
He had satisfied himself, this was a gentleman of a
very nice and accurate turn of mindof the exact
number
of three-story brick tenements in the city and county
of New York. He would'nt say how many there were,
because
he knew, and that was enough. Every brick
tenement
had its own voterssay three to each: very good.
Around these were scattered a great many low-roofed
wooden buildings. Three-stories was always
commanding
:
every three-storythat was his viewwould carry
three frame-houses with it to the polls. There was a
calculation
,
and if Mr. Bluff was'nt the man, he had no
more to say!
And so this calculating prodigy sate down.
Will the committee be cautious, followed a
dark-looking
member, with a low forehead, from which a shock
of jet black hair bristled and stood straight up, and a very
harsh voice, will they look out what they're at?
Gallipot's
a painter: there's no objection to that. He's a
working-man
,
and rolls back his sleeves when he's on a job.
He has a right. Peleg Gallipot's a popular man
who says he is'nt? What's the matter then! I know
what's the matterGallipot, this Peleg Gallipot afore the
committee, had lately painted a Presbyterian church!
There was a snag: get over it if you can!
To tell the truth, this was a snag; the friends of
Gallipot
felt that it was, and, for a time, the Bluffites had it all
their own way. Here were the religious prejudices of the
community, by a single act of the unfortunate Gallipot,
arrayed in deadly hostility against him: all the other
sects would go against him to a man. Gallipot had, in
some unhappy moment of professional hallucination,
painted a Presbyterian church. In this state of affairs the
question was about to be put.
Hold a minute, my excellent friends, said the very
mild gentleman who had spoken once before. Mr.
Gallipot
wishes to get upon his legs, and I hope you will
allow him a chance. They need have no fearsthey
might put their minds at rest at once about a religious
antipathy
to Mr. Gallipot. It was true, and he felt it his
duty to confess it, Mr. G. had painted a
Presbyterian
church a short time ago: it was also true, and he felt
great pleasure in being able to make the statement, Mr.
G. was now, also, under contract to paint an
Episcopal
church, also a Quaker meeting-house, also a
Unitarian
chapel. There was an antidote; and, now, the
sooner they went into an election, the better he and
other friends of the poor man's candidate (as he would
venture to call his worthy friend) would like it!
Notwithstanding another last desperate attempt on the
part of Mr. Cutbill's champion to press the claims of that
philanthropist on their attention, they did go into an
election, and Gallipot was the man. The announcement
of this result was hailed by the friends of Gallipot in the
committee, with shouts and stamping; and as soon as it
was made known below, where they had been kept
throughout the evening in a state of feverish excitement
by the contradictory reports of various members, who had
dropped down into the tap-room from time to time, by
similar
demonstrations.
During all these deliberations, harangues and ballotings
of the Convention, Puffer, under judicious advisement,
had refrained from any public expression of his opinions;
but, as an offset to this inactivity, had gone about the
committee-room and declared himself privately,
separately
and apart to each member, in behalf of his
candidate
,
and had taken great pains, when it came to a final
and decisive ballot, to cast his voteand to have it so
known by his friends, in favor of Gallipot, the strongest
man. When the committee was dismissed, to avoid
troublesome questionings or reproaches, Puffer escaped as
swiftly as he could, not even tarrying to interchange a
word with Mr. Halsey Fishblatt, who, somewhat
discomfited
by the sudden rebuff he had met, pushed his way, as
stately as ever, through the crowd in the bar-room, not
deigning speech or recognition to a solitary soul.
Did no thought of the kind old man enter Puffer's mind
as he departed from Fogfire Hall? No thought of the
first strange interview, the kind counsel, the anxious look?
It did: and Puffer dwelt upon it till it all rose up anew
before him, bright and fresh as the reality. Out of the
pastthe brief but eventful intervalthe old man came
shambling forth with the old gait, the sidelong demeanor;
the one eye closed, and the one fixed upon him. He
walked by Puffer's side all the way home to the Fork;
and when sleep and darkness again closed in upon
him, again the little paralytic crossed and re-crossed
before
him in tears and laughter; and was, finally, lost in a
deep gloom, which compassed him in and shut him from
the sight.
CHAPTER XVII.
CERTAIN DISTINGUISHED PERSONS NEGOTIATE WITH THE
NEWS-BOYS.
The
two parties, it was now quite obvious, were
rapidly approaching the field of encounter. Both
were on the alert for recruits; busy at the drum, keeping
up such uproar as they could; summoning meetings;
despatching spies to the opposite camp; in a word,
availing themselves of every opening to obtain an
advantage over the adversary. Among other schemes, it
was thought expedient to secure, as early as possible, the
services of a corps of bold, active and ready-witted
billposters
,
who would not only come in aid of the Bottom
Club and other fraternities of that class, in laying waste
and ravaging the enemies' placards, but also serve, by
their ingenuity and vigor, to give prominence and
conspicuous
display to their own calls and handbills.
On this service Mr. Fishblatt and Puffer Hopkins, as
combining great readiness of invention, with handsome
powers of persuasion, were named; and Puffer,
accordingly
,
one evening called by appointment on his
associate
,
to set out with him on the performance of this
delicate
duty.
Mr. Fishblatt was discovered, as might perhaps have
been expected, in his high-backed chair, in nearly the
same attitude as before, with an immense newspaper,it
was larger than the other, and had sprung up in the
interval
,in
his outstretched arms; his feet braced against
the wall: and ranging with his eye up and down the long
columns of solid print, like a dragoon under demonaical
possession. It was a little time before Puffer's entrance
caught his attention; but when it did, he sprang
suddenly
to his feet, welcomed him, and spreading the great
sheet over a horse by the fire,which contrivance he had
been driven upon by the extraordinary expansion of the
weekly press,said he would be ready in a trice.
A wonderful age this, said Mr. Fishblatt, while in
act of enduing his long brown overcoat, an astonishing,
an immense age; all the ages that have gone before it,
should be counted as nothing, sir, and this year, this very
year of our Lord, should be called the year one. We do
our ancestors too much honor by keeping any accounts
with them. We should cut them at once; deny any
knowledge of them. They were a poor, mean, miserable
set of sneaking folio-readers; do you know that? The
editor of this paper, sir, pursued Mr. Fishblatt, grasping
a sturdy stick that stood in a corner, is a wonderful
man. His sheet is two inches longer and four inches
broader than any other in the country; he always has
news an hour and three quarters in advance of the regular
mail; and he has latelythere's enterprise for you
purchased
a small blood poney to ride down to the office
with his leaders. It's astonishing to think what a
popularity
this man enjoys; he's known from one end of the
country to the other, and gives us a half column of notices
of his paper every week, speaking of himhim
individually
in
the very handsomest terms. There's the
Nauvoo `Bludgeon' says he wields a trenchant and
vigorous
penyes sir, the Nauvoo `Bludgeon' says that
then the Potomac `Trumpet' admits he has an unrivalled
genius for the more elegant species of composition; and
by the Western `Thunder-gust,' which has just come in,
I see they allow him `a penetrating eye and a
remarkable
talent for journalism.' He's a wonderful man:we
must go. And forth they issued. They struck through
the heart of the city for the quarter they were in quest
of; Mr. Fishblatt, whenever they passed through an
obscure
street, unbending a little and addressing his
companion
in a familiar tone, but as soon as ever they were
abroad again in a great thoroughfare, he stretched himself
to his full stature, and marched forward very gravely,
without so much as uttering a word. From the manner
in which he wielded the cane that he bore in his
handsometimes twirling it about in his fingers,
sometimes
making a home-thrust at an imaginary object just
before himhe may have been employed in revolving a
passage or two of declamation: any how, so they walked
on. An old dingy building soon stood before them, and
they knew they had reached their destination. The
quarter in which they had arrived was gross, squalid and
unclean, and the building itself seemed a natural
production
of the soil, and not the work of human hands.
A broad gaping area was there, in which such other
fungi of the place, as broken quarter-kegs,
stocking-ends
,
and shattered hats lay in heaps about, and into
this they plunged.
They descended a few steps: and by the aid of a
flickering
lamp getting into an unclean passage, the walls of
which were embellished with numerous impressions of
small hands taken in primitive earth, they reached a door
from which a great hubbub of voices and confused sounds
constantly escaped. Here they entered, and found
themselves
in a low-roofed apartment, lighted by various
glittering and resplendent reflectors pinned against
upright posts at the side: around the whole room there
was a narrow bench, and at the farther extremity was a
desk several feet above the level of the floor. Puffer and
his companion were ushered to a place by the side of the
desk; a tall young gentleman, who seemed to act as
president, or chairman, stood up and knocked on the
board before him, in imitation of a popular tune, when
there came pouring in at a side passage, which Puffer had
not at first observed, a swarm of youths, of all sizes, ages
and complexions; dressed in all possible varieties of
apparel
;
and bearing themselves with as great freedom and
independence of demeanor as any number of gentlemen
that could be found. Many of them bore in their hands
threepenny pies, out of which, from time to time, they
cut a mouthful: many more carried cigars in the corners
of their mouths, at which they puffed with an exemplary
vehemence and unction. At another bidding they were
all seated, or gathered in groups and clusters about pillars in
the middle of the apartment, and pausing for a season in
their respective labors, turned their faces toward the tall
chairman.
Ge'mmen! said the chief of the news-boys, rising in
his place, having first priggishly buttoned his coat and
thrust a broken yellow handkerchief in his breast,
Ge'mmen
!
said he, we all knowswhat we've come here
for, to-night. You know Tom Hurley, and Joe Shirks,
and Bill Gidneywhat we're come here for to do. We
all knows what a low ebb 'Mery-kin literature had got
to, when we took hold of it. We all knows what it is
nowthe wery pride and ornament of the earth. I can
say it of a truth, ge'mmen, that Bill Gidney, the activest
news-boy in the metropolis, is a honor to his species: so
is Joe Shirks, and so is Tom Hurley. Where was natyve
genius afore we took hold of it?it was a bud in the
worm, a undeveloped onion. What's the complaint
now? There's too much genius, too much surprisin'
talent and keen obserwation and overpowerin' eloquence.
King Solomon and the greasy wise men 'ud be ashamed
o' themselves, if they only knew Mr. Flabby, what edits
the `Empty Puncheon,' or Mr. Busts, what conducts the
`Daily Bladder,' or Mr. Bloater, what writes four-horse
leaders for the `Junk Bottle,' but what's going to be the
head man of the new and interestin' paper, called the
`Mammoth Mug.' That 'll be a remarkable paper,
ge'mmen
:
depend on it! The uncommon stock of brains
put into that newspaper will be mere waste; it 'll be
a extravagant usin' up o' the human intellect. For
myself
,
ge'mmen, if you ask my views of litter-a-toor, I don't
hesitate to say, in vun sense o' the word, excuse the
expression
,
it's nothin' but a powerful combination o' rags
and brass: by which I means to say, it takes a uncommon
quantity o' rags to make the paper out of, and it takes a
uncommon sight o' brass and courage to make the paper
full o' readin' matter. Now what's our duty? Shall we
give the cause of natyve genius the go-by; a sort of a
wink to a blind horse, instead of a nice nod of
encouragement
?
As long as we can make twenty-five off of a
hundred
,
and lunchesshall we give it up?
Here the speaker was interrupted by a terrific and
general
cry of No, no. Carry that man to Bellewue:
he's lost his wits!
It was quite obvious that his excellency, the chairman,
was prepared still further to thrill and enlighten them
with his peculiar eloquence: but at this stage of the
proceedings
there came into the meeting, pushing his way
through the news-boys, with the most easy, natural and
serene self-possessiona stout, blustering fellow, with
great staring eyesnot altogether ill-looking eithera
red neckerchief about his throat, a frock-coat flaunting
from his side, his hair in disorder, and his countenance
beaming with a broad, unrestrained expression of
assurance
and conceit. This was an editor. It was Piddleton
Bloater himself; and Piddleton Bloater, the Mighty, the
Immense, the Immeasurable, had come to bargain with
the news-boys to take an interest in a new journal in
which he was about to embark his magnificent talents.
The new paper to be issued on Saturday morning,
said Mr. Bloater, looking gigantic, so as to overawe the
juvenile gentry before him, will be the completest
paper ever published; eight feet square, honest measure;
illustrated by the most splendid wood-cuts, head-pieces,
tail-pieces, and so forth, by the most celebrated artists.
Correspondents in every quarter of the world. We have
already engaged Commissioner Lin for the Chinese
department
;
President Boyer, of Hayti, does the African
branch. The Board of Directors of the N. Y. Gas
Company
are retained as regular contributors. Mr. Bulfinch
Twaddle will furnish a poem to every number. We
expect to have a circulation of one hundred and fifty
thousand by the end of the present year: in fact, we
have it already, although they have'nt all paid in yet.
We intend to make the `Mug' the most remarkable
journal of the day. The `Mug' must go. Don't all
speak at once!
Here the orator produced from his coat-pocket a great
red handkerchief, the duplicate segment of that about
his neck, which he unfurled with a flourish, and disclosed
before the gaze of the assembled news-boys, the words,
The Mammoth Mug
Edited by
Piddleton Bloater,
Esq
., wrought thereon in portentous capitals. This
movement was hailed with a cheer, and as he waived it
about his head, and reddened in the face by the exertion,
the cheers grew in energy and emphasis.
But gentlemen, continued Mr. Bloater, when the
enthusiasm had a little abated, sinking his voice to an
awful whisper, there's a secret I've got to disclose, that
will astonish you. Prepare yourselves. Brace up, and
hold fast of each other. Rum-Fusti, the Patriarch of
Jerusalem, is employed to write an entirely original
Continuous Tale for the `Mug;' to be contributed
exclusively
to the `Mug' and to no other paper!
This had a fine sounding style, and the
news-boys
,
from the very circumstance of not
apprehending
it very thoroughly, cheered and shouted more
heartily than ever. With this tremendous
announcement
,
Mr. Piddleton Bloater paused and taking a
notebook
from his pocket, said he was ready for orders; but
hoped they would restrain themselves, and not come on
too fast.
Eight feet squarethat's ever so many thousand
18
surface inches! said Master Tom Hurley, a pale-faced
news-boy, apparelled in a long tail coat, with metal
buttons. I'm death for the Mug, Mr. Bloater. I'll
cut the `Empty Puncheon,' and take a hundred Mugs
to start with.
The Puncheon! How in the name of Heaven could
any one patronize that miserable abortion! exclaimed
Mr. Bloater. Flabby's a poor withered alligator;
and the Puncheon a mere pothecary's show-bottle, that
shines a mile or two off, but's nothing after all but
colored water, and that not fit to drink.
If Rum-Buster out o' Noah's ark, writes for the
first number, said Master Gidney, a small, corpulent,
jolly-looking fellow, in a roundabout and tasselled cap,
grinning, and speaking up, as he cocked it on his brow,
I'll cut in for a gross of number one; if I seed his
Tale's name in big letter on the fences, it 'ud give me
confidence, and I might go in for a couple o' hundred;
but that's as many as 'ud do, till I have a interview
with the fire-board makers.
Mr. Bloater, not exactly understanding how a privity
of knowledge between the fire-board makers and Master
Gidney could affect the sale of the Mug, looked upon
the youth approvingly, and dashed his open palm upon
his leg, crying out that was juicy, and just the thing!
I think Busts of the `Daily Bladder' is breaking
down, interposed another news-vender, in a suit all
shreds and patches, with an unclean face, uncombed
hair, (the prevailing fashion of the place) and no
covering
to his head. He writes all his editorials in a cheer
made out of the staves of a rum cask: he loves the
smell of the thing wonderfully; and has to be tied in by
the foreman, while he's writin'. Busts writes a history
of his sprees over night, in somebody else's name, and
that fills up the Police Head. I'll take fifty `Mugs' fresh
and bright, with the froth on.
The best thing you could do, my lad! cried Mr.
Bloater from where he stood, smiling. That Busts is a
poor miserable wretch: a viper in the uniform of the
rifle brigade, and he kills character by the platoon.
They call Busts a keen observer of life! so he is of
animalcul
that live in the kennel: there is'nt a viler
wretch on the face of the earth than this same Busts,
if you except Flabby of the `Empty Puncheon!'
But how many copies do you take Mr. Chairman?
asked Mr. Bloater turning toward that functionary: I
know you to be one of the longest-legged and
loudest-voiced
of the Society.
That's a wery delicate question sir, answered the
president, rising with dignity, and buttoning his coat
calmly as he ascended, a wery delicate question
unless
I was informed of the principles the Mug 's to be
conducted on: does it go Captain Kidd, or the moral
code?
Captain Kidddecidedly, rejoined Mr. Piddleton
Bloater. We shall pirate all foreign tales regularly;
and where we can purloin proof sheets shall publish in
advance of the author himself; shall in all cases
employ
third-rate native writers at journeyman-cobbler's
wages, and swear to their genius as a matter of business:
shall reprint the old annuals and almanacs,
systematically
,
as select extracts and faceti, and shall reproduce
their cuts and illustrations, as new designs from the
burin of Mr. Tinto, the celebrated Engraver.
That'll dothat'll do, cried the chairman,
interrupting
the speaker. Set me down for the balance of
the fust edition: it'll be a fust rate paper, and conducted
on fust rate principles.
There's another thing, said Mr. Bloater, continuing
the subject, another thing to be distinctly and clearly
understood. Whoever writes the chief article of the
Mug is to be the great writerthe biggest penman in
America, for that week. For instance, if it should even
be Busts or Flabby; Flabby is to be advertised as an
angel in large caps, and Busts as a genius of the first
water.
Of course! cried the president: Of course!
echoed the news-boys to a man, who understood this
policy thoroughly.
With this understanding, I'll say good night to
you, said Mr. Bloater, wiping his brow. I hope
you'll be in good voice for the first day: I'd suggest a
little practice in crying false alarms for a night or two,
the length of half a dozen streets.
We does that regularly, answered Master Joe
Shirks, and some of us goes on amateur duty as oyster
boys, when shell fish 's in season and big enough to cry!
With this satisfactory assurance, Mr. Piddleton Bloater
departed, sounding the natural trumpet of his nose with
all his might as he went.
Who knows, but some of these youth, asked
Mr. Fishblatt, who had been thrown into temporary
shade by the presence of so astounding a genius,
wheeling about and looking Puffer full in the face,
may come to serve their country one of these
days in the halls of legislation? Who knows but
nature
may be unconsciously training in the crier of a
`Junk Bottle,' a future speaker of the House? or in the
street shouter of the `Empty Puncheon,' a leading
Congressional orator? I begin to think its the true
training
for rhetorical talent; and why should not their
ambition
be turned in this direction? My young friends and
Mr. President, he continued, elevating his voice, now
that he was fairly roused, and falling back a step or two,
To return to what I was about to say when interrupted
by Mr. BloaterI would put it to your patriotism, whether
you should not withdraw for a time from the literary
luxury of crying the news and take an active part in
public affairs. Here is a noble opportunity to serve your
country, my young friends: don't let it pass. Gidney
and Shirks and Hurleyfor such I understand to be the
names of some of youhave now an enviable
opportunity
of achieving lasting glory. Think of it, you may
save your country: the conspicuous exhibition of a
placard by your ingenuity may draw to the polls, say
only a single voter, that voter casts for Gallipot, and
the business is done. Give up every thing to serve your
country, abandon your cherished pursuits, sacrifice your
feelings, and endear yourselves to all the good and
virtuous, and public-spirited throughout this great
metropolis
this
mighty nation!
For my part, responded Mr. Gidney, who was the
first to rise, I considers it degradin' for a news-boy to
become a bill-sticker; it's lowerin' oneself in the scale
of society and makin' a object of hisself for all future
times and generations. The woice of Fame is agin it.
You are wrong, my young friend, continued Mr.
Fishblatt, rising again majestically, stretching out his right
hand and depositing it on the desk top, while he passed his
left behind his person, and thrust it in one of the nether
pockets of his coat. The vocation of a bill-sticker is
a highly honorable one and admits of a great expansion
of natural talent. What does he do? Why, Mr.
Chairman
,
he makes dumb walls and dead stones speak; he
puts a tongue in the old thirsty street-pump; and he
causes shutters and bulk-heads to cry aloud and shout
out, at all hours, day and night; night and day. Is'nt
that enough? Where do you find the bill-sticker?
Why he's at the bottom, the very prime mover and
getter up of all public gatherings, concerts, lectures,
balloonings, ballotings, packet-sailings, fairs, shows and
spectacles. He's the prompter and bell-puller of
society
.
Is'nt this an honorable calling? Why, sir, next to
the popular preacher and the popular author the
bill-sticker
is certainly the greatest benefactor of his race!
As soon as Mr. Fishblatt had taken his seat, after this
powerful outbreak, Master Joe Shirks rose in reply.
We can't do itno how, said Master Shirks,
addressing
the chair. We are pledged contrarywise to the
citizens of New-York. What'll they say, I'd like to
know, when you, Mr. Chairman, and I, and Bill Gidney
here, loses our voice, and cry no more papers than if
we was dumb-fish and flounders. Papers must be cried;
and there's the Extraswho's to know anything about
that 'ere sudden murder, where a affectionate husband
has chopped his wife into tender-loins, with a new
broadaxe
;
or that 'ere dreadful case of explosion, where the
benevolent gentleman has called a tea-party over his
steamboat boiler, and blowed 'em all to atoms with
gitting
the fun and the jollification up too high? What's
to become of these little things sir, if we go off duty.
It's easy to see, without a telyscop, or a constable's
peepers, the city 'ud have a shock of the apoplexy, and
go into fits regularly till we begun to cry again. The
news-boys, sir, and we all knows itbut we're too
modest to say it out of doorsis the moral lamplighters
of this 'ere city. The ge'mmen talks about public
affairs
:
that's a good 'un, as if we did'nt keep the public
mind straight about all that 'ere! If the Englishers go
up into the bowels of China, and drink up all the old
hyson, that's been laid away there, drying and gitting
strength for four hundred year, I guess we knows it!
What's the use of all our private interviews with the
pressmen and clerks about Extras, if it don't come to
that? By private advices we learns that the Florida
Indians
all waded in a body into a large swamp, and
committed
soo-cide by holding each others heads under
water, on the nineteenth instant: where do you get all
that from old fellow? Why from news-boy Tom or
news-boy Bill or Joe Shirks, your sarvant.
I'm agin the motion, Mr. Cheerman, and move we
sticks to
our
business, and lets overybody else stick to
theirs!
Another young gentleman followed who could'nt think
of the proposition, as he had been assured, from good
sources, that there were to be four powerful Extras issued
in the course of the monthcontaining a vast deal of
inflammable information, in advance of all the regular
packets, steamers and stages; and for his part, he
would'nt lose the chance. Theatre-money was low in
his pockethe had'nt seen a mellow-drama for a week,
and it was asking too much of him.
Another was willing to do all
he
could to forward the
proposition; but he'd like to know why the gem'men
did'nt stick the bills himself; he seemed to have good
legs of his own, and a very respectable pair of reachers.
At this suggestion the chairman cried order, and there
was a general shout of disapprobation at the line of
questioning
adopted by the young gentleman.
After a pretty thorough discussion of the subject,
when no satisfactory result seemed possible, the
chairman
himself arose.
Ge'mmen! said he, this 'll never do. These
ge'mmen come to us with the very highest
recommendations
,
and from the very most respectable quarters.
We must'nt let 'em go away without a lift. We can
help 'em, and we must. Now, there is in this very
meeting, and I'm not afraid to say it, certain young
gentlemen
that had better go to be bill-stickers afore their
healths is ruined and entirely broken up. There's one
of usI don't mention names, ge'mmenthat bursted
his voice on extra Junks last week; he was entirely
too wiolent on the China question. His voice is gone.
Then there's another of usyou recollect him,
ge'mmen
who
broke down (there was a sight for you) in
the wery middle of the street, with a wery exciting
number
of the `Puncheon' (containing all them pleasant
particulars about the two dead bodies found in a
gen'leman's
iron-safe) under his arm, tryin' to do justice to it.
How many wictims of weto messages there is in this
room,
I
would'nt like to say: but I do know that a weto
message from the presidin' chief of these United States,
and a influenza is equally fatal to the woice of the
news-boy
.
Then there's you, Ikey Larkins, continued the
chairman, addressing a lumbering, over-grown fellow,
that stood shouldering a post in the corner: Have n't
I told you more nor twenty times that you'r beyond the
news-boy age. Its immoral of such a weteran as you to
be cryin' papers about New-York streets: don't you see
that your'e too big a build, that your'e lame of one leg and
short of an eye; and yet you will keep hanging about
the offices, and cutting in as if you was born to the
business
.
Ge'mmen, let's give Mr. Fishblatt six to begin with
(Ikey Larkins for one) and throw 'em in one a day as
fast as they break down. It's carried!
And in this summary way the mission of Puffer
Hopkins
and Mr. Fishblatt was accomplished, and amidst an
uproar of cries, among which they heard above all others
three cheers for the cheer! and Ikey Larkins is a
`extra foolish'they left.
CHAPTER XVIII.
STRANGE MATTER: PERHAPS NOT WITHOUT METHOD.
At early morningthe very hour, or nearly so, when
Puffer Hopkins was holding an interview with the two
womenan aged figure, wild and distracted, wandered
about the fields beyond the city. His steps were
uncertain
and his whole look and action full of confusion and
doubt: he seemed to be seeking something that was
not to be found, and wherever he cast his eyes, wondered
that it was not there. Where he had past the night, God
only knows; but now that it was morning, he came
abroad, drenched, disordered in dress, and wavered and
groped about in the clear sunshine as if it had been
mist. Bewildered and with troubled steps, he crossed
the low hollows and meadows; straggled more perplexed
than ever, through a crowded orchard; and at length
stood on an ancient highway, the old Post Road. The
moment his steps touched the road, they seemed on a
familiar track; his look brightened; and with a gleaming
countenance, he glanced about, till his eye fell on an
old, faded country house. What joyful and happy
gleams broke through the old man's features as he looked
upon that old faded house! His eyes sparkled, his hands
trembled for joy; and he raised them up and stretched
them forth as if he could grasp that building, as a familiar
friend, by an outstretched hand. Then the brightness
passed away from his look; he was deeply moved, and
in his agitation could scarcely drag himself to the spot
where his eyes were fixed. With trembling hand he
lifted the latchet of the gate; and as he walked up the
path, he shook like one in a spasm.
Many times he walked round and round the house,
before
he entered. Then he went to the rear, raised a door
that led to a ground cellar, and peered for a long space
down into the gloom of the earth before he would
descend
.
Through heaps of lumber, old decaying casks,
and other ancient fragments, he picked his way; holding
his breath and spreading out his arms before him. He soon
found stairs that led into the upper chambers, and
climbing
these, he was in an apartment all dust and darkness,
still as death, barren and silent as the grave itself. He
paused and listened, as if he expected the approach of
some well-known tread; the greeting, perhaps, of a
familiar voice. No voice answeredhow could it at that
lapse of time, unless it had lingered in the corners and
recesses of the chamber, years after its owner was laid
in the earth?
Shall I let the morning light in upon all these?
said the old man, who called up in his mind a vivid
image of all that this chamber held: not yet; I think
I could not bear it yet! I know that broad day is without,
he felt it more because of the darkness, but I dare not
let it in this chamber yet.
With this he moved about the apartment, touching
every thing with his handgently and kindly, as a blind
man features and faces he would knowuntil he had
gone through every article about the room, save one, and
that was a chaira simple, old-fashioned arm-chair, that
stood by the hearth. He many times approached this
as if he would know it as he had known whatever else
was there; but his heart gave out and he fell back,
leaning
,
in the darkness, against whatever chanced to be
nearest.
Wrought upon by his own fancy and these acts of
association, finding these many endeavors to no purpose,
he rushed to a window, burst its hasp, and casting its
shutters wide back, turned about and straining his gaze
upon the empty chair by the hearth, he fell down like
one in a fit.
Recovering, when the mid-day began to pour its warm
beams into the chamber, he looked about the apartment,
dwelling for a long time on each object; but when his
eye fell on a door which led into a small chamber in one
corner of the room, a change came over his countenance,
and he turned aside as if he dared not look that way
again. Presently, however, and seemingly moved
thereto
by some sudden impulse, he proceeded to the door,
which was closed, drew it open, and clutching the door-post
to hold him up, he leaned forward and looked within.
There was nothing there but a narrow truckle-bed with a
single tattered blanket upon it, and the cords, such as were
visible, mouldering and dragging upon the floor; and yet
what a shuddering horror crossed the old man's face as he
gazed upon it, how he trembled and bore heavily against
the door-post, as if he had been smitten blind and
helpless
by the shock of a sudden blow.
He could neither enter nor retire; but stood there like
one rooted to the earth. His mind was dwelling on what
had passed there twenty years before: a little
hideous
old man, older than himself, lay, shivering under
that blankethe saw every line of his countenance
resting on his elbow, straining his ear to catch what passed
in the neighboring chamber, and chuckling like a fiend,
as he listened.
Consciousness and some power of motion, by degrees
came back; he went away and sate down for a time, lost
in a deep reverie; then he rose, and going forward
cautiously
,
as if under the horrible belief that, that other old
19
man was lying in wait withinhe closed the door, turned
the key in the lock which groaned aloud, and caused him
to start; placed a chair with its back against the door,
dropped into the seat, and fixed his eyes, as if he would
never remove them thence, upon the old arm-chair
standing by the hearth. Sometimes he wept as he
looked there; then smiled, as if he would cheer some one
that filled its seat; and then a keen anguish, an
imploring
lookfull of sharpest desolationshot into every
feature and blinded his eyes with grief.
In this way he sate there for an hour or more,
suffering
with pangs that spake aloud in every line of his face,
every muscle of his tortured old bodybut immoveable.
He strained his eyes forwardShe is goingGod help
us allshe is gone! he cried, and broke from the
chamber
.
He speeded swiftly into the hall; unfastened the
doorthe old bar crumbled as he pulled it downand was
in the open air. Much as he was moved, his feet yet
lingered
about the place; and while he wavered in his mind
whether to stay or flystanding and looking by turns
back upon the house and out upon the road that
stretched away into the countryhis attention was fixed
by a young figure that approached. It was a fair creature
that he saw, not yet grown to the full age of care; but,
nevertheless, pale, travel-stained, and partly borne down
by a burthen (it was a plain willow basket) which she
carried, and which she held close to her side.
She was hurrying by, when the old man accosted her.
Stop me not, for heaven's sake, stop me not, she
cried, as Hobbleshank stood in her way. Life and death
are in my steps. Death behind and death before me;
and life onlya little lingering lifein such speed as I
may make. I must be gone at once!
The old man stood for a time, gazing at the pale young
creature, and wondering what her meaning might be;
recovering from his surprise, he presently laid his hand in
hers (which was cold as marble) and said:
Come in with me; you are sick and wearythat you
cannot denywith long travel. You need rest, and may
find a little here. I once had good right to say to all
comers, `welcome here!'that was many, many long,
dreary years agoit was then a cheerful, merry house;
and now, we who are both stricken in sorrow, have a
privilege any where, where darkness is, and dust and
lonely gloom. Come in and rest.
As he spake, he drew her gently toward the house:
she hesitated at first, and when she cast her eyes up at
the old building, shuddered and started back as if it had
been a prison; but when she turned and saw tears
streaming in the old man's eyeshe had watched her
with a sad constancyshe smiled sorrowfully, and at once
entered in.
Why did
she
pause as she paced that broad old hall?
What were those crumbling old walls, and those fading
figures painted to the ceiling, saying to her? She looked
about like one restored to a world she had known before;
and could not tell where nor when. Wondering more
and more, and on the watch at every step, like one
that looks for a surprise, she was led by Hobbleshank,
whose steps seemed moved that way by a force he could
not control, into the chamber where he had suffered
so much. He would have closed the door behind them,
to shut off the cold airs that dwelt about the hall.
In God's name, cried his young companion, do
not shut this chamber up so tight; you will stifle me. I
had rather suffer all the unkindness of winter, than see
any thing more of closed doors and darkened windows. I
have seen enough already! She looked uneasily about
as she spake, sighed as in spite of herself, and was
silent.
You have had heavy troubles, for one so young,
said the old man, I know you have: for your eyes
seem to be looking not at present objects, but on what is
behind and far away!
Don't speak of them now, she answered, drawing
her breath short and fast; but go out and look back upon
the road, whether any travellers are coming this way in
great haste. There will be a dark, deadly carriage close
behind them.
Hobbleshank begged her to be seated, and went forth
as she requested. He soon came back, and answered that
there was none to be seen.
I strained my gaze, said the old man, the whole
length of the road. Be comforted; there is no one in
pursuit.
In pursuit? she answered, lifting her eyes
upon
him with a broad look of surprise and wonder.
Then you know that I have fled. Do you know from
whom?
How could I fail to know? answered
Hobbleshank
,
whose heart softened toward the gentle
questioner
.
You have fled from tyrants. I see no stripes
upon your person; you do not wear a prison garb; and yet I
will swear that you are flying from the most cursed, cruel
relentless despotism that could be laid on a young spirit
like yours. Some one that may have spared your fair
flesh, has been cutting your young heart to the quick
has been breaking your beautiful hopes, one by one; and
you feel the sunshine and the free air to-day, for the first
time, perhaps, in many a long year. Give an old man
credit for some spirit of sorrowful judgment, and say I am
right!
Could the earnest truth with which Hobbleshank spake,
out of the very bosom of a great inner world of sorrow in
himself, fail to touch the other pale sufferer?
I have had some troubles, she answered, feigning
to smile. But what of that, I am only grown old a
little before my time. I will try to forget what is past;
would God grant me strength to bear up against what is
to come! As she spake, a deadly paleness blanched
her cheeks, and her eyes brightened into a vague
splendor, that was almost fearful to look upon.
The old man sate fixed in his seat, gazing upon her;
while there came floating into his mind, and assuming
form and color, as he watched her haggard look, her
features
white as the tombstone marble, and her thin
trembling
form, the memory of one just so troubled, shrunken
and sorrowful, that faded away from that old arm-chair,
a life-time ago.
Each lost in their own wandering and troubled
thoughts, they sate there dumb and silent as two images
in a cold vault.
Do you dwell here? she said at length; but seeing
the dusty walls, from which the hangings tumbled
piece-meal
,
and how dull cob-webs had engrossed the corners of
the room, she added, But I know you cannot.
And yet I do, answered Hobbleshank, in the
spirit
.
My mind has lived in these chambers for many
years; but this poor old body drags itself along in yonder
city. This house is mine, and yet not mine; rather it
belongs to a child of mine, whether in his grave or no, I
cannot tell.
Then he may be happy! she said. I have looked
down into many graves, and used to think them dreary.
But now I know there are graves on the earth, gloomier
than any dug in the soil. Why do I stay here, talking
so: when I should be abroad on my journey? I would
not have tarriedthough I am glad for your sake and
my own, now, that I didhad I not wished, most
fervently
wished, to cross the threshold of the city with
some strength and spirit to meet my task. I must go.
She rose; possessed herself of the willow basket,
which she had laid on the ground, at her side, and took
the old man by the hand.
I am sorry that you go, he said, looking kindly
upon the gentle creature. You know not what guests
and fancies you leave me to. Can I go with you to the
great city in no friendly service?
In none whatever, I fear, she answered. My
task is a simple one, and asks only a kindly spirit to fill
it well. I go to tend at the bedside of a dear friend who is
sick. I must hasten, or he may have bid the world
goodby
already. I think, she added, laying her pale white
hand upon the basket, I have some comfort here for
him.
An old man's good wishes shall go with you every
step! Cheer up and speed, then, if such be your errand:
the city darkens apace, and I shall be alone again, as I
have been, and shall be, how long heaven knows.
He led her through the old broad hall; she looked at
the dim old figures with the same strange interest as
before
;
and in a moment they stood upon the door-step.
Remember, said Hobbleshank, though we have
met but once, we are old friends.
She pressed his hand closely in her own, and proceeded
on her way. Once forth upon the road again, she
strained her eyes with painful earnestness toward the
city, as if she could so call up out of all the great
and turbid mass, the little bedside she wished to see;
pausing only once or twice to look back at the old man,
who at last fell within and closed the door.
CHAPTER XIX.
THE PALE TRAVELER ENTERS THE CITY.
She
had not walked far, when a sudden turn brought
her where the road plunged down with a swift
declivity
at her feet. She stopped and trembled.
Underneath
her troubled eye lay the mighty metropolis, with
its thousand chimnies, its blackened roofs, its solemn
church-turrets and glittering vanesspreading out
where-ever
she gazed, and filling her mind with an indescribable
awe.
How dark, how cold and chill, seemed that multitude
of houses to her! They suggested to her no thoughts of
neighborhood and fellowship by their closeness, but rather
one of dumb creatures huddled together by sheer
necessity
,
to shut off the shivering airs that beset them from
the rivers on either side. When she looked for broad and
cheerful ways, and found only narrow streets that yawned
like chasms and abysses along the house-fronts; when
her eyes sought waving trees to gladden the air, in vain;
her heart shrunk within her: it seemed to her a
wilderness
of dungeons, and nothing more. A dark dismal mist,
formed of dust, smoke, the reek of squalid streets, the
breath of thousands and hundred thousands of human
beingscrept, like a black surge, along the house-tops.
The hoarse murmur deepened as night drew on; the
moaning of one vexed with pain and confinement, of
prisoners pining to be free. If the whole broad shadow
of the city, cold and vast, had fallen on her spirit, it could
not have chilled her more: but when the thought came
to her again of the sacred errand on which she was bound,
her heart was renewed, her eye brightened, and clasping
her burden anew, she hurried on. And now the great
city which she had wondered at, in its entirety and
vastness
,
met her, part by part, and bewildered her with its
countless details. There were country waggons hurrying
out: sulkies, stanhopes, baronches flying past as if
desolation
followed fast behind; then great carts and trucks,
loaded to the peak with heavy merchandize. All these
she regarded with a wandering eye; but when she caught
sight of dark foundation-stones, still clinging to the earth,
where an old penitentiary had been lately razed to the
groundshe felt the uses it had served.
Whenever she passed houses with closed shutters, she
shuddered and quickened her pace; to some there were
barred windows  these she regarded with a sidelong
glance of curiosity, as if she expected to see pale faces
peering out between the irons. Once she passed an old
stone-building, with every casement from cellar to garret
closely ironed; it was only an old sugar-house, and she
speeded past it as if it had been a jail.
Full of vague fears, startled at every object that crossed
her, suggestive in any, the remotest degree, of that she
dreadedand had good cause to dread the mostshe
hastened on. A green waggon, close and dark, passed
herthe prison carriage, plying between the city prison
and the Islandand she felt it like a cloud as it hurried
by. The very streets, murky as they were, seemed to close
upon her in the distance, but opened again constantly as
she advanced; new houses, new sights and objects,
springing
as from a perpetual womb, out of the cloudy haze that
lowered in her way. As far as her eye could pierce, the
roads were dark with vehicles of one sort and another,
crossing and re-crossing, rushing tumultuously in every
direction; some driven by boys, some by men; some
sitting
under shelter, others, the cartmen, standing up in
their professional frocks, with a firm hold upon the reins,
darting rapidly from one side of the street to the other.
Above the whole throng and procession, a great coach or
stage at times towered up, over-topping the street, and
swarming to its very summit with passengers.
All along the way, people poured into the streets in
uninterrupted succession, out of damp, dull rooms; out
of narrow alleys; from work-shops; from cellars; from
churches; and the way was perpetually choked and
glutted with the throng. What multitudes went past
pent up in carriagesa pleasure to them, a hideous
bondage, it seemed to her!
She saw no one, not one, with gyves and irons on their
limbs, and yet how care-worn, and bowed, and
convict-like
they all looked to her!
She passed along, looking anxiously at dark door-ways,
at iron gates and steep areas, and heavy churches
oppressing
the earth with their massive granite or marble;
smithies, where men were busy forging vast chains and
cables; shops, where great locks and bolts leaned in the
windows. A long way after all these, she came upon a
grim, ill-dressed, smoke-stained man, who bore in his
hand a bunch of keys, which he grasped close and
clashed together as he walked, and she shrunk from him
as if he had been the deadliest and fastest of all the jailer
race. Gazing fearfully about in this way, she espied, far
off, through a side-street, dimly seen moving through the
dusk, that grew every minute deeper, a hearse and
funeral
trainat that distance it seemed scarcely more than a
shadowand a cold shudder crept through her frame.
What if it were her friend, her dear friend, whose burial
she thus regarded? Her first impulse was to hasten after
it; but ere she had taken many steps in this resolution
it had glided away, and she returned to the path she had
been pursuing. Night now came swiftly on; the black
shadows fell in broad masses in the streets; the confusion,
the hurry, the press of life in every direction deepened.
She moved along as speedily as she could, consulting
from time to time at a window lamp, a chart she had
borne in her hand all along. At intervals, as if by chance
and no design, a public light broke out, sometimes in one
quarter, sometimes in another, and glimmered with a
feeble ray. This only made the gloom deeper and
drearier than before; and she kept, while she could, in
the streets where the shop windows blazed upon the
pavement.
It was not easy for her, with all her care, her painful
scrutiny of the paper she carried, and study of the
sign-boards
at the corners, to shape her course aright. There
was a street-fight once; then a crowd gathered at the door
of a show; then a poor woman who was doling forth from
the steps of a gentleman's domicil, a piteous tale of poverty
and suffering. Once there was a hideous cry, a light rose
high in the air, and she looked about and saw more
plainly
than ever how darkness had stretched his mighty arms
abroad and held the city in his grasp.
Not a whit fairer or freer did the houses show to her
now at night, than when she first beheld them and ever
since; they all seemed like graves or tombs, or
prison-fastnesses
.
Striking through thoroughfares that diverged
from the main path she had been traveling, she was
gradually
approaching the point she sought. She passed a
thoroughfare, little frequented, where the unfed lamps
winked and blinked at each other across the street, like
so many decayed ghosts. Then another, where all the
lights had gone out. Then others, until at length, by
what she saw around, she felt that the object of her wish
was near at hand.
There was a square, so her chart informed her, here it
was; a discolored yellow househere, too, only it seemed
more golden and precious than the description allowed:
and there, yes there, where her eyes were fixed, as on
a star, shone a little light, just at the height she might
have looked for. The house, the home, the shelter of
her sick friend was found. The door stood open to receive
and welcome her in. She looked around, the tall houses
that guarded the square growing blacker every minute,
seemed frowning on her and gathering about her, closer
and closer, as if they would shut her in: she glanced
timidly up to them, as if they had been in truth cruel
living creatures, and trembling with fear and joy, fled
into the house for shelter, like one pursued.
CHAPTER XX.
FOR AND HIS VISITER FROM THE COUNTRY.
The
stairs were steep and narrow; and as she
clambered
up, a thousand visions thronged about her and
crowded in her way. At one time she was oppressed
with the gloomy thought that
he
might be dead and gone:
not to be found any more in that house, or any other
of mortal habitation. Then all the great city, in the
many dreadful and oppressive shapes it had taken in her
mind, whirled past, filling the air with darkness, and
confusion
and boundless tumult. It was a gloomy way for a
poor lonely woman to travelthat ill arranged stairway,
lighted only by the chance flickering of cheap candles,
where the doors stood ajar; or by whatever of the public
light strayed in through the entry windows. Every step
brought her nearer to the chamber she sought; and
although
20
there were many others under that same roof,
children, and women, and aged men, dwelling in many
apartments, (for they were all poor, and poverty straitens
itself to a narrow fold,) she seemed to know that
chamber
only, among them all.
At length she stood at the door; she knew it even in
the dark, as her hand passed over it; she paused a
moment
,
to gather strength and spirit. While she lingered,
in a deep conflict of many emotions, she thought she
heard the murmur of gentle music within; it was fancy
only, associating with the place an incident that raised it
out of its low estate. She entered: there was the room,
lighted by a single candle, gleaming from the corner
where it stood, as cramped and narrow as ever; the
asparagus
in bottles; the chain of birds' eggs against the
wall; the pot of plants brought in and stationed on the
shelf; the blackbird in his cage, removed from his old
look-out at the window and hung upon a beam inside;
and underneath these, where his waking eye could
command
them all, lay the little tailor, poor, wan, wasted
with sickness, and slumbering from very want of strength.
She looked upon him, scarcely believing it was he: she
looked upon the objects which carried her mind far away,
and she knew it was, indeed, no other. She sank into a
chair by the wall, and looked around: how strong was
the sympathy of her fancy with the fancy of the sick
man! While she gazed upon them, the room broadened
into wide meadows; the asparagus sprigs shot up into
fair, green trees; the birds' eggs, in the instant, swarmed
with many beautiful and melodious lives; and the single
blackbird darkened the air, as if he had been a whole
flock in himself. There was more freedom to her in that
little room, than in all the broad streets she had wandered
through!
Then she watched the sick man himself: so thin, so
pale, he seemed to have come to her a long way out of
the past, divested of all the clogs and shackles that had
held him from her so long. He smiled: by that she
knew him again. It was meant, she was sure, for
herself
;
and her heart lightened at the thought. Dwelling
upon it, remembering how often such a look had
brightened
that pale face in old days, her thoughts were led,
by degrees, to the basket she had laid down at her side.
Unclasping it with trembling hands, she brought from its
bosom a slip of the wild-rose, which she carried gently
and laid on the pillow by his brow, with the hope that it
might suggest to his dreams scenes, dear to him as life.
She was right; mingling with his own willing thoughts,
what his sense reported to him, there sprang up before
him a fantasy of other days, so sweet, so life-like, so
lively, that he smiled on it as if it had been reality. His
lips moved, and murmured softly, as to a listening ear.
She glided quickly forward, and bent down to catch what
he uttered: she would have given the world had his words
she thought she knew what they would saybeen
audible.
Presently the poor tailor wakened from his charmed
slumber; sate up in his couch, and looked about. His
eyes, which wandered as in search of something not
present
,
no sooner fell on the pale visiter than they were
fixed at once. So unreal they seemed to each other, and
yet shadows of what both knew well, they sate gazing
each into the other's eyes, without motion or utterance.
Martha? at last said Fob, whispering the name, in
doubt whether he would be answered, or whether the
vision
would be dispelled, Martha Upland?
She started up and rushed to his bedside.
I thank God for this, she cried, casting herself upon
his neck; I had not hoped to see you alive!
You should scarcely think of the living, answered
Fob, with an inexpressible anguish in his look; you,
who have been dead and buried three long years.
Little better than that, she answered, or not so
good. A close, silent bondage in one's father's house,
with eyes, colder than the grave-worms, ever fixed on
you; all the motions of nature going on about you, so
that you can hear the murmur and not share it; on the
same earth with friends you love, and yet sundered,
in an everlasting parting, from them: this
is
death.
There can be no other and no worse.
I could not, dear Marthait was madness for me to
dream, that you would come or could, when I sent for
you. I was going to the grave you have prayed for so
often; and tarried only to shake hands and part.
It was only by long watching, and at last, by stealth,
that your message came to my hand. Yesterday at
daybreak
,
the cruel guards, who have watched me so long,
grew, for once, drowsy with sleep; I found access to an
upper chamber, clambered to the roof; down upon the
old outhouse, (you remember it well,) and at length
leaped to the ground. In an houran hour sacred to
youI was on my journey, and, now, foot-weary, as you
may guess, but glad of heart, I am here.
Three yearswhat yearssince the awful interdict
that divided us was pronounced. It was folly that I, a
poor, outcast, landless tailor, should lift my heart to you;
but with God's blessing, what I then gave has prospered
(I know it has) in your silent prison, as well as it would
with all the summer's sun, and the autumn's bounty, shed
upon it. Three years; and now I look upon what my
eyes have wandered through the whole firmament in
vain, to behold. I have toiled, God knows, for this sight,
and have failed till now.
I saw you once, dear Fob, she answered, returning
his look of truthful fondness, once only: and that was
a year ago, yesterday, at dusk, gliding by the
garden
wall; they seized you and dragged you away before
my sight; and ever after,
that
window was closed. The
morning light that came that way (they said) was too
strong for my fading eyes.
For many long days, said Fob, I was the ghost of
that dwelling: I haunted all the ways that led to it
sometimes in the orchard, sometimes in the meadow,
sometimes, as you saw, under the very eaves of the house
itself. But to what purpose? I had been driven, you
know, by the iron hand that no man can resist, the
relentless
law, from fields that were mine; and men
followed
in its scent, and yelled on my steps, like so many
hounds. I was buffeted, reproached, driven off like a
dog, till I came to curse the very house that held your
enemies and mine. I have failed not, as you learned
by what I wrote, to visit our old haunts, and to dream
you back again to the life we once led in woods and
meadows, and by the margins of smiling streams. How
has the time gone with you? he asked in a choking
voice, for he knew the answer too well. You have
had no free air for three weary years.
No breath whatever, she said, and a deeper
paleness
struck through her features as she spoke, closely
housedstealthily watched all that time; while the story
has gone abroad that I was deadly sick, of a sickness
so frail and delicate, that nearest friends could not see me
without endangering life. A physiciana false, corrupt
villain as God ever madecame at studious intervals as
if to my bedside, and went forth with a piteous sigh,
shaking his head over the sad malady that could not be
cured. So they thought. They deemed that disease of
horrid bondage would never be conquered; but, thanks
to Heaven, thanks, never too many nor too devout, I am
a free child of the air and the open light once more!
Even while she spake, swift, copious tears gushed into
her eyes; she fell upon her knees, and bowing her head
upon the couch of her sick friend, felt that her heart was
bursting with thoughts of past sufferance and present joy!
Could Fob behold this, and fail to be moved? He looked
upon her a moment; a pang writhed his countenance,
and clasping one of her pale hands in his, he wept like
a child. The wild slip with which she had soothed his
sleep, lay where all their tears fell upon it; and if it had
budded that moment, and shot forth there, in fair green
leaves and brighter flowers than bush or tree ever bore,
would it have been less than a true testimony to the
beautiful
and gentle spirit of the hour?
When they looked up again, the sorrow had passed
from their brows, and they smiled on each other, with
something like the gladness of a happier time.
I have brought down all of the old homestead that I
could, said Martha, who had her willow basket at the
bedside; and it is here.
She unclasped it; and as Fob glanced down into its
fragrant womb, his eyes shone with a new light. He saw
whole tracts and acres there.
These, you know, continued Martha, producing a
handful of green cresses, I plucked them from the
Mower's Nook in the wood, so calm and shady in the
summer
time. You remember it?
I think I should, answered Fob, who could not fail
to detect a ruddy tinge that crossed the questioner's
countenance
.
Had that Nook a memory of its own, and
could echo what it has heard, how many gentle stories it
could tell: that
you
know as well as I.
Here is clover too, said Martha, you know that?
To be sure I do, answered Fob, quickly, The
sweet, red-blossomed clover that grows by the great Rock
in the laneyou found it there, I know. Is the shadow
of the old Rock as broad and cheerful as ever?
You forget, my dear friend, she replied; I have
not seen its summer shadow for three long years.
Boards and casements, thin and frail, have held me in
faster than if I had been walled round with rocks as massy
and cold as that!
What a fool I am! said Fob, I knew that well;
but herewhat is this? (taking up a green plant that
she had produced, and looking on his pale visiter in
wonder
)
you have not truly trusted yourself in the dark old
Hollow, always so full of midnight and gloomy thoughts,
to pluck this for me?
From no other place has it come! answered Martha.
It was the first I sought after my escape. Dark, dreary,
cheerless as you think itthough we have had many a
pleasant ramble in its waysit glared as with sunshine,
to my long darkened eye. The dismal pines that dwell
on its sides, seemed to laugh in my ear, as the wind
whispered with them; the dark bats and ill-omened owls
glanced about as glorious as eagles!
Our gloomy old friend, the Hollowyou think so
hardly ofsee what he has yielded, said Martha, after a
moment's pause, lifting in her hand a bunch of sparkling
red berries, and waving them before the little tailor till they
danced again, and shone brighter than his own pleased eyes.
Then there were buttercups gathered from the heart of
a meadow, where they had often lingered together,
gathering
them before; green rushes, from the brook;
feathers
of the blue-bird, that had moulted where they were
found. On each they dwelt, babbling over old memories
and associations like children; and finding a solace and
joy in those simple treasures, that the costliest banquet
might have failed to yield.
All the green and fanciful treasures she had brought,
lay spread about him; and his eye gleamed with a
tearful
joy, as it passed from one to the other.
I have something more here, said Martha, dipping
again into the basket, something to please you for the
sake of others, and not yourself.
I shall shed no tears, even if it be so, said Fob,
smiling. Let us see.
She brought forth, from the very bottom of the basket,
an old, tattered, patched-up parchment, and held it up
exultingly before his eyes. He no sooner caught sight of
it and learned what it was, than he clapped his hands and
stretched them forth, to pluck it gently from her. It was
the deed, the very deed, rent in pieces so long ago
which he thought lost forever, rescued to the light by
bright eyes that had peered for it amid dust and
tumbling
fragments, because she knew it would pleasure him.
Here was joyjoy for Puffer Hopkins; joy for
Hobbleshank
;
and as he held it close to his eye, it seemed, as
every good act and record should, to have a fragrance of
all the sweet and fair things among which it had lurked
in the basket of the fair fugitive. So they sate there many
hours, in which Fob gathered new strength and spirit,
talking over the recovery, past times, scenes, occasions
too sacred for a record. If unseen angels, as some have
fondly deemed, watch in our chambers, linger at our
bedsides
,
and bless us in act of doing well, how must they
have swarmed in that little chamber, and through the
holiest hours of night, held joyful watch over two spirits
so like themselves!
CHAPTER XXI.
ISHMAEL SMALL MAKES A DISCOVERY.
Angel-guarded
as a generous faith would fain
persuade us, were the little tailor and his country
friend, withinan eye, by no means so kindly or auspicious
in its gaze, watched all their doings, from without. Perched
in the very gutter of the Fork, clinging to the casement
of the dormer window, as he best could, and holding his
head obliquelysate or couchedIshmael Small. His
turned-up nose against the window as close as he could
press it, he kept a hungry look fastened on every glance,
or gesture, or motion, that passed within: he could not
catch their voices where he sate, but seemed to know all
that passed as if he had heard it slowly uttered, word by
word. When the deed was produced, could they have
caught sight of that sharp grey eye, piercing through the
very centre of the bull's-eye with which the cheap
casement
was glazed, they would have both shrunk back, and
said, What ugly spirit is thatthat glares, like a
sunglass
,
upon us!
Up to that moment, Ishmael had looked calmly on; but
when he saw the old, shivering parchment brought forth,
and clutched so greedily by the poor tailor, he gnashed
his teeth, and, turning about, with a glance downward
at a stout man in jolly health who passed in the street
below, with a market-basket on his arm, as if it would
afford him a most exquisite pleasure to topple himself
down upon him, and crush all that manly vigor out of
himhe crept up the roof, and espying a narrow rent
scarcely larger than his handwhere a single ray came
through from the chamber, laid his ear close down, and
with his chalky visage turned to the sky, he held his
breath, and listened to what passed. He was right. All the
hours he had spent in tracking Hobbleshank from place
to place; all the vague rumors that had crept into his
mind, as from time to time his acquaintance with Puffer
Hopkins grew; all his long vigils about the Fork, (whose
evil genius, as night and day, but mostly by night, he
hovered round it, he seemed,)all confirmed and made
true. When this conviction shot through the brain of the
deformed little eaves-dropper, his knees shook, his eyes
dimmed for a moment, his grasp relaxed, and, had he not
summoned at once with desperate force his ebbing
strength, he would have rolled headlong into the street.
Recovering himself, he paused not a minute to listenhe
knew enough and more than enough already
clambered
the roof againplunged into the open scuttle by
which he had at first emergedand divedso swift was
his descent of the narrow stairs, it seemed, from top to
bottom
,
a single actinto the open air. Buttoning his coat
close togetherfixing his cap firmly on his head, and
thrusting in his straggling pocket handkerchief behindso
that not a single fluttering rag might check his course, he
started off. Like lightning he sped along, bounding over
obstacles; winding his way through crowds that crossed
him; and gliding between vehicles that seemed rushing
together
from opposite directionsin a fashion that was
perfectly miraculous.
It was only a few minutes, and he stood at the broker's
door. He stopped an instant to recover his breath,
listening
if he were astir; then, thrusting his arm in at a
concealed opening in the wall, he drew back the bolt,
and stepped in. Closing the door behind him, and
cautiously
crossing the room, he knocked at the broker's
closet.
Hold back, cried the old man, in a suppressed voice,
like one engaged in a desperate struggle, what are you
choking me for? Take it back, take it all back; but let
me go. There, curse it, thereshe glides by again. It
was your own fault.
Ishmael knocked again.
Let me go, or I'll beat you, shouted the old broker,
who seemed to be vexed and goaded on by the sound,
mingled, as it doubtless was, with the subjects of his
dream. What did you cross me for? She is mine, I
tell you, as much as yours, Hobbleshank! Marry her,
and I'll grind you to powder; ha! ha! and he laughed
with a broad chuckle in his dream. That fixes you.
Buy bread if you can: a cord or two of wood; I'm sorry
the poor lady's so sickly. Take the boy away: smother
him, choke him, drown him! ha! ha!
Wake up, wake up! whispered Ishmael, whose
spirits, to tell the truth, were not a little subdued by what
the restless slumbers of the old broker seemed to point at.
I have news, great news for you!
I know you have, continued Fyler, who seemed
bent on pursuing his dreaming thoughts at all hazards.
That was well done, Jack Leycraftexcellent; the
little fellow fainted away, did he?so far that he won't
come back again, I guess.
And Mr. Fyler Close, wonder at it as the world may,
such was the flow of his spirits, went off, chaunting
Old Hundred; to be sure, in a somewhat dissonant and
imperfectly developed vocalization. This divertisement
had the effect of restoring him to the familiar use of his
organs, and availing himself of his ears, quite readily, he
heard a quadruple rap, which Ishmael was now practising
on the door; and asked, who was there. Ishmael made
himself known, and the old man, sliding rapidly into his
garments, unbarred his closet door, and stepped forth.
Well, what word, Ishmael? he asked, as soon as
he was disinterred.
21
Come this way, said Mr. Small, taking the broker by
the arm, and leading him toward the window. As they stood
where the light fell from a neighboring chamber, in which
watch was kept with one disordered in his reason, and
whose cries could be heard where they stood, and Ishmael
saw how haggard and withered was the broker's look, he
doubted whether to utter his news now that he was there.
He paused a while and looked at Fyler:
You heard nothing, said he, eyeing Ishmael in turn.
Did I disturb you? I was running over a long sum in
compound interest. I got the figures wrong, and that put
me in a passion. You saw that?
Ishmael professed to have seen nothing.
What's your news? asked Fyler. Nothing
terrible
,
I hope. Is it a thunder-clap or a burst of music?
speak quick.
Before he answered, Mr. Small went to the door, thrust
forth his head into the hall, and, opening wide both his
ears, listened to catch any sound that might be stirring.
The whole house was dead and still, and he returned.
A cross between the two, answered Ishmael,
subduing
his voice; they have found the deed.
What deedHobbleshank's? asked the old man,
gasping for breath, and drawing Ishmael close up to him
by the collar, so that their faces almost touched.
The wery same, sir, answered Ishmael, yaller with
age, and patched up like a old bed-quilt.
If the blackest thunder-cloud hovering in the sky had
settled down that moment, and become part and parcel of
the features of Fyler Close, they could not have scowled
more darkly than they did. He let fall his hand from its
hold on Ishmael Small; and turning away, he paced the
chamber; at every turn, as he came near the light,
glaring
like a wild beast on Ishmael, and showing his teeth
firmly set together, in the extremity of his passion.
After traveling the apartment in this wild way for twenty
times or more, he suddenly stepped aside, and leaping
into his closet, bolted it within. Ishmael waited till the
clock struck midnight, sitting on a broken chair, listening
to the disordered sick man's cry from above: but not
a breath or sound denoted that any other living
creature
was in that chamber but himself. The closet might
have been the broker's tomb, for all he heard. At the end
of that time, the closet-door was again opened; Fyler
Close came forth, as if nothing unusual had passed, and,
bringing a chair, took his seat, calmly and pleasantly,
directly opposite Mr. Small.
Where is John Leycraft, of late, Ishmael? asked Mr.
Close, as though his mind was entirely disengaged, and
free to any general subject that might come up. He doesn't
come here, now-a-days. Have you kept track of him?
I have, answered Ishmael. Last week, he was
busy in a cardin' mill; week afore last, he was
journeyman
to a stun-mason; this week he's a rope-walker: where
he'll be next week, and the week after, would puzzle a
jury of o' Solomons to guess. His mind's distempered,
judging by what he says to me when I sees him, about
that old business of the farm-house. He can't rest a day
anywheres, but flies about like a singed pigeon over a
conflagration, or a dove what's got sore feet.
Will he blab, Ishmael? answered Mr. Close, in a
perfectly calm and dispassionate tone. He's got a
first-rate
memory, and might turn it to account with the
magistrates
.
Don't you think so, eh?
By no manner o'means, rejoined Mr. Small. It's
his own mind what unrests him and keeps him wake o'
nights. He wants to find the boy, and clear his conscience
with the yolk of the egg: that's all.
If he's got an eye that can look through the crust of
the earth, six feet or more, perhaps he'll find him,
perhaps
he won't, said the broker, smiling on his
companion
,
and twisting his shrubby whiskers in his fingers.
So you've seen the deed, he added, as if that had just
occurred to him. You could'nt borrow it for me to look
at for a few minutes, eh? Was it in good preservation,
in a fine state of health?
Capital, answered Ishmael, considerin' it
had n't a sound square inch on its body, and was
a little bilious in the face: if there had been a
hole two inches bigger in the roof, I'd have brought
it round for a interview. Whereupon, Mr. Small
indulged in a gentle laugh; but not so as to disturb the
neighbourhood.
Where in the name of heaven, have you been
tonight
?
continued Mr. Close, running about citizens'
roofs, like a cat?
To be sure I have, answered Mr. Small; and a
wery agreeable time I've had of it I can tell you;
overseein'
the city, and lookin' out that the watchmen was
on duty, and the lamps lit. Church steeples and tops o'
public buildings, is spruce beer, at two pence a glass,
compared with it. Then there was a wery charmin'
young 'oman, that brought the parchment out of the
country
where she found it, inside, sitting like a wax-figure to
be looked at; and Fob, the little tailor, actin' like mad,
kissing 'sparagus-sprigs and mock-oranges, like a hero,
just for greens. I can't say I ever had a more agreeable
night of it in my life, where there was only three of the
party!
Ishmael, said Fyler Close, withdrawing the
attention
of his companion from these delightful prospects,
we must distrain in the Row to-morrow.
Out and out? asked Ishmael.
Out and out, answered Mr. Close. Down to the
plant-pots, and Dutch oven. No nonsense, but a clean
sweep: here's the warrants. Go down to Meagrim, at
the very earliest hour in the morning. And he handed
Ishmael a bundle of documents filled up and ready for
use.
No delay? asked Ishmael.
Not a minute: and tell Meagrim to move the goods
off, sell at the shortest notice, close up at once, and bring
me the result in gold. He must throw off interest on his
commissions: mention that to him when you see him
to-morrow.
Ishmael promised it should be looked to the very hour
the court opened; and was about to leave.
You'll stand by me, Ishmael! asked Fyler,
regarding
him with a look that Ishmael did not recollect to have
seen him ever wear before. You'll stick to me through
all?
I will, uncle Fyler, answered Ishmael, taking the old
broker's proffered hand. I'll be a stren'thin' plaster to
your back; a pair o' double magnifiers to your eyes: and
a patent truss to your hip-jints. Losin' the use of your
legs, I'll be crutches to you; and when you come to give
up the ghost
As to that last particular, interposed Fyler
Close, suppose we adjourn conversation twenty
five years. That is'nt too long? But when it does
happen
,
as I suppose it must one day, I'll leave you an old
chest or two to rummage, that's all I can, you know; and
if you find any thing it shall be yours.
Mr. Small shook hands upon the understanding, and
was moving off again.
Come this way Ishmael, said the broker, as Mr.
Small was at the door. Listen!
At that moment, a fearful cry issued from the chamber
where the disordered man lodged; voices in
supplication
or menace were raised upon him; and, presently, a
dead silence followed, as if the struggler had been finally
subdued.
There's close quarters, up there, said Fyler, looking
first at Ismael, then lifting his meagre finger, and
shaking
it in the direction from whence these sounds had
come. Stout chaps, brawny fellows; and not a word
uttered by the poor sick devil that's believed. He
dropped his voice to the lowest whisper, and added,
I'll drive Hobbleshank to
that
pass yet! Ishmael
renewing
his promise to execute his orders promptly, on
the morrow, and smiling in answer to the hideous grin
that lighted the old broker's countenance, withdrew.
The broker himself sate by the window, listening to
the cries of the lunatic, and waiting for the break of day
that he might hear the blacksmith's mortgaged hammer
sound, and fix his eyes once more on the securities spread
about him.
CHAPTER XXII.
MR. FYLER CLOSE INVOKES THE AID OF MR. MEAGRIM AND
THE LAW.
Pursuant to his engagement with the broker, Ishmael
at the proper hour, having first laid aside his cap, and
substituted in its place a round-rimmed hat, embellished
with a strip of crapeset forth to carry the wishes of Mr.
Fyler Close into effect. Getting by an easy road into
Chatham-street, which was his favorite promenade, he
pursued his course, not quite so gaily as usual, but with
sufficient exuberance of spirits to indulge in an occasional
sportive sally, as he pushed his way along the crowded
street. Once feigning to be taking a leisurely walk, a mere
after-breakfast stroll, with his hands crossed quietly behind
him, he suddenly brought one of them forth, and letting it
drop gently on the crown of an errand-boy, fresh from the
country, and who was gaping and staring at the various
street sightshe left the young gentleman staggering about
as if under the influence of a sturdy morning draught.
This, and a few others like it, were, however, mere
prefaces
and flourishes of his humor; but when he got to the
declivity of the street, where it forms a cheerful perspective
of mouldy garments and black-whiskered Jews, Mr. Small
knew that he was in a province that his genius had made
his own. He slackened his pace a little, as he began to
climb the street; and keeping his eye fixed on its other
extremity, waited a moment till he espied certain figures
turning into it out of another thoroughfare; his eye kindled,
and smiling, and touching his hat gracefully to the young
gentlemen, who stood in the shop-doors, many of whom
were his particular friends, he strolled on. It was
Almshouse
morning, Wednesday, when the public charities
are distributed at the Park office to the poor; and as
Ishmael rambled on, he met the various creatures of the
city bounty hobbling forward in every variety of gait,
aspect, and apparel; and bearing their alms in every kind
of characteristic utensil and implement; poor women
bringing theirs in broken baskets, concealed with woman's
shrinking care, under old, tattered cloaks; and the men
bearing theirs openly on their backs, or tied in soiled cotton
handkerchiefs.
As he approached these parties, Ishmael assumed a
benevolent
aspect, and proceeded to put in practice the
philanthropic
purpose with which he was inspired. The first
that he encountered was a glazier carrying his alms in an
old glazier's box; drawing near, Mr. Small accosted him
with Stop a moment, my frienddon't trouble yourself to
set it down; lifting the lid and depositing within what
seemed a liberal donation in money, There; go home as
fast as you can, and invest that little deposit in a couple of
tender steaks and two twisted rolls: you're hungry and
they'll do you good! Ishmael passed on to another, (amid
the smiles of his acquaintance in the shops, who seemed
to admit it was well done) who might have been a great
traveler in his time, for he sustained his burthen in a faded
carpet-bag, slung from his shoulder at the end of a
walking-staff
.
Ishmael begged to know what was his favorite dish,
which the beggar modestly declining to answer, Mr. Small
said, I know what it isit's turkey done brown, with
sauce of oysters; here's a couple of quarters, placing in
his hand the apparent coin, and there's a extra
twenty-five
center to treat yourself to the pit o' the the-a-tre after
dinner. And Ishmael drew another from a pocket, the
issues of which seemed to be as free and unlimited as those
of any modern bank.
Mr. Small claimed to be no banker or financier, but he
had certainly managed to create a currency which diffused
a pleasure and satisfaction wherever it flowed. Was it any
fault of his, if his pensioners should afterwards chance to
waken from a delusion, and find that what they took for a
legal mintage, was nothing more than a fictitious currency
of electioneering silver, bearing on one side the device of an
attractive donkey with his mouth full of political labels, and
on the reverse that of a man in a cage, starving in
consequence
of the times brought upon the country by the party
against whom it was aimed? The silver was a purchase
of Ishmael's from one of the churchesto whose plate it
had been contributed by certain liberal-minded politicians,
who were pew-holders therein.
Spreading his largesses in this way on every side, with
the unqualified approbation of his Jewish friends, and
maintaining
for the time at least the character of a large-souled
philanthropist, Ishmael reached the Court, with more sincere
good wishes and blessings sent after him, than ever, in all
probability
,
accompanied a traveller in that direction before.
A rarer or more curious gathering of mortal creatures than
compose the posse of officers, marshals and litigants that
haunt the Small Courtthe Twenty Pound Jurisdiction, it
has been no man's fortune to see. In the first place, the
Small Court is held in a square room, of very limited
dimensions
where
the Court itself in triple majesty sitswith its
purlieus, in the rear of the city Park: the purlieus consisting
in part of another square-room where a very red-nosed man
roams about inside of a railed cage, opening great ledgers and
closing them; and holding no other intercourse with the
barbarous
world without, than to accept from time to time small
tributes of coin, which he carefully deposits in a yawning
drawer, wide and deep enough to swallow all that may be cast
in.
A further purlieu of the small court adjoins this sacred
precinct, and consists of two small dens to which the
worshipful judges withdraw, at certain seasons of the day,
and brood over the wickedness and corruption of
mankind
:
which they avenge by giving wrong-headed
verdicts
against parties who venture to molest them in their
retirement. Through these various purlieus and avenues,
there circulates from ten, morning, till three, afternoon, a
constant tide of unclean, unwashed, and wrathful
humanity
;
in at one door, out at another, making noisy friths
and creeks, as it were, all over the place, and whirling
round and round in a perpetual vortex. The tide was not
quite at its height when Ishmael entered, and the retainers
of the Court who had assembled were therefore not too many
to be observed apart. It was the Clerk's room that Ishmael
enteredwhere the officers and others are in waiting
till they are calledor transacting such business as may
be put in their charge.
There was one man sitting in a corner, stout-built and
heavy
,
with a great red noseeven much larger and fierier than
the clerk'sthat seemed to throw a glow over the
newspaper
he held before him, and which he was reading
through a pair of coarse horn spectacles: while a spare
man of a pale aspect was hobbling across the court-room
on unequal legs, bearing a process to the clerk's desk
within the rail. Another ruby-nosed officer, much
taller, but not as stout as the other, was sitting in the
door-way, looking out steadily, and with as much
keenness
as his brandy-stained face would permit, for the
approach
of one of their High Mightinesses and Supreme
Disposers
of Twenty Pound Casesthe Justice himself. There
was a constable with one eye gone, but concentrating in the
other sufficient spite and small malice to light up the
organs of four and twenty rattle snakes or more: and
another, a huge, over-grown man, in a dirty grey coat,
with a great wen on his forehead, who sate upon a stool
at a high desk, leaning over a paper and painfully casting
up the interest on a very small sum for a very short time,
and due and accruing from a retail grocer, both stout and
small; and, furthermore, at this time, sadly invalid from
want of funds.
Presently there was a bustle at the door; a great
rapping
on a desk in front of the bench, on the part of an
impudent looking man, who directed his eyes steadfastly
toward the door as he knocked; a tumultuous shout of
hats off from all quarters of the room, a rush from the
side-rooms to the door of that where the chief court was
held, and along came a little weazen-faced, crop-haired
gentleman, shuffling through the press, and making his
way towards the Judge's seat, into which he presently
dropped; and after wriggling about uncomfortably for a
few minutes as if he had got into the prisoner's dock by
mistake, and was on trial for non-compos or something
corresponding
,
he called to the crier, over the desk-rail, for
the day's calendar.
Recovering a little, as he became better accustomed to
his station, he began shortly to call order, and in very
doubtful English, required people to make less noise
in the outskirts of the court-room, where a great hubbub
was rapidly engendering; to which the offenders listened
with the most profound respect, while it was uttering, but
as soon as his voice had fairly ceased, proceeded with
renewed
animation, and as if it had been the purpose of his
Honor to cheer them on and encourage them in what
they were about.
Immediately in the heels of the Judgehe had walked
down with that functionary, that he might enjoy an
opportunity
to color his mind to the right complexion for a
case that was coming on that morninga marble-faced
man came in, dressed in clean black from crown to toe,
with a pair of vicious black eyes, and a chattering smile
as he entered. This was Mr. Meagrim, the marshal; and
glancing about to recognize his customers and
acquaintance
,
he glided out of the court-room into the clerk's
purlieu, where Ishmael waited his coming.
Ah! Mr. Small, he said, recognizing that
gentleman
where he stood, in a corner, talking with one of the
brandy-painted constables, what is it, now? And he
drew Ishmael aside, and dropping his voice to a stealthy
whisper inquired what he needed. They whispered apart
for a short time; and Mr. Meagrim, gliding away again,
promised to return in a minute, as soon as he had seen
the oath sworn against a brass-founder defendant, that
he might levy on his cart and harness as they passed
along.
When Mr. Meagrim had left, the brandy-stained
gentleman
22
returned, and renewed the discourse the
marshal
had interrupted.
What did you say this crape was for, Ish.? asked
the constable, glancing at Mr. Small's round-rimmed
beaver.
That crape, answered Ishmael, is a sign
o'mournin'
and lamentation, for the juryman that was killed
in the box, last week, by Counsellor Boerum's speech,
which was slow in its operations, you know, but sure.
Where's your weeper and Crany's and Jimmerson's?
Why han't all the officers got their weepers on?
There's no occasion that I can see, answered the
constable
,
nobody's lost any relations here that I know on,
this week: has there?
Hallo!what are you dreamin' about, cried
Ishmael, in well-feigned surprize, I thought your
judges was all dead. I understood this court, and
who'll deny it I wonder? was under the jurisdiction of
Judges' ghostsnot live Judgesbut Judges in a state of
semi-anymation and imperfect witality!
By the time the subdued laughter which prevailed
among the officers on the occasion of the ingenious
observations
of Mr. Small had subsided, Mr. Meagrim returned,
quietly interchanged a word or two with the clerk;
ordered Messrs. Crany and Jimmerson to follow, and set
forth in company with Ishmael.
When they got into the street, Ishmael and the marshal
led the way, and Messrs. Crany and Jimmerson, who were
a pair of ill-matched constables, greatly dilapidated by use
and age, trotted after. Presently Mr. Small, suggesting
to Mr. Meagrim, that he had a slight commission to
execute
by the way, dropped behind, with a promise to
overtake them in the course of a block or two.
Soon after, and when his companions were well out of
sight, he began to cast about, with an impatient and
ominous look; and in a moment, hastening to a spot on
which his eye had rested with unbounded satisfaction, he
stood at a baker's window: a minute after he was in the
baker's shopand, allowing him a minute more, and he
was strolling forth, holding in his hand a delicate
amalgam
,
formed of a slice of fresh bread and a slice of
pound-cake
laid close together.
The wickedness and desperation of the world is
such, said Ishmael, as he cut into the amalgam, that
it exhausts one's ingenuity and wits to make it go down.
It's not bad, however, and he cut again, if one could
only wet it with a drink of pure gin; without being put
to the vulgarity of payin' for it!
Now it is pretty generally known that there is a body
of thirty-four gentlemen, recognized and described as the
Corporation of the City and County of New York, whose
sole business it is, according to popular belief, to sit as a
board of Brewers, and whose constant employment it
likewise
is, for which they are chosen by the people at large
and held in great honor therefor, to brew and distil a
well-known popular beverage, which has gone into
extensive
use. Ishmael, faithful to the promise he had
made to himself, paused at one of the public stills, where
this drink is distributed, and lifting a long wooden arm in
the air, bending his head forward and drawing the
wooden
arm after him, with a good deal of dexterity and
manual skill, took a large, copious, and exhilirating
draught of the beverage in question. He then gracefully
wiped his mouth; and restoring his handkerchief to his
pocket, leaving a small segment only exposed for the
public admiration, he followed on.
Hurrying along, now that he was thoroughly refreshed,
Ishmael reached Mr. Meagrim at the Square, where he
was busy bargaining for the services of a cartman, who
being at last retained, galloped forward up the street,
while Mr. Meagrim and his followers, keeping him in
view, swept on.
When they reached the neighborhood of Close's Row,
Mr. Meagrim ordered the cart to halt without, and
entering
slyly with his train, took but a moment's glance at
the building, and fell to business.
Ishmael was despatched to the roof, with a handful
of nails and an upholsterer's hammer, produced from the
marshal's pocket; Mr. Jimmerson to the lightning-maker's
garret; and Mr. Meagrim himself, with the cartman and
Mr. Crany in his train, proceeded to the recusant cobbler's.
Such was the nimbleness and dexterity with which Mr.
Small executed his portion of the business, that by the
time Meagrim and his followers reached the garret, they
found the cobbler knocking his head and fists, like a
madman, against the closed scuttle, and threatening to
pitch his besieger from the roof, if he could once get out.
When he found himself hemmed in by other tormentors,
in the person of the officers and posse, his rage was
greatly increased, and he danced about the apartment in
an extempore hornpipe, more like a Huron chief than a
franchise citizen. Notwithstanding he saw that he was
overpowered,when the officers seized one end of his
corded bale of valuables, he fastened on the other, and
tugged at it, until they had fairly dragged it down stairs,
the cobbler asseverating that marshals and all such cattle
were a nuisance in a civilized community; demanding to
know what right they had to touch his property, and
pointedly aspersing the Legislature for presuming to pass
such laws.
Sweeping everything in in their progresschairs, tables,
stair-rods, Dutch oventhey descended into the precinct
of the bereaved mother; the cobbler shouting lustily after
them, all the way.
Here their proceedings were quite as summary
although
they were impeded not a little by the levity of
Mr. Crany, who clapped his hands upon his knees, and,
bending almost double, burst into a horse-laugh, every
time his eye fell on the wooden quadruped and
crapedressed
vase on the mantel; for which extravagance he
was sharply rebuked by Mr. Meagrim, who told him he'd
better stick to business; while the cartman, who seemed
to have a woman's soul under his cart-frock, privily
thrust, what was equivalent to his whole day's wages, in
the mother's hand.
In the mean time, Mr. Jimmerson, pursuant to order, had
proceeded to the lightning-maker's quarters, but coming
in at an unlucky moment, when the artist was in one of
his absent moods, he had scarcely had time to disclose his
business, when, by some cursed mischance, a large bottle
slipped off, and striking him in a most sensitive part of
his person, he was unceremoniously thrown on his back.
There he lay, agitating his hands and feet, like a great
green turtle in a spasm, until the lightning-maker, who
was up to his elbows in a vile yellow mixture, rushed
towards him, and, expressing a profound regret for what
had occurred, began chafing his temples, beating his
head and punching his body.
The lightning-maker was bending over Mr. Jimmerson,
when Mr. Smallwho had lingered on the roof,
watching
a market sloop that was sailing down the rivercame
down, and adding his own endeavors to the artist's, the
constable was soon put upon his legs, and they proceeded
in their business. Acting in the self-same spirit with the
others, Ishmael and his aid cleared the house, down to
the very cellar-floor, of all that came, by the most liberal
construction, under their warrant. Two wide gates that
led into the yard were thrown open; the cart driven in;
the goods piled on in a threatening pyramid; and perching
on the very top, whither he had climbed, with saucepans,
broken candle-stands, and rugged tables, for the steps of
his arduous ascent, sate Mr. Ishmael Small, presiding
over the whole, like the very genius of Distress-warrants
and chaotic chattels. Men, women, and childrenthe
tenants of the Rowgathered in the windows, looking
upon the wreck, pale-cheeked and hollow-eyed; the
cobbler, alone, holding his station in a door-way, and
manfully vociferating against the iniquity of the whole
proceeding.
The cart was driven off; Messrs, Crany and Jimmerson
the last with a dolefully bilious complexiontrotting
along, and keeping watch on either side; and Mr.
Meagrim
,
smooth-browed and unruffled, following, with a
hawk's eye, in the rear.
CHAPTER XXIII.
PUFFER HOPKINS INQUIRES AGAIN AFTER HOBBLESHANK.
Day had scarcely dawned when Puffer was called up
into the chamber of the little tailor. As he entered, in
quick answer to the summons, dreading some fatal crisis
in his disease, Martha was at the bed-side dwelling upon
the countenance of Fob with a fixed earnestness, watching
every look and turn, and ministering to his wish before
it was uttered; and Puffer, who knew that Fob had had
the whole house, in every one of its chambers, for a
nurse, and yet none so gentle as this one, wondered
whence she came, and turned toward the little tailor with
a question in his look. Fob, busy with other thoughts,
held spread out before him as wide as his thin, feeble
arms would allow, the old parchment, on which his eyes,
wide apart, too,were steadfastly fastened. He greeted
Puffer, as he drew nearer to his couch, and requested
him, with a knowing smile, to stand off.
You shan't come so near! said Fob, still with a
grave smile, I can't allow it. Therestand where you
arenow look and tell me what you see?
Puffer, who had been driven back by Fob's urgency, to
almost the other wall of the chamber, confessed, that,
with the doubtful light, he could see nothing worth
mentioning
.
Well, well, pursued Fob, rising upon his elbows in
his bed, and shifting the position of the parchment so
that it fronted the window, I must allow you a
sunbeam
or two: what do you see now?
Still, Puffer averred, nothing. Then Fob permitted
him to come a foot or two nearer, still without effect: and
at last, in a sort of pleased impatience, he threw the
Deed towards him and told him to read for himself.
He wants to show off his scholarship, Martha, that's
all, said Fob, who stretched his neck forward and
watched the countenance of Puffer. A glance had
sufficed
to show him all. There it was, written in a good
bold hand,
Hobbleshank
; and there was the clause,
word for word, as Fob had recited it, touching his child,
and showing, clearly enough, the tenure by which he
held his right. And now something of the old man's
hopes began to break upon him; as his mind ran back,
with inconceivable swiftness, he found he held the key
by which to interpret his sad snatches of talk; his wild,
melancholy cry that all was lost; and then returned upon
him too the pledge he had proffered to his aged friends.
He clasped the little tailor in an earnest grasp; thanked
him that he had borne in mind his poor wish that he
might do a service to the kind old man; and, returning
the Deed again to Fob, for present custody, he set forth
in a renewed search after Hobbleshank. There was not a
spot nor place where he had but heard the name of
Hobbleleshank
mentioned that he did not visit. Till
noon-day
he was busy going about from one place to another,
following out an imperfect cluewhen, having learned
that the old man had been a constant lounger upon the
wharves, spending whole days in looking up and down
the river, (with what purpose nobody could ever guess,)
Puffer spent several hours more, in going from pier to
pier, watching the sloops and other river craft as they
arrived
,
with the hope that he might have wandered away
into the country and would choose this path back. Then
he crossed the city to the piehouse where they had passed
their first night together: being told that he never came
there till towards dusk, he waited about, questioning every
one that entered; but dusk and broad night, even, failed
to bring the one he sought. He then aimed for Barrell's
oyster-househe had reserved this, with a strong hope,
for the last. When he had reached the oyster-house his
heart smote himthe cellar-doors were closed and a
faint light streamed upon the walk and up into the faces
of passers-by from the glass bull's-eye in the door. It
might be shut for the night. He knocked; no answer
was returned: knocked again, and the glass-eye grew
dull; he bent down and whispered his name; the eye
brightened at once, and he was admitted. Politician as
he was, he was compelled to stop and stand stone-still
on the steps, in wonder and amazement at what he saw.
The little stalls about the place, used to hold one
customer with difficultyand not that, if he grew too
fast and stout upon the choice shell-fish of Mr. Jarve Barrel
now swarmed with damp, dripping faces, as thickly
set as dewy cauliflowers on a wall; the fire was out; and
the rear of the cellar, shorn of its benches and small
square tables, had passed through a remarkable
transformation
;
the chief circumstance of which was that Mr.
Nicholas Finch, the indefatigable agent, was seated on a
stool, his legs spread apart, and between his legs so
spread apart, the head of a kneeling gentleman, of scant
apparel, bent down. Upon the head Mr. Finch was most
industriously employed, in spite of the remonstrances,
entreaties, and contortions of the catechumen. Lounging
against the end of the oyster-stand, picking off oysters
from a plate with a delicate touch and surveying this
proceeding
from time to time as his leisure permitted, stood
a young gentleman, chastely apparelled in white-jean
pants of a fashionable cut, an elegant blue coat and bushy
whiskers.
Hallo! cried the oyster-eater, at an unusual spasm
on the part of Mr. Finch's gentleman, you'r a purty
feller, ar'nt you, for a feller citizinwhen you know
towels and soap is the price of freedomblow me tight if
it ai'nt, Nick. The oyster-eater had small eyes and
stout chaps, and he smiled, with an oyster on his fork, as
he uttered these words. Mr. Finch was silent, but plied
his arms with wonderful diligence.
I'll take another, Mr. Codwise, said Mr. Finch,
looking up. The kneeling gentleman jumped to his feet,
rubbed his eyes, and walking off to a corner of the cellar,
took his seat on a bench the second in a row. The
oyster-eater
laid down his fork, pickd his way nicely to one
of the stalls, and taking one of the ragged tenants daintily
by the collar, led him out upon the floor, and giving him
an energetic impulse with his foot, directed him to Mr.
Finch. Upon this gentleman Mr. Finch fell to work in
like manner; and the owner of the blue coat and bushy
whiskers resumed his oysters. This was certainly a
lively subject; his outcries were much louder and his
writhings more frequent, and the raptures of Mr.
Codwise
proportionably heightened: so much so, that he
at last left off his oysters entirely, to watch the
spectacle
,
and smiled so earnestly, that the tears came into
his eyes.
Bear your sufferin's like a man and a gentleman, said
Mr. Codwise, whose delivery was somewhat imperfect,
but in a tone of patronizing encouragement. Split my
vest, but do'nt be cast down, because the fibre's coarse.
Oh! it's a glorious privilege, ai'nt it, Mr. Finch, to enjoy
the right of votin' an independent ticket. The
consolation
administered by Mr. Codwise was not quite
satisfactory
,
for Mr. Finch's patient writhed again at a fresh
application
,
down to his very extremities. At this moment
a plunge was heard beyond, from behind a faded curtain,
stretched across the rear of the apartment, and through
which a dull light glimmered and painted upon it
shadowy
figures moving within. A voice remonstrateda
voice, Mr. Jarve Barrell's, by the accent, responded, and
a second plunge. What could this mean? Could it be that
Puffer Hopkins had got into a branch penitentiary,
established
under ground, where new tortures and
fresh-devised
penalties were inflicted on the criminal?
When he looked at the men about him, there was
certainly
something in their gait to warrant the belief; and
when he saw the secrecy with which the rites of the place
were performed, he might have been easily assured that
these men had been guilty of offences against God and
man, that drew upon them the dungeon and the rack,
which Mr. Finch and Mr. Barrell seemed to be
administering
.
There was the smell of the prison in their
garments
and something of the dull fixedness of prison
walls in their look.
There seemed at this juncture, to be a struggle
behind the red curtain. Don't drown me, for Heaven's
sake, don't drown me! cried the first voice again, in a
tone of earnest entreaty.
Dip your head under, you rascal! cried the voice of
Mr. Jarve Barrell. Dip your head under, you burglary
knave!
Petty larceny, sir, whined the other voice, which
savoured strongly of thin soup and damp lodgings.
Don't spare the villain! shouted Mr. Codwise, who
had mounted a stool, and with a light in his right hand
held high above his head, was peering over the curtain,
Its burglary; I saw it on the keeper's books; its so on
my list. Don't spare himits good for his systemain't
it Mr. Barrell? He broke into a respectable house in
Fourteenth street, and stole a bottle of Muscat wine and
a plate of anchovies. I'll make a patriot of you, you
villainDon't you want to serve your countryEh! tell
us that, will you?
And so it was kept up: Mr. Finch dumb and devoted
heart and soul to the performance of his share of the
service; Mr. Barrell, coaxing and clamoring from behind
the curtain, with the resisters of his authority; and Mr.
Codwise dividing his time in equal proportions between
the oysters, the leading out of the men from the stalls,
baiting Mr. Finch's patients from where he stood, and
bantering Mr. Barrell's from over the top of the curtain.
At length the noise ceased from behind the curtain and
Mr. Barrell came stumping forth; Mr. Finch dismissed
his last patient from under his hand; Mr. Codwise's last
oyster had disappeared. The benches were full; and
23
there they sate, all in a row, in their sleeves, their faces
of a bright redbrought on by the spirited exertions of
Mr. Finch, and their hair flying all abroad.
Puffer inquired what all this meant. What did it mean?
He did n't want respectable votersfreemen, freshly
delivered
from bondage, voting an independent, patriotic
ticketcoming up to the polls in dirty facesdid he?
He'd like to have 'em show a clean countenance among
their fellow citizenswould n't he! What was better for
'em then than baths and towels? This was Mr. Barrell's
explanation, and it agreed well enough with a rumour which
had prevailed that prisoners were to be brought down
from the Island to vote at the coming election.
At the head of the row, there was an old window, which
being greatly battered and damaged by age, admitted such
currents of air as might be prowling about. The
gentlemen in the sleeves murmured at this, and
ventured
to hint that the cold was coming it rather sharp
and strong.
Be silent, ye scum of the earth, cried Mr. Codwise,
the moment he detected a glimpse of insubordination
coming forward, and planting himself directly in their
front, at the same time gently hoisting his shirt collar. Ar'nt
we making men of you? How do ye expect to be worthy of
freedom if you don't fit yourself for it by a course of trials
and tribulations? Look at me! Did'nt I risk my neck in
getting you off the Islandwhose your deliverer but me, you
bottle-flies? There's few rich men's sons would ha' done as
muchis there Mr. Finchis there Barrel? True, I might
ha' been sittin' by my father's parlour fire, eatin'
sandwiches
and drinkin' claretand what do I do? Why, I
hire an omnibus at an expense of three dollars an hour,
didn't I, Mr. Finch? and blow me tight if I didn't wait
upon youyou miserable wretches off the Island, as though
you had been so many Broadway promenaders of the
sexhelp you into your carriage, and bring you to a friend's
house for lodgingsdidn't I, Mr. Barrell? and now you
grumble about that winder, do you? May my buttons
drop off, and my boots run down at the heel, if I don't
give up politics and go into the shades of private life, if
I see any more sich ingratitude and beastliness!
Puffer looked at the speaker; saw how poor and
frivolous
he was, in spite of his trinkets and fair apparel, but
when he spoke, in boast, of the home where he might be
sheltered, a feeling wakened in Puffer's heart which he
could not subdue. He thought of himself and the other
together, side by side, and asked himself, almost
repiningly
,
why the vague hope that
he
might be one day
restored
to a home he had not known for years, should not be
fulfilled? Why, as in the other case, the trinkets he wore
upon his person were pledges of parental attachment
why the little trinketthe little broken jewel he had
treasured so long, as the sole relic of any parent's love
towards him, should not guide him by some kindly
providence
back to the happiness he should have known? He
wakened from this reverie, and turning quickly upon Mr.
Jarve Barrell, who stood by his side, he asked after
Hobbleshank. Mr. Jarve Barrell's information was
strictly
professional. All he knew or could tell in the premises
was, that the old man, in company with a stranger, had
stopped a long while ago and ordered a large supply of
oysters to be ready on their return, with sufficient beer to
answer. They had never come back, and the oysters
were kept till midnight, when a party of sailors
luckily
coming in swept them up. That was all. Puffer
asked no further questions, but climbing the steps,
thoughtfully
,
without salutation or farewell of any kind either
to the agent or Mr. Barrell, was in the open air. There
he wandered up and down two or three by-streets lost in
thought.
At last it occurred to him that he would repair to
the old man's lodgings, and seek information of his two
old friends;this might only give painand to what
purpose? Just then a drum sounded about the corner,
the current of his thoughts was changed, and he turned into
the next street. A boy, in a cocked paper-hat, (a brigadier's
hat at least), beating a drum with great energy, marched at
the head of a company of youth, who, fitted out in belts
and sticks, and bearing crickets and hurdygurdys in their
hands, tramped along, assuming the port of martialists and
sticking close to the heels of their leader. Puffer, with
others, fell in at their wake and followed them down the
city to the front of a public hall, embellished with the
full-length
of a tall military gentleman in a blue coat and
yellow
breeches, where, forming a line, they plied their
instruments
for a quarter of an hourand then marched
off. Puffer Hopkins entered the Hall; the great room
up stairs was packed close with citizens, listening
to an excited individual, who walked up and down
the platform, swaying his arms and foaming at the
mouth, as though he were in a cage, roaring to be let out.
This seemed to be to the crowd an entertainment of the
first description; but Puffer, paying little heed to the
orator
,
who he knew was going furious according to an
understanding
with the committee that arranged the meeting,
glided about the room, singling out a man here,a man
thereand whispering a word in his ear. In a few
minutes
,
keeping clear of the platform and coasting along the
wall out of view of the light, he got forth into the street
again.
Wherever he moved indications of the contest of
tomorrow
were rife. The oyster-houses and tap-rooms,
everywhere, were full; the citizens throwing themselves
upon oysters and punches, with infinite spirit all through
the night, and pausing only every now and then to form into a
group, and enter upon a discussion of the prospects and
chances of the day. Sometimes a grim boy staggered
by under a fardel of ballots from the printers; sometimes
a bill-sticker paused, and clattering his paste-pot on the
pavement, proceeded to embellish the wall with a
pictorial
and ornamental broad-sheet. Every street had its
public meeting in the upper chamber of a tavern, whose
windows glared with light. It was noticeable that in the
neighborhoods of the Gallipot meetingsthe friends of
Gallipot being in possession of the citythe public lamps
were well lighted and burned away in the most brilliant
and cheerful humour imaginable; whereas, in all the
streets lying about a meeting of the opposition, for a
furlong
or better, they utterly refused to afford a single ray
to any that might be in search of such meeting or place of
resort. Not only this, but it would not infrequently
happen
that a public well would be found to be sunk or
undergoing
repair, at the very mouth of the opposition halls,
affording a capital opportunity for curious geological
investigation
to such gentlemen of the opposition as might
be inclined to step in. Even as it wasas if to supply
any deficiency of the corporate lightnew lights sprung
up on every hand as the night deepened. In
committee-rooms
and other resorts all over town, men were gathered
about their tables, mapping out the work of to-morrow,
brooding stealthily over circumventions and manuvres
and strokes of craft; in others, cutting tickets and folding
them; in others, nursing the patriotic furor in innumerable
punches, cock-tails and cobblers. And so from every
quarter their dusky lights streamed upon the street
making
the air close and sultryand portending surely
enough the storm that was to break by morning. Puffer
as he hurried about, dipping in for a minute at a caucus,
for another minute at a tap-room, and again at a public
meeting, where they seemed bent on keeping huddled
together
all night long, seething and reeking and growing
more confused and more determined, the longer they
tarried
Puffer
waxed warm, too, and retired to the Fork,
with a head full of schemes and a heart all on fire with
the sure hope of a triumph.
CHAPTER XXIV.
THE CHARTER ELECTION.
The April sun streamed upon a city in the very crisis
of a fever, flushed and curtained all over with flags like
a mighty booth or tent of war. The color had apparently
all passed out of the red brick housesnow pale with
placardsinto the faces of the inhabitants. The election,
rumbling and foretelling itself for months, had come; and
while parts of the townwhole streets and neighborhoods
had the appearance of being abandoned and desolate,
others boiled and overflowed with life like so many
whirlpools
.
Each poll or head-quarter of the wards was the
centre and heart of streams that choked the streets and
blocked up all passage through or beyond. Banners run
high up in the air, coiled and twisted and turned about as
often as the politicians over whose heads they floated;
others, stretched across the thoroughfares, brushed the
hats of the crowds, and as they wavered to and fro,
helped to fan the fire into a flame. The excitement was
by no means diminished when the votersmany of whom
had been up all night long preparing for the contest
rubbed their eyes, and read upon the fences affidavits
(which had just come out) to the effect that Gallipot, the
candidate of the Bottomitesas they were known at the
canvasshad been a smuggler of British paints through
the custom-house for years; yes, British paints. Mr.
Gallipot's
enemies laughed horribly when they read it; but
when they had leisure to turn round and read on an
opposite
wall (it had been drafted, printed, sworn to, and
posted up almost while they were busy spelling out the
other,) that Mr. Blinker, the President of the Phnix
Company, and their own candidatehe had been put up
at the last moment by the oppositionhad murdered a
traveler fourteen years before, at Rahway, New-Jersey,
whose bones he had kept ever since in a writing desk with
a false bottom, in his own housethey grinned again,
but this time they writhed and twisted as they grinned.
In the mean time all parties were at work at their
polling
places. In all the lower region of the city the battle
went smoothly: the voters dropped in one by one, as to a
party, with their notes of invitation in their hands, and
quietly deposited their ballots, and passed away.
Further
up, and nearer the heart of the city, where life may
be supposed to be more rampant and furious, there were
constant outbreakslittle playful jetsall day long.
As these bubbled up from time to time and burst, fragments
of timber, branches of oak and hickory, were thrown out
with such violence and spirit, as to send voters of a
peaceful
turn of mind trotting up the sloping streets which lead
from this infested region; and when such voters chanced
to be of a respectable bulk and tonnage, they were watched
with no little curiosity and interest by lookers-on who
stood at the top, and saw with what pain and anxiety
and redness of face, they toiled up.
In another ward the poll had been constructed and
arranged
a good deal on the principle of a puzzle, which the
voters frequenting there were required, as an agreeable day's
pastime, to solve. First, you had to go through a long blind
hall, from the street; then out into a yard; then up a
flight of stairs, through a long, dark room; and then up a
ladder, when, in an apartment so small that its inmates
must have been got in by legerdemain, you had the
pleasure
of meeting three gentlementwo of them, who
approved
of the juggle which had been set by their own
party, smiling cheerfullybehind their green box, ready
to wait upon you. Here was a delightful recreation for
aged gentlemen of inactive habits, and delicate young
gentlemen in tight-strapped pants; an admirable device,
and it worked well, for the plotters polled two votes to
oneas they had a great run of sailors, from a
government
vessel in the harbour, in the morning, all on their
side, and quite as spirited an accession of lamplighters
in the afternoon.
But it was at the East-River poll, where Puffer Hopkins
labored, that the struggle was steadiest and fiercest; it
was the tie ward, where parties had in the previous
election
cast an equal vote, and the whole city now hung
anxiously upon its returns. The poll was held in an old
yellow building, its gable upon the street, and its front
facing the river; the voting room was an obscure dark
corner, reached by a narrow entry, full of crooks and turns,
through an old-fashioned door-way. Around this a great
number of voters had lodged the night through, to be in
readiness to put in the earliest vote the first day; among
them were the lightning-maker, whose uneasy slumbers
against the wall had betrayed themselves by incessant
cries of bring the buckets! and the cobbler, who had
not slept a wink, inasmuch as he had been engaged with
a one-eyed stone-cutter, in an elaborate argument to show
that the only debts a man was bound to pay, were his
grocer's, (a line of business his wife's brother was in,) and
his shoemaker's. It was a pleasure to Puffer Hopkins to
learn that the cobbler,a convert of his own,had
deposited
the first vote, although with such emphasis as to
stave in the cover of the ballot-box, and cause himself to
be taken into keeping by a couple of officers, who led him,
roaring and remonstrating, to a neighboring watch-house.
Before the morning was half spent, the election was in
full progress; there were men running up and down the
streets bringing in voters; others, housed in small wooden
booths or cabins, distributing ballots; some declaiming,
in high, gusty voices; some, farther apart from the throng,
calculating the chances of the candidates; and others,
even, who had withdrawn into bye-streets in the
neighborhood
of the poll, plotting the distribution of the offices
that would fall to the share of the victorious party.
Towards
the evening of the first day, to which moment, as
commanding the largest throng of spectators, he had
reserved
himself, Mr. Blinker came upon the ground, attended
by two or three hangers-on and runners, and looking very
grand and decisive. There was an extraordinary severity
in his look; although his coat, a faded chocolate, was
something
the worse for wear, and a thought or two below the
usual style of the president. This was odd; but presently
it began to be whispered about, as all eyes were fixed
upon it, that this identical chocolate garment was the cast
coat of a distinguished senator of the United States, who had
lately made a triumphant tour through the city. It was
soon discovered, too, that the neck-stock which Mr.
Blinker now wore was of the very same sable and satin
texture, as that worn by his eminent model on that
occasion
.
Mr. Blinker had made influence with the great man;
and this was the result. As he was watched, moving
down the walk majestically, making gracious nods and
recognitions on either hand, it occurred to the lookers-on,
that Mr. B. emulated not a little the gait and manner, and
assumed, as nearly as was attainable, the voice of the
illustrious senator. The spectacle was imposing but not
conclusive; two loafers, to be sure, bailed the air with
their hats, with such vehemence as to drive the bottoms
out; but the effect of this was entirely destroyed by a
couple of ragged young rascals, who had been put forward,
clinging to his chocolate skirts, and whining out the paternal
appellation, till they were dragged off by main force, amid
the shouts of the mobThat's a cruel wretch! What
a unfeelin' father! and so forth.
While Mr. Blinker spent his time in this way, strutting
about the poll, it was his native ward, and he had a pride
in sticking to ithis antagonist, Mr. Gallipot, honest
Peleg Gallipot, was all over town, in his paint-dress,
making interest, shaking hands, chewing, smoking,
drinking
as though he had been fifty men instead of one. The
Gallipot hacks and stages rushed about, with great linen
flags streaming to the wind, as though the horses had
votes as well as the half-drunken gentlemen inside,
and were anxious to get them in. Puffer Hopkins,
for one, was everywhere; haranguing; folding tickets;
diving into committee rooms; arguing on the curb:
was at every man's ear; had every man by the hand.
He seemed to have multiplied himself: every third
carriage-door
that opened, lo! out popped Puffer, leading by the
hand, a couple of misty sailors; a superannuated old
man; a Quaker that hadn't voted for nineteen years, or some
other wonder and miracle.
The first day closed; and at night the Gallipots and
Blinkerites, repaired to their respective quarters for an
irregular canvass of the result. The Gallipot party met
in the upper chamber of the poll, of which, as the party at
present in power, they had possession; and their meeting
was sufficiently promiscuous and piebald. Along benches
fronting the raised platform, were seated, cheek by jowl,
gentlemen in fine beaver hats, and tatterdemalions, with no
covering but their own matted and discordant locks; some in
broadcloth coats of the latest cut, and some in jackets that,
judging by their texture and complexion, seemed to have
been fashioned out of sweeps' blankets. The room was
full, so full that it overflowed, a loafer or two, upon the
stairs; and two or three men who occupied the platform,
and who had watched the progress of the voting, down
stairs, through the day, called over by turn, a list of voters
which they held in their hands. As they called, some one
or other in the crowd, would answer for each name, good,
bad, doubtful, as the case might be; the answer
being given by such as supposed themselves familiar with
the way of thinking and political turn of the person called.
This proceeding was kept up till the roll was finished;
which was no sooner done, than an ambitious young
gentleman
,
who had stood at the doorway watching its close,
rushed off as special express and post-boy, to carry the
result to Fogfire Hall, where it was waited for with much
anxiety. Two or three speeches of a highly inflammatory
character were deliveredthe meeting broke upand the
first day's work was over.
The sun, which had been in a fine mood all the first
day, shining like a great eye into all corners of the city,
warming voters into life like so many bull-frogs, rolled up
24
the sky, on the morning of the second, apparently as
good-humored
as ever. The Blinkerites were delighted; they
were the fair-weather party, and their well dressed voters
poured in in a steady stream for a couple of hours or
better; but when, towards noon, a large, ill-looking cloud
came looming along from the north-west, they began to
grow gloomy, and sundry of the Bottom leaders walked
round the corner and shook hands on the prospect of a
good, pelting shower.
It was a false alarm; the cloud, a mere gust of wind,
passed off; the Blinkerites brightened up wonderfully.
The tide was running strong and deep in their favor;
two to one, at least, entering the boxes on their side.
Troops of nice-looking gentlemen were hurrying in;
gentlemen
of doubtful politics were going over every minute.
Blinker was standing against a great empty hogshead, on
the corner, dividing the offices to his friends, who were
gathered round him in large numbers, in advance. Ever
since the cloud had blown over, (which, to be sure, they
could n't help,) the Bottomites had been horribly cast down:
what was to be done? Just then there was a shuffling of
feet in the neighborhood of the poll; a tumult in the entry;
the crowd outside looked inthere were officers' staves
crossing and clashing in the hall; great brawny arms
raised and brought down with wonderful vigorbodies
pushed aboutand presently the whole melee came
tumbling
into the street. The Gallipot leaders rubbed their
hands and chuckled;
they
knew what it meant; a
detachment
of the Bottom Club had been concealed under the
stairway of the hall, all the morning, lying in wait for an
opportunity (in the meantime amusing their leisure by
tripping
up as many inconsiderate Blinker voters as they could
as they passed in) for a decisive demonstration. They,
like their friends without, had formed good hopes of the
shower, but when the air cleared up so brightly and
provokingly
,
they could restrain themselves no longer. A
cat-call had been given, certain members of the fraternity
had forced their way in at the back-door of the
polling-room
,
others from the neighboring bar, and, first crowning
the officers in attendance, they had distributed themselves
about the hall and engendered the tumultone of their
little plans for re-organizing and reforming societywhich
gave such unmixed satisfaction to their out-of-door friends.
This blow was a decisive one; the timid and
peace-affecting
Blinkerites kept aloof; and although the Blinkerite
leaders came upon the ground in the afternoon, in tarpaulin
hats and shag roundabouts, it was impossible to recover
themselves. When the poll was shut, it was admitted on
all hands, that they had run behind, a hundred at least.
There was another meeting for a canvass, which differed
from the other in no respect, save that in its very midst, a
great political calculator rushing in breathless from his own
house, where he had been casting up the question, averred
that they were to have, unless their friends made
superhuman
exertions to-morrow, (notwithstanding present
flattering
prospects) a majority of only twenty-five, with a
floating
prospect of three more if the weather proved foul.
He staked his head on this result. Another express was
run to Fogfire Hall; sundry speeches of a still more
excitable
quality delivered: and the meeting dispersed
feverish and resolute.
The third day brought unexpected relays from all
quarters. The halt, the blind, the feeble, the asthmatic
came wheezing, and hobbling, and tottering, and groping
their way to the poll. Some poor scarecrows that
appeared
to have been mouldering away for years, in their
piece-meal garments, in out of the way holes and corners,
were led in by the hand, and stood around as though they
had been just dug out. Others, reeking and bloated, with
lack-lustre eyes, appeared before the green boxes, and
voted in the same manner as they would have called for a
two-penny pint of spirits.
The cauldron had been stirred to its bottom, and its
very dregs were floating up. Those that now voted were
stragglers, coming in one by one; but presently, a
sharp-eyed
looker-on, might have discovered that a more steady
stream was setting in, of a somewhat similar class. This
was Mr. Finch's second detachment, (his first had finished
their work in the various wards, stealthily, the two
previous
days;) his Island volunteers, who entered the polls
at intervals, deposited their votes and quietly withdrew
beyond reach of the officer's eyes as soon as possible;
going in, that was Mr. Finch's device, most frequently on
the arm of some gentleman of known character, who lent
his responsibility for the purpose, and sharing his good
character at the ballot box. One of thema notorious
pickpocketbut who had chalked his face deeply enough
to get for himself the sympathy of being a gentleman in ill
health, had even tottered in leaning on the shoulder of a
little parson, of an earnest partizan disposition.
Sometimes, as it happened more than once, when the
volunteer firemen of Blinker politics gathered in any
considerable number about the poll, waiting to put in
their vote, a violent fire-alarm would happen to be
rung out from a neighboring market, which soon sent
them scampering away: a fire in New-York taking
precedence
of a funeral, an election, and every thing else
but an invitation to a hanging inside of the prison-yard.
For these alarms, the Bottomites were indebted to the
bell-ringer
of their Club, who lingered about the market,
pulling
the bell at opportune moments, of which he was
advised
by a trusty messenger sent down from the poll.
The excitement deepend as the day advanced: quidnuncs
and inquirers came hurrying in from every direction to
learn how the contest was going.
As the day approached its close the creed of the two
parties broadened; their promises and professions became
more frequent and more liberal; their affection for the poor
the most readily reached by such devicesmore devoted
and fraternal. One party threw out the suggestion that a
poor man should have
two
votes, in consideration of the
hardships and disadvantages of his lot. This the drummers
and declaimers of the other party answered by suggesting
that if gentlemengentlemen of means and abilityhad
the disposition they professed to serve the poor, why
didn't they give 'em rooms in their three-story houses, with
clean basins and towels, and plenty to eat? Advancing
in this way in their proclamations and professions they at
last became so comprehensive in their philanthropy, that
certain poverty-stricken and simple-minded gentlemen
who stood by listening with greedy ear, flattered
themselves
,
that they and their families were as good as
provided
for, for the ensuing year, and went in and voted for one
ticket or the other, according as they preferred the fare,
lodgings and accommodations held out by either party.
The concourse about the poll had swelled steadily for
hours: the street was full; the windows of the
neighborhood
were packed close with heads and faces; every
look-out
place of the Head-Quarters itself to the very roof was
occupied by men, women and children looking eagerly down,
and watching the progress of the contest. There was a great
lumber-pile hard by, and this, too, the crowd had climbed
and now swarmed about its top. As the sun went down,
the crowd swayed to and froand there were certain
persons
in it who seemed to rock it back and forth as they would
a cradlewhen suddenly surging, with a terrible impulse
against the wall, it burst its way into the house, and
there was a cry that the ballot boxes were in danger. In
a minute the officers came hurrying, pale-faced, into the
street, where they were tossed about in the crowdthe
black-and-white tops of their staves floating about like so
many fishing-doppersthe mob swarmed in at the
windows
,
over the back-fence, through the hall (last of all),
and the polling-room was in a trice completely overrun.
At this moment Mr. Halsey Fishblatt, who had
prevailed
upon two or three sturdy men to lift him on their
shoulders, stood up, as well as he could, with such a
support
and
removing his hat, from which a cloudy shower of
newspapers fell, presented his face at the broken fanlight of
the entry-door. His hands were lifted up in supplication, and
his look was an imploring one. It was some time before
he could get a hearing.
Gentlemen, I do beseech you, I entreat and implore
you, as you value your characters as citizens and as men,
to restrain yourselves. From the imperfect character of
the support on which he depended, Mr. Fishblatt's
observations
were extremely irregular in their delivery; one
being given, as was this, with his face at the window;
and the next being entirely lost in the wood-work behind
which his head descended. I would ask any gentleman
here, remarked Mr. Fishblatt, when he came up again,
if he keeps a snuff-box? Did he value his privileges?
There were a couple of thousand persons in that crowd,
as far as he could judge, three children to eachthere was
a spectacle, was it notthe rights and immunities of six
thousand of the rising generation hazarded by the present
outrageous outbreak. He went down again for a few
minutes. The ballot-box, gentlemen, continued Mr.
Fishblatt, on his re-appearance, is the ark of our safety:
it 's the foundation of our institutionsboard, lodging, and
two suits a year to all of us. What would we be without
the sacred ballot-box? Where would stand your City
Hall? Where the old Sugar House in Liberty-street?
Where the Fourth of July? Where the immortal names of
Perry and Hamilton? Where
He went down again; this time for good, for his
supporters
,
learning that the inspectors had got off with their
boxes through a bye-gate into the next yard, and so from
one yard to another, to a place of safety, had withdrawn,
and Mr. Fishblatt was permitted to fall like a half-risen
balloon, among the crowd. The crowdwho had given
but little heed to Mr. Fishblatt's appeal, finding there was
no further sport going forward, gradually broke up and
dispersed. The election was at an end; the great contest
determined one way or the other.
CHAPTER XXV.
THE END OF LEYCRAFT.
Poor Leycraft! The belief which his repentant soul had
cherished for years, lay dead at his heart. One by one
every hope had crumbled; the boysuch was the
conviction
each unanswering face pressed upon himthe
boy was dead. To that pale young form, cold and
deathward
,
as to him it always lay stretched in the wood
there was no resurrection. It was gone into another
world, and seemed dragging him, by a gentle violence he
could not resist, after. The remorse, which though
sometimes
torpid, had been never entirely subdued, uncoiled
itself more and more and pierced him with strokes which
caused him to cry aloud with anguish. He could not be
silent nor at ease. He had fled from house to house,
lodging to lodging, where the horrible secret he was
constantly
urged to babble, caused men and women to fall
away from his presence like that of one sick with the
plague. Even in cellars and cheap resorts, where the
language of crime and wrong is a familiar dialect, they
avoided his conversation, and begged him, in God's name,
to ease his soul to parsons and magistrates, and not to
them. Even the grim ten-pin player had deserted him.
Leycraft's constant wakings at the dead of night, and the
dreadful reproaches with which his soul laboured against
itself, were too much for him. So he flew from place to
place; from employment to employment. He triedand
in vainto quell his unhappy thoughts, to cheat himself
of that dreadful belief of the boy's death, by constant
change of work. He was now alone, in a rope-walk,
where Ishmael Small's prying ubiquity had found him.
The Walk was a long, low-roofed shed. It was pitched
in a hollow, on the outskirts of the city, and was out of
sight of human habitation and beyond the sound of
human
voice. About it nothing but rank grass and odious
weeds, thick with thorns and death-white blossoms, grew
and pressed forward to the very door. On either side
the shed was pierced with small, narrow windowsits
whole lengthlooking out, on one hand, on a sluggish
vein of water that oozed through the hard soil, and on
the other, upon the field of shrubs and brambles. Here
Leycraft, at the earliest hour of the dayit was just
sunrise
,
and the sun, striking the shed on its eastern end,
filled the Walk with shadowsstood, his beard
untrimmed
and his waste encompassed with unworked flax,
giving him the appearance of a satyr.
He stood at the remotest end and looked down its
whole dark length, with an eye which grew blank and
unsettled when it found nothing to rest upon. Then it
passed from window to window back again, more blank
than ever; no friendly face looked in, not even the
miserable
picker who used to beg the refuse flax and ropes'
ends. He would have given the world if only Ishmael
had come and taunted him in the old fashion. And
then, with something of prayer and earnest imploring in
his features, he shot his glance into a corner, where two
wrens had held their nest for years, borrowing tow and
threads of twine from the floor, to build. The two wrens
were gone. Not a sparrow nor a fly crossed the unlucky
window-sills. A dread stillness was present, resting
like a cloud upon the roof and thickening the air. The
very Walk seemed to have gone into decay; it tottered
and shook like one in a palsy, as the silent winds hurried
past. What wonder if Leycraft's soul was appalled
within
him!
Lightnings blast me! he muttered, struggling against
the feeling that crept upon him, and made him cold to the
heart; What do they mean by leaving me here! Why
don't the sharks and indefatigables come and take me and
hang me? Here he cast a side-way look at the rope he
had begun to twist. I wish they'd send out the green
wagon, and treat me to a ride to the Tombs. Why don't
they? What do they mean? They don't know their duty
that's plain. I ought to be kept in a cell till this cursed
fever's gone off; and then I should be hung out to dry.
He laughed at the fancy; but it was a wretched, soulless
laugh, which betrayed him more than his words. His
thoughts took a new turn, and, catching his breath, in the
surprise with which another and deeper purpose than that
of yielding his body to the magistrates glided into his
mind, he went on now faster than ever with his task;
drawing out the flax, with a secret satisfactionas he
paced backward, along the hard cold floorevery
now and then putting forth his whole strength, and
twisting the strands as firm and close as iron. It was
wonderful
with what care and skill he framed his work;
choosing the cleanest flax in all the bunch, where there
was no spot nor blemishhis eye, in its supernatural
keenness, could have detected a fly-blowshaping each
strand delicately to an equal size; and twisting them all
so cleanly together, that the cord, as fast as formed, was
admirably round and firm, and not a thread or fibre hung
loose. There was a strange pleasure in Leycraft's look
when he saw how well he prospered in his work. But
even in the midst of his task a shudder came upon him;
his face grew dark and livid by turns, and his eyes
wandered
about and seemed to dwell on a terrible and
appalling
company that was present only to him. For a time
his hands refused to do the service to which they had been
constrained and struggled against it, as if they too were
endowed with a fearful consciousness. In this pause and
agitation of his spirit, he searched his garments, and
brought forth from his breast-pocket a small, square
parcel
,
which he proceeded tremblingly to open, fixing his
eyes more keenly and steadily as each envelope was
removed
.
His hand at length held disclosed a half-bracelet,
with its clasp; and while he regarded it he shuddered
anew, and writhed as in sudden pain. What was he to
do with this? He could not bear it about with him
longer; it seemed too like the child's voice whispering
in his ear; frail tress as it was, it held him fast, as a cable,
to the spot where the deed had been done; its brassy
clasp glared upon him like a serpent's eye. It seemed to
him now like the dead boy's legacyfor he had taken it
almost from his handcarrying with it at all seasons of
day and night, its own avenging conditions. What was
to be done with it? At this moment, and while the
question
demanded, every minute, an answer more loudly,
a shrunken and troubled face looked in at one of the
windows
of the Walk. It was the face of an old man, who,
full of an anguish differentah, how different, from that
of Leycrafthad wandered in the suburbs, many days,
and many weary, weary nights too, and who had strayed,
in the vacancy that had come upon him, to that place. It
was Hobbleshank: who, when he had gathered thought
to persue the person before him more closely, and saw
what unearthly look had settled in his featureshow,
white and trenched with deep, dark lines as it was,
like a scarred coffin-plate, it seemedrecoiled from the
window, and gave signs of retreating altogether.
For Heaven's good sake! cried Leycraft, in a tone
of anguish that went to the old man's heart, don't leave
me now. Stay only an hour or soif not so longfive
minutes may do; five minutes at least. Come, come,
you'll give me five minutes!
The old man returned to the window; but resisted
steadily all entreaty to come in.
This is cruel! said Leycraft aloud, and then, partly
to himself, The last man with whom I shall change
word; and he wont give me his company as a christian,
but stands there gazing through a window on me as if I
were a wild beast at a show.
At that moment Leycraft, who had bent down while
uttering these words to himself, raised his head and
caught the eye of the old manhis neck stretched
forward
its utmost lengthfastened on the bracelet which
25
he held in his open hand. He caught it back at once,
and restoring it quickly to its enclosure, thrust it into his
breast.
There was something fearful in that old man's face, now
that the light fell upon it;it was the very face that had
watched him all through the night, in the garret of the
farm-house, and against which he had contended. This
was another blow that staggered him on swifter to his
fate. He went on stranding and coiling the rope, holding
every feature rigid and bracing his nerves with all his
will, lest his purpose should give way. The cord was
finished. Leycraft rose up, wiped his brow, on which a
cold, thick sweat had gatheredwent to the window, and
while Hobbleshank could not move in his surprise, he
placed in his hand the parcel he had concealed.
There, said he, take that; it's a bequest from a
man that will never know man more. It's the gift of a
young friend, the dearest I ever had, and I wish you'd
make much of it.
He then proceeded, without another word, to put every
utensil of the Walk in its place; coiled up the rope he had
made with so much care, in the crown of his hat; closed
the windows, leaving Hobbleshank without, lost in vague
wonder and alarm; drew to the door, and putting the key
in a safe concealment where the other workmen might
find it when they cameas they would in an hour or
twohe withdrew from the Walk, which was now dark
and close as a tomb. He shaped his way toward the
river, looking back not once, but choosing the obscurest
paths and bye-ways, and following them steadily. Once
he leaped a wall, and crouching as he ran, he skirted
along the fence for half a mile or more, and then he got
into an untraveled road, where he made good speed, and
with a comfortsuch comfort as his condition allowed
to himself. In leaving this he was forced to pass a public
way where there was a constant throng of travel; and
while in act of crossing, hearing the rattling of wheels
from the city, he fled into a blackberry meadow, and
there lay hid in the bushes for better than an hour.
He was now within sight of the woods; and when,
emerging from his ambush, his eye first fell upon them
he shrunk back, and his feet for a moment refused to bear
him on. It was an instant only; and then he laughed to
himself at his folly in spoiling the good gait he had been
traveling.
At the woodsthe black, dull, hemlock woodswhich
lay like a dark stain upon the earthhe did not enter at a
point which would bear him soonest to the place he sought;
but fetched a circuit of better than a furlong, and looking
about him with a trembling eye, he crept into them,
as if by stealth. The sun had not yet made good his
strength, and the woods still swarmed with bats and birds
of darkness, which kept about and shut back the light
by the wide spread wings with which they oppressed the
air. Under foot the ground was heavy with a sluggish
sweat, rather than dew, and through blind paths and
among tufts of useless grass, Leycraft picked his way;
winding about in long circles and only approaching the
spot by degrees. His eyes wandered between the trees,
as though a phantom were walking just before him; if he
had cast a look upward but once, he would have seen how
blue and peaceful was the sky above himbut this he
heeded not. He had come to the edge of a bye-path that
cut through the woods; in a minute more and he would
be on the very spot itself. He paused and sate upon a
fallen trunk to gather his strength. What he had done
and what he was to do came upon him in all their
hideousness
,
and his heart misgave him. He would have retreated
if he could. At that moment he heard a step approaching;
a man passed by, and as Leycraft looked out, oh how his
soul begged and implored that he would come and reason
with him, and steal from his heart the purpose which clung
like a dagger in its very core! The cold sweat stood
upon his brow in the agony with which he was moved.
The man bore in his hand a walking-stick, with which,
with a determined look, he smote a tall weed that grew in
the path, to the ground. There was clearly no hope for
Leycraft. He sprung up, and almost at a bound, stood
upon the earth where, more than twenty years ago, he
had cast down a young child, as he would a frail vessel,
that all its life might be spilled and never gathered up
again. He knew the placeknew it at once, down to
the smallest blade that grew about. The rock was there,
under the lee of which the basket that held the child had
been set; the old gnarled branch stretched over itolder
now than when it shook its young summer leaves upon
the ground. Every circumstance and incident of the act
rushed back into his mind with a fearful distinctness.
How he had borne the child from the farm-house in his
armsthe very look of the nurse who had entrusted it to
him in the belief that a little air would be so reviving and
refreshing to the poor dearhow, when he heard the laugh
and prattle of young children at play in an orchard through
which he passed, he had repented of any part in the deed
and how, again, when he bethought him of the rage of
the broker, and the spite he would wreak on him through
the debtor's jailhe had burried on. There was one
good thought, too, that came back; that when he had laid
the child where he was to be left to diefor his soul
refused
to do it rougher violencehe had lifted a leaf, shed
by the overhanging branch upon its little lips, so giving it
another chance to live. He remembered, too, how he had
severed the bracelet about its neck in twain, taking one of
its parts and leaving the other, with the hope that the child,
should it live to escape its perilous exposure, might be
recognized and reclaimed.
As he was pondering, the dead child seemed to spring
from the ground, rising slowly upon him and growing rigid
in every limb as he rose, until he stood regarding him with
a fixed stony eye, his little arm stretched towards him in
menace, more terrible than if it had been a mailed hand
aimed against his breast. He staggered before it. The
wind, which had been gathering since sun-rise, swept
through the wood with a howl like that of an angry
populace
.
Leycraft, whose face and brow dripped with sweat,
and whose body was as chill and comfortless as if it had
been steeped in the river, cast a fearful glance behind
him, and snatching off his hat in desperate haste, he
stepped upon the rock, and made fast an end of the cord to
the old branch, which the tree held out like a withered
arm toward him. The tree creakedthere was an awful
groanand the forfeit was paid. At that moment a crow
flew screeching from a neighboring tree top straight through
the wood, and as it rose toward the clouds that lowered
on its flight, it seemed like the dark spirit of the man, on
its way to the angry heaven whose judgment he had dared
to invoke.
CHAPTER XXVI.
HOBBLESHANK'S RETURN.
Upon the ground where he had fallen in the shock of
surprise and bewilderment, Hobbleshank sate, with the
trinket in his hand which seemed to hold him spell-bound
and motionless. As he recovered his powers, and was
aware of the gift in his charge, he would have shouted to
Leycraft and called him backbut when he looked in the
direction he had taken, Leycraft was out of sight.
The clasp was discolored as if often held in a damp
hand; but the tress, its other part, was fresh and bright,
in its auburn hues, as when first set in its place; and as
he turned it over and over again, his tears fell fast upon
it, for he knew wellwho could mistake it?the sweet
brow, now lying in the earth, from which it had been
shorn. Then he recalled what the strange man had said.
It's the gift of a young friend, the dearest I ever had,
and I wish you'd make much of it! He repeated them
over and over again. Yes, those were the words. And
then a hope came floating into his mind that was like a
new life and air to all his powers; a hope that filled his
heart with a genial noon, in which all old despondencies
and sorrows and sadnesses shrunk away, and left him
glad and happy, beyond measure. The boyhis child
his young selfso the words gave him warrantwas not
dead. He had lived to be the companion of grown men;
to be with them, and with them share friendship and
intimacies
.
So he construed what Leycraft had said. He
bounded up, and choosing out the fairest of all the roads,
he took his way to the city. It was a green path; and the
trees, which had stepped to the road side from a
neighboring
wood, for that very purpose, bent over the
traveller
,
and whispered peace and a pleasant journey to him.
Then he came to bare fences, along which the small-eyed
birds hopped and twittered, making merry with the old man
as he came galloping along. After this, there was an open
tract of sky and field about which the swallows flew
swiftly, writing their names in the air, and tying all sorts
of hard knots as they skimmed along backwards and
forwards
,
and up and down.
At the pace, with which he speeded on, he was soon in
the edge of the city. The bells, for some reason or other,
were ringing a quick peal; if they had been the voices
of angels hovering in the air, they could not have sounded
more sweetly to Hobbleshank.
He came to a park or square, in which children were
at play, and bursting through a gate, he borrowed from a
little blue-eyed ladwho yielded it partly in fear, partly
in lovethe hoop on which he was restingthe old man
sprang away like the youngest of them all, and in the
madness
of his new hope, drove it round and round the park,
humming to himself, It's the gift of a young friend, the
dearest I ever had, and I wish you'd make much of it!
Leaving the park, with thanks to his young friend, whom
he had caught in his arms and blessed with kisses that
exploded like so many squibs through the place, he
rambled breathless, but by no means wearied, into a great
thoroughfare. Here he found new objects to feed his
rapture
.
There were caps and canes and dainty little
Wellington-boots
in the shops, in which the haughtiest parent,
the show-bill said, might be proud to see his son eating
ices and walking Broadway.
How often, ah, how often, during his twenty years of
sore trial and anguish, had the old man rambled from
window to window, from shop-door to shop-door, choosing
a little blue-tasseled cap at one, a pearl-tipped cane at
another, and the jauntiest pair of Wellingtons he could
pitch his eye upon at anotherand, in his fancy, arraying
the boy who should have been so appareled, and at that
moment walking, with a little hand in his, at his side!
He had so taken the child, from the day he was lost, and
carried him forward, in imagination, through all the stages
of childhood and youth, up to the manhood, where if but
now living he would have arrived.
He well remembered the very day on which the child
had attained his quizzical, bird-like swallow-tail, which
the doating old man had picked out and even bargained
for months before. Pondering upon these old time
pleasures
,
his feet had brought him, almost without the guidance
of his will, to a door in a bye-street, the red and yellow
board over which denoted that a select school for children
was kept within.
He opened the gatethe trick of which he knew well
walked through a paved alley, and turning in at a door
half way up, was in the very heart and bosom of the
select
school at once. The select schoolmistresshis old
friend and who knew his humour wellwas seated in a
well-worn rocker in the middle of her little room, arrayed
in her plain neat gown and cap, her book open on her lap,
her arms folded upon her breast, and watching, with a
kindly look, through her great glasses, the efforts of a
tiny, white-haired child, to master the twenty-sixth letter
of the alphabet. Hobbleshank laid off his hat, took his
seat at the side of the mistress, who had not even turned
when he came in; although the whole row of little scholars
stared in a line from the bench on which they were fixed
against the wall. They all knew the old man, but it was
so long now since he had been at the school, that they
could not avoid a welcome with their looks. What a
tuneful nestembowered in its obscure cornerhad that
little school been to him! How his eye had rangedas
his finger would on a musical instrumentalong the class,
beginning at the least and youngest, and sounding his
way up, fancying each in turn to be his child and son. They
had caught his look, and loved him for it. His joy was too
overflowingtoo much in excessto admit of his
tarrying
long there or any whereand so leaving a tribute of
good will in the mistress' hand, to be distributed among
the scholars, and begging in her ear for a half-holiday for
the school, he broke away and was in the street again.
Even the three gilt balls which hung dangling over the
broker's door in the street through which he hurried, and
which used to look so hideous to him, now seemed to have
a gleam of sunshine and promise in them. There was
another streetthe next to thisthrough which he could
not fail to pass. Here, years before, he had formed an
intimacya very close and friendly intimacywith a
clothier's block which stood at the corner, (to be sure it
had no head, your finely-dressed gentlemen rarely have,)
swelling and expanding its breast in all the splendors of a
blue frock and pantaloons, with a handsome white vest
and ruffles to match. The intimacy lasted six months
during which the old man had paid a daily visit to his
silent friendwhen it was abruptly broken off, because
Hobbleshank was quite sure his son must by that time have
outgrown garments of that gentleman's cut and dimensions.
Farther on, and still nearer the heart of the city,
Hobbleshank
,
hurrying along in a joyous moodhe had
directed
his feet that waycame upon a house in which, even
at broad day, there was a sound of music, a throng of
carriages at the door, and the very house itself
palpitating
and quaking with the pulses of the gay dance that
was going on within. The old man had a good heart to
join in on the very flagging where he stood, for the house
and he were old and early friends. Far back in that past
time, whence dated, in two directions, all his joys and
sorrows
,
it had been Aunt Gatty's; there it was that
Hobbleshank
had first met his young wife; there had been
wedded to her; and there had spent many a joyous night,
when the world was young with him, and when even
old Aunt Gatty had wealth and kind words more at
command
than now. As he stood by the door gossiping with
the drivers and other loungersgathering what he could
of the story of the wedding that was going forward, and
comparing it as he went along with the circumstances of
his own, his heart reproached him for tarrying there, and
withholding his good fortune from his two kind old friends
at home. Casting a bright half-dollar upon the ground
where he left the coachmen, who had been for a long time
scant of calls, scrambling for ithe hurried away. At the
good speed with which he moved, and by dint of running
in and outfrom street to pavement, from pavement to
streetnot less than forty timeshe was in no very long
time at his own door, which he confessed to himself had
something of an outlandish look, now that he had been
absent from it so long.
Bursting in to declare his news, he was arrested in the
very mid-career of his exultation, by a deep moan,
proceeding
from the corner of the chamber. Looking thither he was
inexpressibly shocked, and stood rooted at the very
threshold
.
In the corner of the room, close in the remotest angle
of the hearthbent nearly double, (ten years at least older
in her look than when he had left her,) and gazing into
vacancy, sate Aunt Gatty, clad in deep mourningeven
to her small crimped cap, which jet-black and fitted
closely to her head, gave to her features a pale and
deathly
aspect. At her side stood Dorothy, tending on her in
some office suited to her condition, and striving to soothe
her with words of solace and comfort.
The aged woman refused to be comforted, and thrust
her companion away from her, constantly ejaculating,
He is deaddead, and I am the unlucky woman that
killed him. Is this the way that I fulfilled a death-bed
trust? God! oh, blessed God! and here she moaned
and pined as in an agony that wrung her very soul.
Deal gently with me for thisit was not my wishhe
would go forth; but then I should have held him back,
even by force. Oh! my dear kind play-fellownow in
Heavenis this the way I have kept my promise? Look
not in God's book of records and see what is against Gatty
your Gatty, you loved to call me. Plague me no
more, Dorothy I have slain the poor old man: go away,
in Heaven's name, and let me die. Go away.
Then, while Dorothy stood by, weeping and wringing
her hands over this mournful wreck, the aged woman fell
away into vacancy, awaking only every now and then to
utter a deep moan, and renew her complaint.
Hobbleshank, who had regarded all these goings-on with
a bewildered look, could restrain himself no longer, but,
hurrying forward, stood before themhis hat a little to
one side, where he had fixed it that his friends might know
at a glance what mood he was in, and the great, square
breast-pin, shining like an illumination in the front of his
bosom. He stood before themhis doubtful eye closed
hard, and the other opened in full blaze upon them, a
smile on his face, and a hand extended to each. In this
extraordinary costume and postureit was some time
before
even Dorothy was willing to acknowledge him; and
even after she had admitted it was Hobbleshank and no
counterfeitthere remained his right hand still extended,
waiting to be grasped by Aunt Gatty. It was a long time
before Aunt Gatty was willing to look at him; and when
she did, at length, turn her head slowly about and take
measure of his person, she regarded him with infinite
scorn and repulsion.
It's a cheat, she said after a long survey, and a
26
longer pondering, you are practising upon me; this is
not my old friend that I am to account for; no, no. Don't
you think I know my good friend Hobbleshank? This is
some one that has stolen his garments and is trying to
play tricks with me. She returned to her old posture
and could be brought by no persuasion or entreaty to a
further recognition.
We must leave her to herself, said Dorothy, drawing
Hobbleshank apart; You will get back into her
recollection
by degrees. It takes days with her now to fix
and unfix a notion. She will presently fall asleep.
They watched her for a little while, when slumber,
coming in to befriend exhausted Nature, crept upon her,
and bearing her to her bed within, and laying her gently
to rest, they returned to the other chamber. Hobbleshank,
reviving rapidly from the gloom which Aunt Gatty had
cast upon his spirits, took a place by a small table that
Dorothy had drawn out, and launched forth in a glowing
description of the good luck on which he had so lately
stumbled. Dorothywho could not share in all the good
hopes which he built on the disclosure of the stranger
and the possession of the half-braceletdid nevertheless
strengthen and encourage Hobbleshank to go on in these
communications, by a cold ham, which she produced from
a closet, where it had stood untasted and inviting the
knife, for several days; and also by calling inthrough
the ministry of a ragged-haired and bare-footed girl, who
was always on the prowl for small errands in the great
halla pot of Albany-brewed and two dozen oysters,
which, the last being well peppered and swallowed at a snap,
added not a little to the spirit of the old man's narration.
CHAPTER XXVII.
A NOTABLE SCHEME OF MR. FYLER CLOSE'S.
There was not a phaze of the neighboring sick man's
malady, from the day he mis-buttoned his coat as he paced
his yardto which pass he was brought, being a
tradesman
,
by the fall of wheat from twenty shillings to ten at
a clapdown to that when he was laid shouting on his
bed, that Fyler Close had not watched. By the hour he
stood at his windowforgetting baker, blacksmith, and
haberdasher, in the earnest gaze with which he regarded
every turn of the disease; while the patient rambled the
yard, in its early stages, or lay strapped upon his couch,
at its height. The tears, the groans, the whims, the flights
and wanderings of the lunatic, were a delicious banquet
to Fyler. He meant to cut with a weapon of double edge,
and this sharpened it, both sides at once. The deed was
foundthere could be no question of thatwhich helped
Hobbleshank back into the farm-house whence Fyler had
dislodged him, by a master-stroke, many years ago.
Should he succeed in recovering possession, there would
be a long and heavy arrear of rents to be returned. This
would never do. The boy, to be sure, must be found
must be proved to be alive. Notwithstanding the bold
and hardy face with which he gave out that such as would
find the child must grope in the earth, digging deep, an
uneasy conviction that he lived kept crowding into his
mind. Vague rumors to this effect, traceable to no clear
source it is true, had from time to time prevailed. He
knew of Leycraft's death; Ishmael had brought in the
news the second day after. He had been found on his knees,
the branch bent and twisted from its place by an unearthly
struggle, his head turned to one side, as if regarding an
object that stood at his side, just behind himand his
hands clasped firmly together.
Fyler, on hearing these circumstances, had merely called
the man a fool, wondered he had n't taken poison, which
would have been a quieter deathand dismissed the
subject
,
apparently, from his mind. To be sure, he had had
an unpleasant vision the night after, in which Leycraft
appeared, on his knees, knocking at the door of his closet,
and begging, in God's name, to be let in. But what of
that?The dream had passed away; and getting up the
next morning a quarter of an hour earlier than usual, he
opened his door cautiously, and finding no such supplicant
thereas in truth he had half expected tohe put
himself
at ease.
Then there was the braceletwhich he knew Leycraft
had carried on his person for years, but which Ishmael's
stealthy scrutiny had failed to find there nowanother
clue to the child. The cloud, he confessed to himself,
began to thicken a little; and now he meant to clear all
obstacles and entanglements at a bound. In a few days
the forge was silent; the anvil uttered not so much as a
tinklethe broker had levied his judgment, which had
hung dangling, like a great chain, for months over the
blacksmith's head:the blacksmith's fire was quenched,
and his hammers muffled forever. A few days more, and
the haberdasherthriftless womanwas forced to send
her children out privily to beg; Fyler had swept her shop
with a comprehensive bill of sale. The piano in the
yellow house had gone gouty in the legs long ago; and
was now taken to the hospital in the square, out of a
movement
of pure benevolence in the bosom of Mr. Close. As
to the baker, on a close scrutiny of accounts, the broker,
finding a clear balance against himself of
four-and-threepence
,
with a fraction, thought it not expedient to move
him just at present. All that remained was the Row, to
show to the world that Fyler Close was worth a cent; and
Fyler chaunted a psalm to the tune of a rattling song he
had heard at a cheap place of entertainment, when he was a
young man, with great spirit, as he chinked the silver in
his hand and thought of this. He had finished the psalm,
and getting into a more advanced stage of pleasantry,
was striving, with whimsical success, to adapt some
common-metre
measure that he might recall, to the fitful
shouts of his neighbor; when Mr. Small came in, bearing
upon his left arm a pile of clothes, hung loosely over, and
in his right a crook-necked staff, with which he had thrust
the door open, and which he now employed in putting it
to again. Upon his head, covering and extinguishing
the glory of his own individual cap, rested a straw hat,
stretching out before and behind, twisted up convulsively
at the sides, and discolored and stained in every strand
with sweat. Mr. Small might have been mistaken by a
rash observer at first sight, as he stood resting on his crook,
for a patriarch gone to seed. The broker knew him for
what he was, and hailed him at sight.
This is a melancholy affair, Ishmael, said the broker,
shaking his head dolefully.
It can't be helped? asked Ishmael, while a lurking
smile crept upon his visage.
I am afraid it can't, rejoined Mr. Close; I do'nt see
how I can avoid going out of my wits.
Any how, uncle Fyler, said Ishmael, I hope for
my sake you'll not go so far, you can't come back again.
You'll be good enough to recollect that!
It's very painful, though, continued Fyler; Here
am I, Ishmael, this morning in full possession of all my
faculties according to human observation, equal to a
calculation
in compound interest, or the drawing of a
mortgage
with extra-conditions and policy-clausesbefore
night what'll I be?
I am afraid to say, said Ishmael, starting back and
lifting both hands as though to shut out a disagreeable
vision.
But I'm not, answered Fyler, twitching his whiskers,
a miserable wreck, an insane rag-picker; what'll be my
business? To go about running into gutters, and poking
street-pools and rag-heapsand I should'nt wonder if it
disagreed with me so much as to make me twist my face
and beat myself, and do such goings-on, that every body'll
say, `Fyler has lost his reason.'
I should'nt wonder! echoed Mr. Small, and at the
prospect of so cheerful a result presented so vividly, both
Fyler and Ishmael broke into a gentle laugh.
Was
he
in his right mind always? asked Fyler,
looking
up edge-wise at Ishmael from where he sat, allowing
his glance to rest a moment, in its way, upon the
garments
over his arm. Was the owner of these always
right?
Wonderfully so, answered Ishmael; The very
sanest picker I ever knew. He was a extraordinary
chapthat old fellow, pursued Mr. Small. He would
pick a couple of hogsheads a day, sir, and with a run
jump over 'em at night, standing on end, as lively as a
grasshopper in the first line o' business. He had a
ambition
above rags, and that was the ruin of him. One
morningit was a lovely onethe baker's winders was
all full of smoking rolls and fresh gingerbread, the
milk-wagons
was on the jump, and the red-cheeked
chambermaids
puttin' their houses into clean faces, like queens'
our friend goes out in prime spirits to pick a little before
breakfast. There was a big heap in Hanover Square to
be overhauled that afternoon, and the thoughts of that
before
him put him in such a flow, he could hardly hold in
for joy. Well, sir, he was a-goin' along all well enough,
till he comes to 'Publican Alley, and there he balked
he wanted to be an old clo' man, and there was something
up that alley that tempted him worse than a evil spirit.
He could'nt hold back: so up the alley he bolts, leavin'
his basket (which he begun to be ashamed of,) at the
mouth; he comes to a airy, a very deep but very delicious
airy, too, for there, as he peeps thro' the railin', he sees
that vicious old coat that was to be his undoin', a hanging
in its old place over the back of a chair, close up by the
winder; the winder was upthe old chap listened
there was nobody stirrin'he laid himself close up against
the rail, and stretched down his stick till he gets the old
feller by the collar, and begins to tug. Tuggin' was fatal
work; he was too wiolent; the gate he was leanin' agin
gives waythe gratin' to the coal-hole was upthe old
chap pitches headlong in, and sliding on his belly to the
very bottomcracks his neck. There was the vanity
of 'spirin' above his sphere! He was a bosom friend o'
mine; and as he forgot to mention me in his will, I bought
his hat and trowsers and stick and basket, from the
crowner's
man, for a couple of plugs, to remember him by.
They was cheap at that!
I wonder if they would fit me, Ishmaelit would be
curious to try, would n't it?
The broker lifted the garments gently from Ishmael's
arm, displaced the hat, and, possessing himself of the
crook and basket, placidly withdrew to his closet, leaving
Mr. Small leaning against the casement, his cap jauntily
cocked and one leg crossed upon the other, regarding the
broker as he withdrew with a look of the profoundest
admiration
and respect. It was capitally donethat he
could n't deny.
In a few minutes, during which audible laughter, kept
pretty well under though, had resounded from the closet,
an outlandish figure appeared from its concealments,
locking the door carefully behind and thrusting the key
in a pocket. It was n't the broker. Ishmael, unbending
from the posture he had maintained, and spreading
himself
,
with a hand on either knee after the manner of a
jockey making himself familiar with the points of a horse
on show, said it was n't Fyler Closehe'd stake his life
on itit was n't Fyler.
The figure moved out upon the floor, as if to give Mr. Small
an opportunity to confirm his impressions. They couldn't
be shaken: he clung to his first belief. There was the
old yellow hat, which helped the face underneath it to a
look so small and shrunken; then the roundabout and
trowsers, loose and flaunting, and washed by a thousand
showers and sweats and stains, out of all color; no
reasonable
man could have thought of going out of his
senses, (even from an overgrown coat and short pantaloons,)
into such an ill-assorted apparel. Moving up and down,
the figure, keeping a hard, steady countenance, proceeded
to fish with the crooked stick which he carried in his hand,
in various sections of the apartment as in imaginary pools,
and drew up from time to time supposititious strips of
canvass
and linen, which, with great care and skill, he
deposited
in the bottom of a basket that hung upon his arm.
Excellent! Ishmael protested that it brought his friend,
the picker, back so vividly before his mind, that it was as
much as he could do to refrain from tears. After
practising
in this way for better than a quarter of an hour, the
figure came and halted before Ishmael, letting the arm which
held the basket fall its full length, and in the other holding
the stickas is the established custom of pickerswith
its crook downward, and regarding Mr. Small with
melancholy
steadiness of visage.
I'm a poor old man now, Ishmael, said the old
gentleman
;
Very poorworth not so much as Mrs. Lettuce.
By-the-by, Ishmael, isn't it strange, Mrs. Lettuce has
never
called for that balance on the mortgage in the master's
hand? It was just three shillings and a penny, and it's
very wrong in her not to look to it. You should mention
it when you see her; it's flying in the face of Providence
not to look to her own. Have you seen the poor woman
lately, Ishmael?
Ishmael averred that he hadin the market.
What did she say, Ishmael; did she seem to bear her
fortune meekly?
"She said," answered Ishmael, who was bursting
with suppressed satisfaction at the masterly manner in
which the old gentleman was carrying it off"She said,
sir, that you was one of the greatest scoundrels that ever
went unhung; that you had robbed her of her radishes,
and 'sparagus, and stockings and money, and character,
like a heathen boy constrictor, she called it; and she'd
see, sir, whether she wouldn't have satisfaction out of you
yet!"
"I wonder what the poor old woman's living on that
makes her so savage?" asked Mr. Close mildly.
"As far as I can learn," answered Ishmael, "for the
last fortnight on b'iled turnip-topsnot such a very violent
species of food."
"Where does she get boiled turnip-tops, I'd like to know?"
asked Mr. Close, whose eyes began to gleam a little.
"They're given to her by her old friends in the market,"
replied Ishmael. "But they've cut off the supply at last;
it sp'ilt the sale. She'll beg a couple of weeks more with
an old cloak and red handkercher, they all say, and then
she'll go to the almshouse."
"The best thing the poor creature can do," said
Fyler: "I thought so long ago. She'll be much more
comfortable there than out of doors blabbing secrets and
ripping up old stories of no use to any one."
The interview with Mr. Small concluded, the broker
saying that he had a heavy day's work before himfour
squares, and better than a dozen streets to scourpulled
open the door, and went forthIshmael following at a
distance.
CHAPTER XXVIII.
THE BURNING OF CLOSE'S ROW.
At day-wages the broker could not have toiled more
painfully. Early and late, he was busy, with stick and
basket, in alley, highway and thoroughfare. He groped
every kennel, and questioned every heap in the ward.
After
a shower he might be seen hovering about the
street-pools
like a buzzard. If he had been a picker from
infancy
he could not have driven his trade with more diligence.
He was specially careful to ply his business where he would
fall under the eye of certain gentlemen, pointed out to
him by the vigilance of Mr. Small, as possessing a talent
for observation, and an obliging disposition in coming
forward
,
which would render them very useful in the event
of any little matter of Mr. Close's being brought before the
courts. This was a class of sharp-eyed small-tradesmen,
who were always in their doors, or at the corner, or coming
through a street, or passing to a ferry, or doing something
or other, which enabled them to be eye-witnesses of more
than half the stage-accidents, brawls, frays, and other
street-incidents of the whole city. As Fyler passed the doors
of these vigilant observers, he would place his basket on
the ground, his crook lying across it, and proceed to rap his
forehead with great violence with his knuckles; which
performance over, he would take up his basket and
proceed
to his work, knocking his brow steadily through the
day, at the rate of about three knocks to a square. There
was, among his prospective witnesses, one in particular
a dealer in crockeryof such an extremely acute turn of
mind as to have been known in a case of manslaughter
tried at the Oyer and Terminer, to have seen the blow
struck, standing in his own shop-door, and looking through
two bow windows, to the other side of a corner where the
affray had happened; identifying the prisoner by the
color
of his hair. There was a valuable man for Mr. Close!
and when he came along the front of his shop, the
knocking
was very violent and long-continued, and varied by a
succession of lively leaps over the basket, back and forth,
as it stood upon the ground.
Ishmael, in the mean time, performed the part cast to
him, by happening in the neighborhoods where Fyler plied
his calling, and taking occasion to point him out to various
doctors, as a worthy old gentleman, (reduced in
circumstances
)
a little beside himself, and whom he would be
sorry to see committing any violence, such as braining a
child or the like, they had furnished him with certificates
of his condition, and learning that he was a friend of the
poor old gentleman's begged him, in Heaven's name, to
take him straight to Bellevue.
27
One nightFyler had been missed from all his
customary
rounds that daytowards its close, there was a
portentous
cry sounded through the city. A flame, no larger
than a man's hand, had been seen to flicker through the
ground window of a wooden building, and presently the
whole city was astir. At first, two or three distracted
men, in leathern hatsthey had been the first to discover
itran up and down the adjacent streets, shouting at the
top of their lungs, Fire! Fire! Then a score or two of
neighbors tumbled out of their beds, and taking it up,
with the scantiest possible apparel for a public appearance,
hurried about the block echoing the cry. Then other
distracted
people, bursting out at front doors, which went to after
them with a crash, scrambling up from cellars or down from
garrets where they lodged, tore through the streets.
Presently
a reinforcement of men in leathern hats appeared,
rushing in wherever there was a lane or square or alley,
and renewing the shout. Fire! Fire! From various taverns
and rooms about the city where dancing had been kept
up to a late hour, certain young gentlemencasting off
their coats and leaving them in charge of their fair
partnersby
which, it appeared when the red shirts came to
be disclosed, that they were volunteer firemen in disguise
broke into the street, rushed distractedly about for a few
minutes, until they had fixed their gripe upon an
engine-rope
,
when setting forward, they aimed, with many others
in a like plight, fbr the spot where the blaze was now
mounting into a beacon-light.
The throng and tumultwhich deepened every minute
centred about a row of wooden buildings standing in a
back yard. The flame had a sure hold upon his prey,
and coiled round, striking it over and over again, in some new
and vulnerable point with its tongues of fire. Every bell
in the metropolis was now sounding, and new forces came
hurrying into the yard; the engines clattered over the
fence which had been thrown down, and began to take
their orderthe flame seemed to know it all, thrusting out
a broad red face from the windows, to welcome them,
skipping with a nimble step up and down the stairs, and
dancing about the roof and in the very eaves for joy, to
see so many friends about. The crowd swelled, till it
overflowed not only that yard, but the next and the next,
and all the neighboring streets.
The roofs, stoops and windows all about were filled
with faces that glowed in the flame; and even on the
house tops, far away, a single figure, sometimes more,
might be described standing out against the sky. The
hoarse trumpets of the engineers soundedthe hose had
been dropped in the cisternsthere was a thumping of
engine armsa thin jet of muddy water rose against the
flame, and the fire bounded up livelier than ever. The
supply had given out. The river was tried, and now they
would have gone on triumphantly, had not a discovery
been made to the effect that all the tall men on the engines
were wasting their strength in hoisting up certain short
gentlemen and half-grown youths, who had fastened upon
the engines, that they, the short gentlemen, might be in
reach of the arms to do their part in bringing them down
again. As soon as this was amendedby ejecting the short
gentlemen and their associates, in a body, peremptorily
from the yard, from returning to which they were only
restrained by the officers' staves that began to ply about
they made head. The inmates now came hurrying
outmen, women, and childrenbearing in their arms
some little worthless trifle, and casting back a frightened
look upon the burning row. There was one, a stout man,
who carried in his arms as tenderly as though it had been a
child, a glass case shrouded in crape, which concealed, as
might be guessed by such glimpses as the flame allowed,
what seemed some child's toy or other. Then a lean man,
with great staring eyes came out with a run, and looked
about him as though something had happened on a much
grander scale than he had expected. As soon as this
person
had recovered himself a little, he borrowed from one
of the companies a couple of fire-buckets, filling which
constantly, (although some considerable rents in the sides
and bottoms prejudiced his labors not a little) he did what
he could, running back and forth, towards extinguishing
the fire. They had now all escaped from the row except
one; and that one, (the stout cobbler) instead of
descending
quietly like a christian and good citizen, was seen
tramping and dancing about the roof like a mad-man;
throwing his hat into the air and catching it, with other
demonstrations of the wildest joy. He and the fire seemed
to understand each other well. They shouted to him to
come down, to little purpose; they sent up huge jets of
water, and these he shook from his ears like a great dog
that liked the sport. Even a fireman, who had acquired
a great name by his prowess in bringing old men and
women out of dormer windows down the long ladder,
and who had been constantly climbing up and down the
same and calling to any that might be lurking there, roasting
privily, to come out,even he had gone to the very top
round and besought the cobbler, in vain. In his own
good time, and when everybody thought there was no
escape for hima minute before the roof tumbled in
he came hand over hand down the lightning-rod fixed
against the gable, and reached the ground without a
scratch. Once down, instead of employing his time in
rescuing what he could, he devoted himself with
extraordinary
ardor to casting such articles of furniture,
bedposts
,
chairs or utensils, as he could lay hands on, into
the flames; which, hurrying from point to point, he kept
feeding as he would a hungry dog that had found great
favor in his eyes for the very force of his appetite. So
the cobbler kept the fire alive; and diminished more and
more the stock of property whose distinctions it was his
pleasure to loathe and help to level.
Whenever a rafter yielded or a heavy timber fell in, a
spare, old figure, apparently availing himself of the new
light that flamed up to the sky and fell back, reflected on
the earth, was seen stealing about, bearing a basket
on his arm, and in his hand a crooked stick, with which he
drew from the heaps small charred bits of wood and
worthless cinders, and filled his basket.
At times he paused in his painstaking task, and going
about to the circle nearest the fire, he removed his hat,
and extending it to each, in turn, begged piteously, both
with look and voice, for alms, a penny onlya penny only
for a ruined man. Whenever they refused him, as they
often did, not knowing him as the owner of the burning
Rowhe would turn away, and mutter in answer to
questions
which no one had addressed to him.
"You are right, sir," he would say; "the man's leg
was out of joint, and General Washington thought a
potato-poultice just the thing. Then, going a few steps
forward, he would pause at a heap, and begin counting
cinders into his basket, as though it had been so much
solid coin. Such as knew the broker heaved a sigh of
compassion
.
Fyler Close was certainly distractedgone mad
beyond all controversy. No wonder, they said to
themselves
;
such a blowmeaning the burning of his
buildings
was
enough to unsettle any man's senses.
Ishmael too was on the ground, displaying a
praiseworthy
and astonishing activity in his endeavors to save
what he could from the wreck, so as not to bankrupt the
Phnix Company at once! Every other minute he was
diving into the Row, at the seeming peril of his neck, but
taking good care to emerge at an early opportunity by
means of an outlet on the other side, which he knew of,
tarrying in the cellar only long enough to whistle such a
tune as might lead the by-standers to scamper off, dropping
whatever they had in their hands and protesting that
there was a goblin in the vault. And when at length the
flames reached the lightning-maker's loft, there was a
dozen reports or more in succession, a broad sheet of all
colors, blood red and lightning blue predominating, shot up
into the skythere was an involuntary clapping of the
hands on the part of the juvenile portion of the crowd
Ishmael stood by, as ardent, but more secret, in his
applause
than any. At the moment of the illumination
which had been duly announced in advance, by the
explosion
the
lightning-maker, who was still busy with his
impracticable buckets, paused in his labors, and looking
up, a smile crossed his pallid face. His works had gone
off to the satisfaction of his audience, and he was almost
content; although his wife and children stood in the next
yard with scarcely a rag to their backs.
This brilliant display seemed to have a peculiar effect
upon Mr. Close: for he ran about while its brightness lasted,
with extraordinary nimbleness pointing it out to every
one in the yard, and saying in a wild way, That's the
manhis name is John Augustus Jones, and he owes me
one and nine pence for tapping his heels.
How mad the poor broker was! The fire kept burning
although it began to yieldrolling up smoke and flames,
which, mixing together, passed off in a turbid cloud
towards
the river. The night itself was dark and gusty;
and the flames, at one time, driven hither and thither by
the wind, laid eager hold of houses, and sheds, and
churches, so that had not men flitting about with buckets,
driven them back, the whole neighborhood would have
been in a blaze.
But now it began to yield, and the broker moved about in
its flickering light. He was suddenly accosted by a person of a
bluff physiognomy, strengthened with huge black whiskers,
who, taking him by the arm, would have drawn him quietly
aside. Fyler turned, and, regarding him with a look of great
steadfastness and severity, requested his arm to wither.
The arm did not wither, but, on the contrary, seemed to
acquire, by the very behest, a greater tenacity of gripe;
which, when Fyler discovered it, he attributed to the
circumstance
of his having touched it with the wrong hand.
"This will do, old chap," said the other, transferring
his hold to the collar and drawing the broker about with
very little regard to the established usages of society;
"We've had enough of this. These buildings were
heavily
insured, and you're wanted down town on
business
.
Come, I know you well enough, Mr. Fyler Close."
"You lie, sir, allow me to say," rejoined the broker,
turning upon his assailant. "I am Barabbas, the king of
the Jews, and my mother's Mary Scott the clear-starcher
in Republican Alley. I am Barabbas, I tell you, and you
owe me for the whiskers you've got on."
"It wont do, uncle," said the officer, "It's a capital
fetchbut your primin's wet; you must come."
Whereupon
,
folding the broker's arm closely in his own, and
putting on the air of his bosom-friend taking him out on a
pleasure excursion against his will, he drew him along.
Some of the by-standers who had been moved by the
affecting manner in which Fyler had conducted himself
through the evening murmured a little, but refrained from
active interference. Ishmael, who had held himself
aloofand who, to tell the truth, had observed the eye of
the black-whiskered man more than once fixed on his
friend, during the fire, and who noticed that he went off,
and returned whispering with another before he left,
(which observations there had been, however, no
opportunity
to make known to Fyler,) Ishmael now stole close
by his side and pressed his hand.
Fyler knew the hand, and felt its pressure. In that
there was some hope yet.
CHAPTER XXIX.
THE ROUND-RIMMERS' COMPLIMENTARY BALL.
From the point where the peninsula of brick puts forth
upon Chatham Square, running or walking along its base
on the Bowery a mile or better out of town, and shooting
along its oblique side on Division-street, gliding
gradually
off towards the East river, at Scammel-street or
thereabouts
lies
the mighty province of East-Bowery. And
over all the region of East-Bowery is spreadholding it
in close subjectionthe powerful clan of Round-Rimmers;
a fraternity of gentlemen, who in round, crape-bound hats,
metal-mounted blue coats, tallow-smoothed locks, and
with the terrible device of a pyramid, wrought of brassy
buttons, standing square upon their waistcoats, carry terror
and dismay wherever they move. It is'nt the crape-bound
hatsgiving out to the public, as they do, that the
gentlemen
who wear them are dead to the great world of
watchmen
and indefatigables, preachers and practitioners of
peace and amity; nor is it their strait-skirted blue coats,
nor their brazen pyramids, that make them a terror to all
ages and both sexes;nor is it their independent carriage
in public, and the extreme freedom with which they sway
their arms. The true secret of their power lies rather in
the circumstance that they always rove in bands; that,
like the wolf, when one only is seen on the prowl, the
herd may be guessed to be close at hand, ready to rush
in and bear their brother through whatever peril he may
encounter, from the clandestine kissing of a woman to the
tripping up and desecration of the corporate person of a
mayor. Now it is well known that these classical gentry
have haunts of their own, where no small-heeled boot or
moustached face is permitted to intrude; that they drink
at their own resorts; grow temperate and moral in
churches or chapels of their own; and that they
breakdown
or pigeon-wing, where a white-kid glove would, at a
single waive, raise an insurrection.
And yet the Round-Rimmers condescend to join the
common world in certain of their observances; they have
committees, among themselves, where small men swell
into great, by dint of volubility and intrigue; they make
presentations after their fashion to distinguished men;
and give complimentary balls, where they get a fever to
a boiling pitch. It was, in fact, with these very objects
in view that the mighty brotherhood of Round-Rimmers
resolved on irradiating the head of Mr. Ambrose De Grand
Val with the splendors of a grand complimentary ball, for
the accuracy with which he had chalked their floors and
mixed their punches, and the skill with which he had
guided them and their fair partners through the mazes of
a winter's dances. Of course there was the calling of a
meeting; the passage of resolutions, very tender and
affecting as they touched upon the relations which had
existed between the parties, and very flattering when they
came to mention Mr. De Grand Val; and the appointment
of a committee to preside over the arrangements. The
arrangements were made. The night had arrived.
The committee, on which were several resolute men,
had determined on a bold stroke. They meant to have this
known, through all coming time, as the ball, the grand
complimentary ball, before which the lamps of all future
balls should wax dim, and all future committees of
arrangement
stand abashed. It should be a double-headed
balla ball with two great overwhelming attractions.
One of them would be Mr. De Grand Val, the
distinguished
beneficiary, whose head was already engraved
on the ticket, with an entire wheat-sheaf in one corner, in
lieu of the more regular accompaniment of a chaplet for
his brow, and a pair of long-legged doves, billing each
other, and going through a duet in the other. So far
good. In looking about for another, they determined, in
the abstract, that it should be a politician, an eloquent,
distinguished and popular politician, of prepossessing
manners
and agreeable address. Puffer Hopkinswho had
won such honor in the late contestwho was hand and
glove with several of the leading members of the
committee
,was
the very man; and Puffer was invited, to be
present, which he graciously acceded to, and requested
to be in readiness, by a certain hour, to be put in a hack
by a brance of the general committee who would wait
upon him to the ball.
Puffer, who was not sorry to avail himself of so capital
an apportunity to extend his fame among the members of
a powerful body, was appareled and ready to a minute;
having approached as nearly as was prudent to the
costume of his constituentshe dared not adopt the
pyramid
,
nor the flat locks exactly, but he laid aside his straps,
and garnished his hat with a broad belt of black ribband.
With the aid of the committeewho called for himhe
entered the carriage, two aiding from within by seizing
his arms, and two from without by placing a hand against
his person, and thrusting it gently forward with a
respectful
pressure. The supernumerary committee-manfour
insidemounted the box with the driver; the coach
whirled away; and, at a rattling pace, they were soon at the
mouth of the Bowery or Vauxhall Gardensthe royal
pleasure
-ground
of the Round Rimmersthe extreme limit of
their territory on the westwhere the Grand
Complimentary
Ball was to be given. Two large variegated lamps
blazed in the front of the gate, to the admiration of one or two
hundred observant boys; the blast of the trumpedevidently
blown by a short-winded gentleman, from teh intermittent
nature of his pealsburst forth; and Puffer entering, was
overwhelmed with the gorgeousness and splendor of the
spectacle that broke upon him. In the first place, the
Garden, to which he was a stranger, was filled with
treeswhich was a novelty in a New-York public garden
some short and bushy, others tall and trim, but actual
trees; then there were a thousand eyes or better lurking
and glaring out in every direction, in the shape of blue
and yellow and red and white lamps, fixed among the
trees and against the stalls; then there was a fountain;
and then, through two rows of poplars, commanding a
noble perspective of two white chimney-tops in the rear,
there stretched a floorthe ball-room floor itself. He had
no further opportunity for observation, for the committee,
hurrying him away lest he should be seen before the
proper time for his presentation to the company had
arrived
28
bore him to a small room aside, where he found a
separate pitcher of lemonade and an honorary paper of
sandwiches devoted to himself, partaking of which, and
being allowed time to smooth his locks and dust his
pumps, he was carried forth into the air again. This time
he was borne by the committeewho stud: close to his
personinto a private path, so dart; and shady that a
deed of blood might have been quietly clone upon him ;
winding in and out among the shrubs whenever any
of the companythe more tender-hearted of whom
affected
the place in couplesuntil they reached the
extremity
of the garden opposite that at which they had
entered
.
The chairman of the committee gave a low
whistlethere was a burst of music from the orchestra,
who swarmed in a box mid-way among the trees, like so
many robin redbreasts, and Puffer found himself upon a
platform
,
his hat in his hand, his hand upon bis waistcoat
where his heart lay, bowing to a large assemblage of both
sexes, who stood gathered upon the floor waving
handkerchiefs
and shouting, shrieking and hallooing a whole
menagerie of welcomes. An acute ear might have
detected
,
in the pauses of this tumult, a sound arising in a
remote
quarter of the garden, resembling, not a little, the blows
a stout-handed cooper deals upon his kegs when he is
anxious to fix or unfix their hoops; thither two ambitious
members of the committee, who had been unable to agree
which should have the honor of attending Mr. Hopkins
upon the platform, had, by the advice of mutual friends,
withdrawn, and in a stall, by the light of three or four blue
and yellow lamps, were proceeding to settle the point
according
to the established custom and usages of
Round-Rimmers
.
From his elevated position Puffer commanded a view
of the entire spectacle as it moved forward. Upon the
floor, arranged in sets of eight eachwhich had been
momentarily
disturbed by his reception, and which were now
re-formedwere a great number of young gentlemen in
fancy pantaloons of corduroy, white jean and Nankin close
at the knee and flaunting at the ankle, collars rolled tight
under the chin over parti-colored neckerchiefs of emphatic
blue or red, the smoothed locks cropped close behind, and
the customary brass-mounted coats, ornamented with
cauliflowers
or large monthly roses at the button-holes, and at
their sides an equal number of young ladies, some of
whom were red-nosed and flat-breasted, and others of a
rounded form and great beauty of featurein dazzling
calicoes, dangling earrings that shone through the night
like fire-flies, kerchiefs of an equally emphatic hue spread
upon their breast, and ringlets disposed upon their brow
with a glossy smoothness that emulated their partners.
The gentlemen stood with their arms a-kimbo on their
hips; the ladies doing homage to their lieges with faces
turned smilingly upon them. The band struck up
the couples dashed off, throwing out limbs, with an
unexampled
vigor in every directionthe gentlemen thumping
the floor with their heels at every descentthe ladies
mounting
into the air and whizzing about, till the dangling rings
buzzed through the trees like fire-flies on the wing.
Sometimes
a gentleman in the furor of his zeal came spanking
upon the floor; sometimes a lady, losing balance in the
heat of her motion, dashed headlong into the ruffles of one
of the stationary young gentlemen off duty, who were
gathered in groups about the edges of the dance.
Suddenly
there was an abrupt pause in the orchestra, every
instrument
down to the triangle stood still, and the
company, looking up, in wonder of the cause, saw that
the orchestra to a man was standing, and that every eye
was fixed with painful earnestness upon the other end of
the floor. The beneficiarythe illustrious De Grand
Val had come in sight. He was in the hands of the
committee
;
and the committee were coming along as fast as
the crowd that hung upon their progress would allow them.
Every now and then, a face, smiling and black-whiskered,
was just visible for a moment and disappeared again in
the throng: then a hand might be discovered touching the
smiling face and flying off from it, as in a sort of
playful
or affectionate spasm. This by no means helped to
abate the enthusiasm; the orchestra was excited beyond
bounds. The trombone had climbed a tree and was
shaking down lamps and green caterpillars ever so fast,
in a disordered state of mind, brought on by
over-excitement
.
With many pausesby slow stagesthey had
reached the head of the floor, where certain gentlemen,
with blue ribbands at their button holes, who had
restrained
themselves with difficulty, rushed down the floor, and
seizing Mr. De Grand Val, whose body was springing
back and forth, in a series of remarkable congees at the
rate of forty a minute, tore him away, and bore him to the
foot of the platform, from which Puffer and his
committee
hung, watching their proceedings, with a wonderful
intensity
of interest. De Grand Val was at length got upon
the stairs, so that lie was just above the heads; and then
when those immortal legs burst into full view, the ardor,
which had kept in some sort of limits, burst into
demonstrations
of affectionate admiration that were touching to
behold. The young gentlemen clapped their hands, and
made inward comparisons with their ownthe young
ladies
sighed, and threw up their pocket-handkerchiefs.
Once upon the stage, a most agreeable and imposing
interview
passed between the master and Puffer
Hopkins
,
in which each bore himself to the entire satisfaction
of the company: Mr. De Grand Val advanced a step or
two, a gentleman in a blue ribband suddenly appeared
from the other side, advanced a step or two and paused.
Something was coming: for Mr. De Grand Val hung his
head and produced his pocket-handkerchief.
There was a dead silence; every eye in the placeeven
the cross-eyed waiter's that always served the creams in
one box and the spoons in the oppositewas fixed upon the
gentleman in a blue ribband. He had a small parcel in his
left hand and his right was advanced.
"Respected Sir:" began the gentleman in the blue
ribband, securing the parcel with a fresh hold"I beg, on
behalf of my associates and self," here he looked hurriedly
about to other gentlemen in blue ribbands at his side, "to
present to you the gift enclosed in the wrapper which I
hold in my hand. The pair of satin smalls which I now
present to you, are the medium through which we wish to
convey to you our sense of the delicate and distinguished
manner in which you have performed the arduous duties
you have undertaken for our benefit and our advancement.
We present them to you as they came from the hands of
that ingenious artist, James Jones, of 143 Cannon-street,
unaltered and unsullied. We give them to you as
emblematical
of the many hours we have passed together, in
similar and kindred garments, beguiling life of its
tediousness
and dissipating the midnight winter-strained. The
smalls are three feet in length, have two feet six inches
breadth of beam and front, and carry one person. Other
causes than the mere desire of seeing you clothed, have led
to the construction of the great work now before us; they
have been built not only to warm your limbs, but also to
gratify the eyes of your affectionate scholars and friends.
The importance of having the seams made secure and the
buttons well-fastened, was awfully demonstrated in the
case of Mr. Wail, whose pantaloons, being inadequately
constructed, burst open, as you may recollect, the season
before last, in the presence of one hundred and eighty
scholars, in no less than five distinct rents. The late Mr.
Larkin was also a sufferer in the same way; but not to
quite the same extent. In presenting you these smalls I
wish to call your attention to some of their peculiar and
characteristic features. Examine themthey are not
breechesthey are not trowsersthey are not slops.
They have neither open-bottoms nor straps; but what is
most singular, they have neither a hind pocket nor side
pocketnot even a place to put a watch in. I desire now,
to express an individual wish. As boy and man I have
witnessed the devotion and personal sacrifices with which
you have flown about your ball-rooms, rending your linen
for the pleasure and gratification of your fellow-citizens.
But I have witnessed too, with sorrow, what individual
mortification and discomfort you, with others, have brought
upon yourself by sitting thoughtlessly down on dusty
chairs and unclean benches. The wish which I ardently
offer is, that while you employ these smalls in dancing to
the delight of our whole community, they may be associated
in your mind only with what is pure and agreeable,
disdaining
any familiarities with Windsor soap and
washing-tubs
.
In conclusion, I take the liberty on behalf of our
company generally, in saying that we feel ourselves
honored by the presence of Puffer Hopkins, Esq., our
distinguished friend and fellow-citizen. We do not show
him sky-rockets and Bengola lights, but we show him that
James Jones has been busy in the arts of peace, with a
view to promote the comfort of our beloved preceptor,
Mr. De Grand Val. Accept these smalls.
The gentleman in the blue ribband advanced a step or
two again  Mr. De Grand Val likewise advanced a step
or two. Mr. De Grand Val was in possession of the
parcel. He cast his eye down upon the wrapper  then
he turned enchantingly and looked about with a
comprehensive
smile  which opened his whiskers and disclosed
his teeth and embraced all parties present, on the
platform
and off, both sexes, and even an interloper who stood
gazing from the remotest end of the floor. There was a
dead silence again. Mr. De Grand Val was about to
reply.
"Ladies and Gentlemen:" said Mr. De Grand Val,
deeply moved, "I accept this token in the spirit in which
it is given. I regard it  and shall always regard it  as
an evidence of your devoted attachment, tried principles
and prompt payments, as long as I live. Whenever I
look at them, whenever I wear them, I shall call to mind
the spirit with which you have availed yourself of my
instructions  the promptitude with which you have cashed
my quarterly bills. They and I shall be inseparable,
provided
,
as I have an abiding conviction, they fit. They
will serve  how happily!  to recall to me the purity of the
young ladies whom I have instructed, the manliness of the
young gentlemen." Here there began to be a movement
of applause. "By saying this, however, ladies and
gentlemen
,
I do not mean that I shall always wear these satin
smalls. No,no. God forbid that I should ever be seen
performing the ordinary duties of life in these precious
garments, your affectionate gift. Distant be the time
when it shall be said that Ambrose De Grand Val was
known to have had on his smalls, riding a trotting match
on the avenue, or mixing slings at Fogfire Hall, or
climbing
a sloop's mast on the East river. I shall reserve them,
ladies and gentlemen  and I think you have anticipated
me in this statement  for more select and dignified
occasions
.
I think I may venture to wear them at a wedding ?"
("You may," from a large portion of the
audience
.),
"But not on a fishing excursion ?" ("No, no,
shrimps and salt-water is fatal!") "On the shady side
of the Bowery?" ("To be sure.") But not to church
that would'nt do." And Mr. De Grand Val laughed
aloud, as much as to say, "That's a good one!"  "But,
ladies and gentlemen, I am afraid I shall be compelled to
make an exceptiona single exceptionas to the rule I
have laid down for myself in the use of these smalls. I
have a friend, ladies and gentlemen, a dear friend, a
former
pupil of mineknown to some of youwho in a
moment
of unrestrained hilarity, playfully thrust a
caseknife
,
which he happened to have about him, a couple of
inches or so into the body of a thick-headed watchman;
this trifling circumstance has called the attention of the
state towards him; the state wants him up the river, and
when he's called for he asks, as a favor, that I will go up
with him. I know how gratifying it will be to our friend
to see me in these smalls, and now, ladies and gentlemen,
as a parting favor, I ask to be permitted to use them on
that occasion! At this there was an universal response,
In courseBy all meansand so forth, to which
Mr. De Grand Val bowed in his best manner, and ended
by laying his hand upon his breast, and uttering in a
heartbroken
voice, Ladies and gentlemen, I thank you!
There was scarcely a dry eye in the garden. At the
moment
when Mr. De Grand Val was discovered with the
wrapper under his arm, descending the platform with the
committee, twelve cotillionsspread along the floor
burst into a dance expressive of tumultuous joy. Puffer
kept his station on the platform, surveying the dance, his
thumbs thrust politician-wise in the arm-holes of his vest
and his eye ranging along from set to setwhen suddenly
it came upon an object which fixed it as firmly in his head
as if it had been an eye of stone. A dark-eyed young
lady, only three sets from the stage, of great personal
attractions
,
stood facing a great sturdy-shouldered fellow,
who seemed to be her partner in the dance, (although
Puffer
would not believe it,) and where the light of more than
a dozen lamps fell upon her face. He could not be
mistaken
.
It wasit must be the dark-eyed young lady he
had met at Mr. Fishblatt's entertainment. He stepped
from the platform and lounged down the floor in company
with a member of the committee. He thought he would
like to confirm his impressions by her voice; in that he
could not err, for he recollected, now that his head swayed
that way, there were tones in it that could not be
counterfeit
or delusive.
'Fine weather for young ducks," said the dark-eyed
young lady.'
"Not bad neither for heifers and bullocks," said the
sturdy-shouldered young gentleman. "Speaking of
bullocks
,
if Bill Winship don't keep inside his chalk I'll cut
his plumb for him." And he glanced at a young
gentleman
of a brawny build, who was working his way with
might and main, through a complicated figure.
"Bill!Bill Winship, come over here!" cried the
dark-eyed young lady across the floor, as soon as Mr.
Winship had achieved his position again. "Joe Marsh's
distributing knuckle soup, to-night, and he wants you to
take a sup."
"Never mind quite yet," cried the sturdy-shouldered
young gentleman, Mr. Marsh himself; "only don't you
throw your legs quite so much ox-fashion or knockin'-down
time'll come afore to-morrow daylight! That's all!"
The dark-eyed young lady and the sturdy-shouldered
young gentleman laid their heads together and conferred
in a dialect which was in a great measure unintelligible to
Puffer Hopkins, but having reference, as he saw by their
glances, to the young gentleman across the floor who kept
dancing beyond his chalk in spite of the friendly warning
of Mr. Marsh. As soon as he could address the young
lady, without rashly invading the privacy of her interview
with Mr. Joe Marsh, Puffer came forward and, begging her
hand for the next dance,' took the place of the
sturdy-shouldered
Marsh, who withdrew, tugging very fiercely at
the ties of his neckcloth, evidently meditating summary
death, either to himself or his brawny opposite. The
dark-eyed
young lady immediately entered upon conversation
with Pufferreferred to the entertainment at Mr.
Fishblatt's
,
not forgetting Alderman Crump nor Mr. Blinker;
touched pleasantly upon their wanderings on the way to
her residence; came down to the present Ball, glanced at
its striking points, and all in very chaste, appropriate and
elegant language, which startled Puffer not a little when
contrasted with her discourse with Mr. Joseph Marsh. Who
was the young lady? What was she? There was
evidently
a mystery about her. She had two tongues like
the double-headed heifer at the show; and now that he looked
more closely, she was dressed in a style quite as singular
and composite. A part of her dressher gown and shawl,
folded over the breast, were in the very height of the
Round-Rimmers' fashion; but, then, about her neck there
was a delicate necklace of pearl and her hair hung from
her brow, in fair, glossy curls that leaped like the young
tendrils of the vine in the spring breeze, at every motion of
the dance.
The Ball went on with unabated spirit. Puffer
Hopkins
and his partner bounded forward; chassd;
dosa-dos'd
,
and balancd with a vigor and accuracy that were
the delight of the whole set.
I balanc for you, said the dark-eyed young lady, as
soon as it was their turn to rest. I chassz and forward
across for my father.
What could this mean? The mystery was deepening
and the dark-eyed young lady brightened into clearer and
fairer beauty every minute. He ventured to ask if her
father was in the gardens. Oh, no: he was at home
studying
the gazetteer. There was no opportunity for further
questions, for at that moment a figure encased in white
came bounding up the floorthe dancers opening and
forming a line on either side and clapping their hands
with great earnestness, as he came along. There seemed
to be no point or pitch at which you could say, the
excitement
is at its height. De Grand Val had come upon
the floor (having privily withdrawn for that very purpose)
in his presentation satin smalls! How well they fitted
him! What a figure! What motions!
De Grand Val begged them, if they loved him, to
reform
at oncehe couldn't bear to see them idleand
taking his place at the head of the first set at the very top
of the floor, he struck into the dance. Were there ever
such leaps, such pirouettes, such graceful turnings of a
partner, such pigeon-wings! Every eye was upon him
and when, in the enthusiasm of art he sprung into the
air, tossing his skirts almost over his ears, there was
visible
on the waistband of his smalls, an inscription worked
in with black silk, Presented to Ambrose De Grand Val
by his affectionate and admiring pupilsthere was
another
thrill, deeper, stronger, more like electricity than any
yet! The excitement
was
now at its height. The
orchestra
was in a state of extraordinary fervor; the bass
29
drum roared and rumbled out of all bounds; the violin
snapped a string in its excessive agitation and hurry; the
trombone and triangle were beside themselves, and
wonldn't keep in tune. The young ladies threw off their
kerchiefs upon their armsthe gentlemen their coats upon
the bushes and benches behind them, displaying red under
shirts and a great variety of hoists, embellished sometimes
with a great black heart of leather in the middle, or with
mystical creeping vines, breaking out all over in sheepskin
blossoms. At intervals the company rushed down from
the floor into the stalls at the sides of the garden, and
falling upon various refreshments there set out, acquired
so much vigor as to return to the stage in astonishing force
of wind and limb. At the end of every third dance or
so, the gentlemen resigning all care of their partners,
marched in a body to the bar at the other end of the
garden
,
fronting the floor, where the bar-tenders, standing in
a row in their sleeves, wrought constant miracles in the
mixing of slings, punches, and cobblers. And so they
kept it up by the hour, beyond midnight, when some
slight abatement in the spirit of the entertainment began
to show itself. Every now and then a set fell off, one by
one, until there were only a few stragglers about the floor
kept together by almost superhuman exertions on the part
of the gentlemen in the blue ribbands. At last there was
no one left but the gentlemen in blue ribbands themselves,
who wandered hither and thither, gathering up shawls,
combs, and other stray articles abandoned by their owners.
The lights were out or smoking in their last remains
the waiters asleep upon the benchesand the great De
Grand Val roamed about the paths and bowers of the
garden, in his satin smalls, unattended and unobserved.
Pufferto whom she had been courteously resigned by
Mr. Joseph Marsh, who had attended her thither, and who
went off in search of Mr. Bill Winship, the obnoxious
dancer
took
the dark-eyed young lady's arm in his, and had
long ago set forth. He knew the way now, and it was a
very different oneso it seemed to him, although it
remained
untouchedthan when he traveled it before. The
crossings were as broadthe roads as crookedthe squares
as long; but how miserably short and narrow, how
provokingly
straight they seemed! It would have been a
pleasure to him to have got into Doyer-street and
wandered
about all night long. The door was reached before he
had thought of it; an old woman came with a nimbleness,
the very recollection of which took his breath away; and
thenwhen the dark-eyed young lady entered inhow
cruelly quick she was in closing it, with her ugly old face
in her very hood, and hurrying her away.
CHAPTER XXX.
MR. FISHBLATT'S NEWS-ROOM.
Through all of Puffer's dreams that night there glided
a graceful form; a pair of bright dark eyes glanced hither
and thither like meteors, in all the motions of the dance:
sometimes he was moving by its side, sometimes it parted
from himand when she left his hand, ah! how keen a
pang shot through his heart! But gliding, and glancing,
and full of cheerful images as were his dreams
whatever
the mazes, whatever the turns, the pirouettes,
the long country dances, the perspective always closed
with the fair dancer's wearing a great green hood, and an
old woman's head thrust inside, chattering and bobbing up
and down. He had danced a score or more cotillions,
reels, and flingsalways with the same ending, when, at
length, the old head seemed somehow to get fixed upon the
young shoulders, the old body, without a head, galloped
off, and the fair, young form was left, chassing,
double-headed
,
among the trees. This was too much for mortal
patience to bear, and Puffer waked up. His first business,
when he had fairly recovered himself, was to recall the
dark-eyed young lady, in all her agreeable proportions, one
by one, and replace her in his mind as she had been when
he had stretched himself to sleep. Lately as he had
looked upon her, it was something of an effort: at one
time he would fix her in a graceful attitude bending
forward
to moveher head slightly turned back towards
himbut then the eyes, or the motion of the arm, or the
smile that had played upon her lip, would escape him, and
he would begin again. He went puzzling on in this way,
even till he was dressedthough this did not prevent his
appareling himself with great skill and judgment;
drawing
out, from the very bottom of a drawer, where it had
been laid religiously aside for some select occasion, a bright
blue neckcloth; arraying his new buff vest, which he
had worn to the Ball, to marked advantage, and disposing
of his handsome blue coat so that every wave and plait
should tell. With the two tasks, his mind, it must be
confessed
,
was sufficiently engaged; and when he had laid
the last lock in its exact place upon his brow, and succeeded
in recalling the dark-eyed young lady, in all her beauty,
even down to the neat shoe-tie, (that his dreams had not
forgotten,) it came into his head, as opportunely as one
could wish, that he ought to go down to Mr. Fishblatt's,
at whose entertainment he had first met the dark-eyed
young lady, and have a little gossip, just by way of
relief! The day had, in this way glided past dinner time,
and he thought the pleasing idleness of the morning had
fairly purchased the afternoon as an extension of his
holiday
.
When he reached the house of Mr. Fishblatt, the door,
in compliment to the pleasant weather, stood wide open
and Puffer, having established a sufficient friendship to
warrant it, proceeded at once to the small supplemental
room in the rear; where Mr. Halsey Fishblatt held his
lair. Here he found Mr. Fishblatt in his arm-chair,
holding
,
in a firm gripe, a wet sheet, which he regarded
with a steady gaze. At his side there was a wooden stool,
on the top of which lay a pile of damp newspapers.
The reading of the wet sheet seemed to move Mr.
Fishblatt greatly; his teeth were firmly fixed, and a thick
sweat, as though it had steamed up from the
newspaper
,
stood upon his brow. His attention was so
entirely
engrossed that, notwithstanding the unusual gloss and
neatness of Puffer's apparel, he merely nodded to him as
he came in, and, unfixing one of his arms, waived him to
a seat. As soon as one side of the paper was finished
very little, apparently, to the satisfaction of Mr. Fishblatt
he gave the sheet a gentle shake, and, letting it fall into
a current of air, which set in from the entry, he turned a
leaf, and folding it back, fixed himself upon the fresh
side.
Glancing aside not once, but ranging up and down the
solid columns as steadily as a plough-horse in a furrow,
Mr. Fishblatt finished his acre or half acre of print.
This is certainly an astonishing circumstance, he
exclaimed, folding his paper, laying it upon his knee,
and smiting it with his open palm, breathing now for
the first time freely; An astonishing circumstance;
on Monday, Busts, of the Bladder, made that pungent
sally, and here it's Saturday, and no rejoinder from
Flabbywhat can this mean?
At this moment a series of shouting boys streamed by
in the street, whose voices, at their very top, were broken
in passing through the long hall and up a flight of stairs.
Mr. Fishblatt, however, whose ear was better practised,
started up, with a stern smile upon his face, and
proceeding
to the stair-head, called down. Shuffling feet
were heard in answer, and tossing down a coin of small
dimensions upon the entry-floor, merely said The
Puncheon
,
and returned to his seat. In a second or two the
frowzy-headed servant girl, with her hair all abroad,
appeared
at the door, and presented to him a fresh sheet,
which he fastened upon with great eagerness.
As I thought, said Mr. Fishblatt, glancing rapidly
down the columns. An `Extra Puncheon,' pretending
to give late news from the Capitol, but containing, in
reality
,
Flabby's long-expected reply. Capital! capital!
cried Mr. Fishblatt, as he hurried on; Flabby called
Busts a drunken vagabond, in the Puncheon of
Wednesday
week; Busts called Flabby a hoary reprobate, in
Monday's Bladder, and now Flabby calls Busts a keg of
Geneva bitterssays the bung's knocked out and the
staves well coopered. Capital! This alludes to a
thrashing
,
in front of the Exchange, in which Busts had his eye
blacked and a couple of ribs beaten in. Give us plenty
of newspapers! pursued Mr. Halsey Fishblatt, starting
from his chair in the furor of his enthusiasm. They
make a people happy and intelligent and virtuous. The
press, sir, the press is the palladium of liberty, and the
more palladiums we have the freer we areof course.
See here, sir, here's a big palladium and here's a little
palladium. At this he held forth to Puffer's gaze first
the mammoth sheet, and then the dwarf, and brandishing
them in the air, proceeded: "This"referring to the
small sheet" is edited by a couple of overgrown boys in
Williamsburg, who do their own press-workand this by
an undergrown man in Ann-street, who does his thinkinh
on the other side of the Atlantic. Never mind thatgive
us more. This people can never be free, Mr. Hopkins,
thoroughly and entirely free, till every man in the country
edits a newspaper of his own; till every man issues a
sheet every morning, in which he's at liberty to speak of
every other man as he chooses. The more we know each
other, the better we'll like each otherso let us have all
the private affairs, the business transactions and domestic
doings of every man in the United States, set forth in a
small paper, in a good pungent style, and then we
may begin to talk of the advancement of the human race.
That's what I call the cheap diffusion of knowledge;
a penny-worth of scandal on every man's breakfast table,
before he goes to business."
Mr. Fishblatt having refreshed himself and his hearer
with a tumbler each of lemonade, from the mantle, (the
probable remains of a last night's entertainment,) was about
to resume, when he was brought to a pause by the sudden
entrance of the frowzy-haired servant-girl, who brought him
a parcel from the postman who was distributing the
southern and western mail.
"Ah! what have we here ?" said Mr. Fishblatt, taking
the parcel from her hand. `The Nauvoo Bludgeon,'
`Potomac Trumpet,' `Western Thundergust,'
something
rich in each, I will warrant." "The corporal," says
the Nauvoo Bludgeon, pursued Mr. Fishblatt, reading
from the newspapers as he unfolded them; " The
corporal
,
we are glad to see, has resumed his editorial chair.
There are few men in the press in the United States, that
could be better spared than Tompkins; there is a raciness
about his paragraphs, his humour is so delicate, his go, 0.
taste so marked and prominent in all he writes. In a
word we could'nt spare Tompkins." Mr. Fishblatt
unfolded
another paper, remarking that the corporal edited
the Potomac Trumpetand here. it was, a day's date
later than the Bludgeon. "Our friend Smith of the
Bludgeon," continued Mr. Fishblatt, reciting from the
Trumpet, "has our thanks for the handsome manner in
which he has alluded to our recovery from a critical
sickness
.
Smith, we owe you one and will pay you as soon
as
you
are on your backif not sooner. We were passing
down Market-lane yesterday, when we heard a voice.
`Tompkins,' said the voice; `Hallo!' We looked up;
it was Grigsbyour old friend Grigsby, of Clambake
Point. He understood us, and we passed on. Do you
take, Smith?
Having despatched these, Mr. Fishblatt came to the
Western Thundergust. The Thundergust was in a
furious
rage; they had been purloining his jokes, and he
wouldn't tolerate it any longer.
We have submitted long enough, said the
Thunder-gust
,
to the unbridled plunderings of the Nauvoo
Bludgeon and the Potomac Trumpet. We mean to put
a stop to it; and to begin at the beginning, we would like
to ask the
man
of the Bludgeon where he got that phrase,
`In a word, we couldn't spare Tompkins'? Does he
recollect
the Thundergust of Wednesday, the 15th of July?
If he doesn't we can refresh his memory. `In a word,'
said we, speaking of an article of furniture in our late
office, `we couldn't spare our cedar-wood desk.' There
we think we have pinned the Bludgeon man to the wall,
and now we'll dispose of him of the Trumpet, by
suggesting
whether it wouldn't be better for him to buy a copy
of the works of Mr. Joseph Miller at once, rather than be
at the trouble of stealing his jokes from all the
newspapers
in the country? We only suggest it;while we are
on the point, we might as well say that the anecdote of
Grigsby, in the last Trumpet, was stolen as it stands,
from the first number of this paper, where the reader will
find it printed at the head of the first column of the second
page. Paste-boy, scratch off the `Trumpet'it'll be
your turn next, Mr. Bludgeon; so you're on your good
behaviour!
Just then, and before Mr. Fishblatt could dive deeper
into the beauties of the press, an indifferently dressed
gentleman in a heated face and damp hair, rushed in,
stumbling at the threshold in his haste, and pitching
forward
,
but taking the precaution to knock his hat tight with
one hand as he stumbled.
Heavens and earth! exclaimed the damp-haired
stranger, as soon as he recovered himself, It's passed!
"It is?" echoed Mr. Fishblatt, in a hollow
sepulchral
tone.
It is, sir !" responded the stranger, wildly.
Whatyou don't say, sir," continued Mr. Fishblatt,
gazing steadily at him, "that the bill for clearing the
navigation
of the upper Wabash
has
passed?"
The stranger did; and he had in his hat an accurate
report of the debate. It had been brought in by special
express for the Junk Bottle. An express rider, by-the-bye,
had broken his neck in coming through New-Jersey, and
the messenger had pitched into the office of the Junk
Bottle, with such precipitation with his parcel, as to have
struck the senior editor where he knocked all the wind
out of him; so that they needn't look for any leader
tomorrow
.
He would take off his hat and they would get
at the particulars. The damp-haired stranger did so;
set his hat upon the floorplanted one foot upon a
chair-seat
near by, and bending forward, so that the sweat
dropped on the paper as he read, proceeded to furnish the
following account, which was heralded in the Junk Bottle
with the portrait of a small fat cherub, flying at the top of
his speed, his cheeks distended, and a trumpet at his
mouth, from which issued the word "Postscript," in a
loud, bold type. It was from the Washington
correspondent
of the Junk Bottle.
"I can hardly hold the quill in my hand with joy at
the news I am about to communicate; news that will, I
am satisfied, thrill the whole country from one end to
the other.
THE BILL FOR CLEARING THE NAVIGATION OF
THE UPPER WABASH
was passed last night between eleven
and twelve o'clock, after a most animated and stormy
debate
,
in which the emissaries of power put forth their
utmost strength. Their subterfuges, their cavils and cries
of I `order' were, however, of no avail. The bill had a
clear majority of five, and the country is safe. Of the
true-hearted men who distinguished themselves on the
side of justice and patriotic principle, Peter Alfred Brown,
of Massachusetts, was pre-eminently conspicuous. He
was seen every where during the debate, animating,
exhorting
,
encouraging; from his place in the house;
sometimes
,
in the energy of his extraordinary powers, standing
up in his chair, and sometimes addressing the house from
his desk-top, where he took his station at last, and
maintained
it for better than hour, during which he delivered
one of the most remarkable and wonderful speeches of
the present epoch. There are few men, in any age or
country, to be compared with Peter Alfred Brown. I
subjoin a hasty outline of a few of the most striking
passages
in the debate.
Mr. Buffum, of Kentucky, in opening the discussion,
remarked that the country was in imminent danger, much
more imminent than he was willing to confess. The
people
expected much and they got nothing. A crisis had
arrived which
must
be met. He need not describe to them
the present condition of the whole region around the Upper
Wabash. It was little better than a desert; trade, by the
obstruction of navigation, had fallen off to nothingthe
grass in the neighboring meadows was four feet high
vessels of transportation were sticking, absolutely sticking
in the mud at the wharves; and the cartmen went about
the streets whistling dirges and psalm-tunes.
Mr. Woddle, of South Carolina, who rose in reply to
Mr. Buffum, would not answer for the consequences, if
the bill before the House should become a law. His,
(Mr. W.'s) constituents were in a highly inflamed and
excited
state of mind, on the subject of the proposed clearing.
If the Upper Wabash (they asked) was once made
navigable
,
what would become of the Little Peedee? Why,
it would sink to a third-rate stream, and in the place of
the honorable gentleman's whistling cartmen, they would
have a stagnant marsh, full of musical bull-frogs. He
(Mr. W.) respected the constitution of the country, and
so did his constituents; but should this bill pass, he could
not promise that a flag with some terrible device would
not be seen flying, in twenty-four hours after the news,
from the walls of Charleston.
It was at this juncture that Peter Alfred Brown, of
Massachusetts
,
rose. Every eye was upon him; and without
faltering for a moment, he entered upon the subject. He
showed clearly, in a masterly effort of better than two
hours, that the constitution had manifestly contemplated the
object in the proposed bill. He showed, so that the
blindest and most jaundiced eye could not fail to see it,
that the framers had provided for the very contingency
that had now arisen. He would not occupy the time of
the House in pointing out the express clause in the
constitution
covering the present case; but he proved, by an
ingenious and elaborate train of reasoning, in something
less than an hour, that the entire scope of that instrument
went to such an effect. In a peroration, never surpassed
in the House, he begged them to stand by the constitution.
His arms trembled, as he held up to their view a printed
copy which he had in his hand; and when he
sat
down,
the universal conviction was that he could not be
answered
.
Notwithstanding this feeling, he was
immediately
followed by Marc Anthony Daggers, the notorious
member from Virginia, who poured out upon the head of
the illustrious Brown, the vials of his wrath. There was
no epithet of denunciation he did not heap upon the head
of that distinguished man. "Sir," said Daggers,
turning
so as to face Mr. Brown, who sat complacent and
unmoved
,
writing a letter at his desk; "Sir, you are a
disgrace
and a contumely to the American Congress; a
pedlar of logic, and a wholesale dealer in falsehood and
fable. Where you were born, sir, the land, in sympathy
with you, breeds nothing but copper-heads and
toadstools
,
the soil is rocky as your bosom, sterile as your
brain." Here there were loud cries of order, but
Daggers
went on without heeding them in the least. Brown
was a buffalo, ready to plunge his horns into the vitals of
his country; he was a volcanic fire, a monster, a doting
idiot, and a political mountebank.
At nine o'clock in the evening, to which hour they had been
kept listening to the tirade of Mr. Marc Anthony Daggers,
Mr. Blathering, of Missouri, obtained the floor. His effort
was in every way worthy of his matured powers and
reputation. For fourteen years he (Mr. B.) had labored,
single-handed and alone, to obtain justice for the citizens
of Indiana, Illinois and Missouri. For fourteen years he
had cried at the top of his lungs to the people of the
United
States, to render their right to the residents on the
Wabash. The Wabash was still obstructed, and if be,
like Curtius of old, could, by casting himself headlong
in, reverse the spell and open the river, he was ready, at
any moment, for the sacrifice. All he asked was an hour's
notice, and an opportunity to say farewell, a last
farewell
,
to his wife and children.
The Upper Wabash, Mr. Speaker, is a stream rising
in the interior of Indiana, at about the latitude of 40, &c.
(Here he produced several maps, and quoted freely from
two piles of books before him, which occupied about an
hour and a half delightfully.) He closed with an appeal
to the House, which surpassed any thing ever heard
before
within its walls. I need only give you the concluding
sentence to show you the magnificent stamp of the whole.
If I were now standing upon the summit of the
Chippewyan
mountains, instead of the floor of this House, and
were suddenly and unexpectedly seized with the icy
pangs of death;if I saw that my last hour had come, and
that but one more breath was left me to draw, I would
say with that last breath, so that I might be heard by
every man in America, `Clear the Wabash; in Heaven's
name careen its mighty bottom and let its waters flow in
a mercantile tide into the Ohio at Shawneetown, and
into the Mississippi at Big Swamp!'
The Bill was engrossed at twenty minutes past eleven,
and at twelve was sent to the Senate for concurrence.
There was an unexampled rush toward the stalls in the
lobby and the hotels on the Avenue the moment the House
was adjourned. This tended somewhat to allay the
excitement
.
Thank God the country is safe!
Curse that Junk-Bottle! cried Mr. Fishblatt, who
had watched closely the reading of the Washington
Letter
.
It's always bringing unpleasant news by express
in advance of the mail. Our trade is ruined, sir.
New-York
is a dead herring. All Kentucky, Indiana, Illinois,
will flow into the Wabash, the Wabash into the Ohio, the
Ohio into the Mississippi, and the Mississippi makes a
mouth at New-Orleans. Where does that bring us? Not
an Indiana turkey, nor a Kentucky ham, nor an Illinois
egg reaches the New-York market henceforth forever. In
ten years you may expect to see this mighty metropolis a
heap of ruins, and auctioneers going about knocking down
the rubbish in lots to suit purchasers. What do they mean
by passing such bills? Mr. Fishblatt turned to
Puffer
:
the damp-haired stranger, released from the
steadfastness
of his gaze, hastily resumed his hatto the crown
of which he had restored his paperand escaped to
dispense
his news in some other quarter of the town. Puffer,
who had stood aside, pondering in his own way, on the
subject of the Upper Wabash, and, turning it about in his
mind till he got it in a light that pleased him, looked at
Mr. Fishblatt, but made no answer. But when Mr.
Fishblatt
added,
"I'll go and see my friend, Mr. Samuel
Sammis, and have this explainedwill you join me,
Puffer
?"
he started from his reverie, and said it was the
very best thing they could do. In a moment he threw down
the newspaper, with which his fingers had been toying,
held his hat in his hand, and was ready to issue forth on
the instant. Now this alacrity, on the part of Puffermust
we confess it?was owing to an unavoidable accident.
Mr. Samuel Sammis was the father of the dark-eyed
young lady.
CHAPTER XXXI.
PUFFER HOPKINS IMPROVES AN ACQUAINTANCE.
A half-hour's walk, in which Mr. Fishblatt harangued
and expatiated, without limit, upon the iniquity of the Bill
for clearing the Upper Wabash, brought them to the
Great-Kiln Road, abutting on the Hudson, in Greenwich.
And there, with a, flaming red front, and a couple of
apothecary's
bottles staring from the first floor like two great
bloodshot eyes, stood by itself the domicil of Mr. Samuel
Sammis. Beyondstanding upon the river, and just
visible
across the angle of the house-arose a pair of
hay-scales
,
with an inscription to the effect that Samuel
Sammis
was weigh-master and president of' the same.
They were led to an upper storyfor Mr. Sammis, like
his friend Fishblatt, possessed the second floorand being
ushered in they came upon a party of old and young ladies,
scattered about the apartment, in the very zenith and
ecstasy of a full-blown litter of work-baskets, sewing-silk
and small talk. The first object that fixed the attention
of Puffer as they entered, was the dark-eyed young lady
herself, busy fashioning portentous capitals, in white thread,
upon a long red banner or bunting; and at her ear that
everlasting old woman, whispering away, apparently, at
the rate of a page a minute at least. There were other
young ladies, each diligent with her scissors and needle,
clipping, binding, patching; none seemed to be engaged
in the literary department but the dark-eyed young lady,
and not one, in Puffer's eye, was half as fair as she!
There was one small and gentle, with auburn hair and
lucid blue eyes; another round and plump; another quite
stately, with wild a flashing look;there seemed to be a
mould in his heart, and no other image would fit it but that
one.
The dark-eyed young lady smiled a welcome to Puffer
turned to the old lady at her side, and whispering the
words my aunt, as an introduction, invited him to a
seat. Mr. Fishblatt, who was quite at home, was already
in a chair.
You are quite a stranger, Mr. Fishblatt, said the
aunt, who was a little prim old woman, dressed with
exemplary
neatness and with a pair of dancing eyes. You
have n't been to see us since last election. What's kept
you awayRheumatics?no: perhaps it's been the winds
that has blown down the city for the last month and better.
You was afraid of getting a mouthful if you walked up
this way. Was n't that it? Ah! ah! And the little
old woman broke into a clear joyous laugh which rung
through the room, and was echoed by the whole company
of stitchers and sewers.
Oh, no; nothing of that sort, I promise you, upon my
honor, answered Mr. Halsey Fishblatt, gravely. My
whole mind, soul, heart and body have been engrossed
with public affairshorribly engrossed: so many exciting,
and important, and weighty questions. One's no sooner
well disposed of than another pops up. I only despatched
the other day the question about the Aqueduct, and curse
it, here's another water-question. I am borne down with
anxiety and excessive thinking. Where's Sammy?
To this question the old lady made answer that
Samuel
was at the Scales; that he was very busy at this
season; that she would call him in if Mr. Fishblatt would
like to see him; and jumping up, in a minute more, would
have put her head forth towards the river, and
summoned
him; but on Mr. Fishblatt's entreaty she
refrained
,
and he went out to seek him for himself:
Finding the field clear for conversation, Puffer
addressed
himself to the dark-eyed young lady to the effect
that she seemed to be a little in public life as well as Mr.
Fishblatt, judging by the use to which she was putting
the bunting on which she was at work.
Oh, I only do as I am bid!" answered the dark-eyed
young lady, "I'd as leave write one thin in here as
another
;
my thread and needle are neutral, I assure you."
"How can you say so, Fanny!" exclaimed the aunt,
smiling
upon her," she is one of the most arrant little politicians
in the city, Mr. Hopkins; she keeps this whole ward in a
constant ferment with her political tea-drinkings, and
dances, and complimentary balls. You know something
of her there, I guess ; and now she's corrupting the
alphabet
itself."
"Aunt, I detest politics, and
you
know I do!" answered
the young lady; "I 'd rather, any day, walk down the
sunny side of Hudson-street, than carry the state for our
party!"
You see she has a partyah! ah!Now, Fanny, I
shall expose some of your tricks. What do you think,
Mr. Hopkins? This young lady, here, is so much of a
demagogue, that though her own tastes run in favor of
broad laces and net-work gloves, she tramps, three times
a week, the whole breadth of the city, and spends the
morning in running up and down the stores in
Divisionstreetyou've
seen them, the little, square shops, with
a back entry and a glass door, and a green vine dangling
against the fence, and a young lady with twisted ringlets
sitting between the two?there she goesand with the
aid of the two-and forty milliners of that street, gets up
dresses and costumes to catch the cartmen's daughters
and the young mechanics!Now don't deny it, Fanny!"
During this narrative, Fanny glanced stealthily at Puffer,
and blushed as deep a red as the silk she was at work
upon. Before Puffer could enter upon a vindication of
the young lady, which he fully meditated, the little old
lady sprang up from her chair, ran into the corner of the
room where a green shrub of some kind or other was
vegetating in a blue tub, and called Puffer after her.
Here's something great for you to look at, Mr.
Hopkins
;what
a stemdid you ever see such a stem to a
seven months' tree?What leaves!The lemons are
every bit as big as plumsthey'll be twice as large this
time, a year! There was no limit to the eloquent praises
poured out upon this domestic lemon; which was steadily
exhibited to all visiters. This was Fanny's tooshe had
brought it up from a sprig. Then the old auntwho
seemed to have taken a sudden fancy to Puffercaused a
sampler to be unhooked from the wall, carried it to the
light and expatiated upon it at equal length. Then she
bustled to the door and whistled in a short-legged yellow
dog, who stumped about the room, looking up in every
body's face in the most comical fashion. He proved to
be the property of Miss Fanny too; and his birth,
parentage
,
history, and past exploits, (especially the incident
of his drinking gin out of a bottle, in his infancy) were
dwelt upon with edifying particularity. By the time the
short-legged dog had finished the circuit of the company,
a savour of supper began to creep through the key-hole
of an adjacent folding door, and the aunt, breaking off her
discourse abruptly, hoisted the window and shouted to
Mr. Samuel Sammis that tea was ready. Having delivered
this summons, she closed the window; but presently
hoisted it again to say that he had better come at once.
Mr. Sammis failing to appear as soon as she desired,
she raised it a third time to suggest that he had forgotten
they had short-cake! The appeal was not in vainMr.
Sammis's soul was touched at last, and he came in with
Mr. Fishblatt.
Mr. Samuel Sammis was a foxy-looking little gentleman,
in drab pants and a weather-washed blue coat, his hair
was thin, his linen questionable, and when he came
forward
to greet Puffer, his face was a cobweb of smiles.
I'm very happy to see you, sir, he said; I knew
you well by reputation, although I hadn't had the honor
to be personally acquainted. It's always a pleasure to
become acquainted with gentlemen of tried patriotism,
Mr. Fishblatt?
Mr. Fishblatt assented to the postulate, andthe
folding-door
being cast openthey marched in to supper.
The opening of the folding-door disclosed a table spread
with a liberal variety of dishes, and steaming with a cloud
of tea-smoke that hung aloft. The chairs were placed,
and the company were about to take seats at random,
when Mr. Sammis begged them to pause.
"This table," said Mr. Sammy Sammis, evolving a
little
piece of pleasantry which he had elaborated in secret,
with great care; " This table," said he, " is the Empire
State, with the various products of its soil. The chairs,
of which you see there are eight, represent the eight
senate districts or divisions. Aunt," addressing the old
lady, "will you be good enough to sit for Dutchess and
Orangehere, opposite the butter, for which Goshen, you
know, is famous. Mr. Fishblatt, I'll send you up the
river as far as wheat-growing Albanythere, that's it,
abreast the short-cake. Mr. Hopkins, you're the member
for New-York, and must take your place at the bottom of
the table, and catch what you can from the river-counties
as it comes down. Will you take charge of the
salt-springs
of SalinaI mean the salt-cellars," pointing two
of the young ladies to chairs at the corners of the board ;
"And you," motioning the third to a seat in the centre,
"Miss Erie, famous for your fruitshave the region of the
peaches and preserves. I'll take the Oneida
sheep-farms
under my care," settling into a chair opposite a plate
of cold mutton. "And for you, Miss Fanny, who are
always
babbling and making a noise, there's the tea-board
for youthe district of Trenton Falls ; you may pour the
tea, but don't put
too
much water in it. You may begin
as soon as you please."
They were all in their places; the dishes were passed
rapidly from hand to hand, the tea pouredand they were
fairly launched upon the meal. The weight of
responsibility
heaped upon them by Mr. Sammis, did not seem to
have impaired their natural powers a jot; but each one
young ladies and allfell to as though they were in
reality
so many great public characters, each eating for a
county.
After a half hour's sturdy devotion to the products of
the Empire Stateas represented by the tablea pause
sprung up, and Mr. Sammis availed himself of it for a
little
professional talk.
Fanny, my dear, said Mr. Sammis, How far have
you got in your lettering of the banner?
The whole inscription, she answered.  `
Bottomites
Uncompromising
Friendship to the clearing of the
Wabash.'That was it?
How
could
you make such a mistake? exclaimed
Mr. Sammis, in a rapture of surprise. It was `hostility,'
not `friendship.'
I'm sure you told me `friendship,' father, retorted
the young lady, and to use the longest letters I could for
the word.
It was wrong, my dear, answered Mr. Sammis
calmly; Absence of mindyou'll alter it after tea, if
you please.
The Bottomites had cried aloud in favor of the clearing
as long as they thought it wouldn't pass; now that it had
unexpectedly passed, they changed their cry. The
re-lettering
of the banner was the result of an elaborate
conference
of Messrs. Fishblatt and Sammis, at the
Hay-Scales
.
You think it all important, said Mr. Sammis,
addressing
Puffer after a pause, during which the business of the
table had been diligently prosecuted; You think it all
important to carry our next state election?
Certainly! responded Puffer.
We must come down to Cayuga Bridge, proceeded
Mr. Sammis, with four thousand, or we are done for in
the next presidential campaign. The river counties are
all right, I am told; Dutchess gives us five hundred, and
Albany county is safe for at least three hundred and
seventy-five.
How is the fourth ward of the Capitol? asked Puffer,
having in mind a political common-place which he was
quite sure Mr. Sammy Sammis would quote upon him.
We must have it! averred Mr. Sammis, as goes
the fourth ward so goes Albany, and as goes the fourth
ward so goes the State, you know.
To be sure! echoed Puffer, and we must make
what we can out of the Upper Wabash, at the first
election
that's held.
By all means! said Mr. Fishblatt, with enthusiasm,
we must rouse the popular mind with strong appeals;
31
we must show them the enormity of the measure; point
to the results, if the bill is allowed to pass into effect, to
this city and State.
Yesand call upon them in the name of the lamented
Decatur, to save the country from ruin! added Mr.
Sammis
.
Decatur was a man of tried patriotism, I think?
It was not easy to keep Puffer's mind to the subject:
his eyes wandered constantly to the quarter where a
certain
young lady was seated: so that he was soon dropped
out of the discourse, leaving Messrs. Sammis and
Fishblatt
to keep it up in their own way. Puffer's glances were
not entirely unnoticed or unrewarded. Miss Fanny, too,
had, somehow or other, grown pensive and
uncommunicative
with a marvellous coincidence as to time and
circumstance
.
When they had returned to the sewing-room she
exhibited to Puffer another flag on which she had wrought
the words
For Congress
, with a blank underneath for
the name of the candidate.
I wish I were allowed to fill it up, she said, looking at
Puffer.
Puffer felt his heart beat quick, but did not venture to
ask whose name it would bear. They seemed to understand
each other better from that moment.
My aunt was right, she continued after a pause,
speaking now without reserve. I put a constraint upon
my feelings to please my father: you understand now
what I said at the Ball! For my own part, and on my
own account, I would rather lead a quiet life, aside from
the bustle and face making of politics. Have you ever
had such a feeling in your busy life?
Many and many a time! answered Puffer, calling
to mind his poor neighbor, and the gentle quietude of
his little chamber. The life that glides away, like the
stream that clings to its bed, I sometimes think may be
happier than if it had foamed, and brawled, and was
broken
in pieces in the clamor of a water-fall.
And yet I don't deny, continued Miss Fanny Sammis,
that I would like to have my carriage, with one sleek
horse, and ride through Broadway once a week. I would
not care about it oftener.
Come, Miss Fanny, we must have some music!
cried Mr. Sammy Sammis, stepping out upon the floor,
leading out one of the young ladies by the hand. We
have rested long enoughJohn, take a partner, to one
of a swarm of young clerks that had come in after
tea. Mr. Fishblattaunt. AuntMr. Fishblatt. Start
up, William, to another of the young clerksand to the
last of them. Mr. Jones, there's another young lady left
lead her out!
Puffer had walked with Miss Fanny into the other
room, where, in a recess behind the door, stood an
old red piano. Miss Fanny ascended the stool, and Mr.
Sammis cried out to his partners in the dance, Now,
recollect
it's
the Northern and Western Districtshis
head was still running on the political divisions of the
State. It's Northern and Western against Eastern and
Southern: the first couple that breaks down is in a
minority
,
and incapable of taking partners for the next three
dances. Strike up, Miss Fanny: the Governor's March, if
you please.
Miss Fanny, with Puffer at her side, struck the first few
notes with a bold hand, as Mr. Sammis desiredbut
presently
,
as in spite of herself, a gentler air crept upon the
keys, and, instead of a cotillion, she was playing a
pathetic
ditty.
Louder and livelier! shouted Mr. Sammis. We
want the Governor's Marchfour thousand strong!
She essayed the tune; but the notes came again
softened
from her fingers, and seemed sighing back to the
words that Puffer breathed gently in her ear.
With constant remonstrances on the part of Mr. Sammy
Sammis, who was dancing for the whole northern tier of
counties (the six war-dancing tribes included,) and constant
relapses on the part of Miss Fanny, the evening wore
away.
At a late hour, Mr. Fishblatt, who, being a slow and
solid
dancer, had, to the surprise of all parties, carried the
day, called for his hat; had Mr. Sammis aside in a
whispered
conversation, with occasional glances at Puffer, for
a quarter of an hour; and, gallantly kissing the old aunt,
summoned Puffer, and left.
Miss Fanny thought the travel of the stair-way so perilous,
as to bring a light event to the very front door; what
passed there between the dark-eyed young lady and the
young politician, while Mr. Halsey Fishblatt stood in the
street calling to him, remains a profound mystery. The
spectaclecould he have looked upon it as an observer
would have doubtless seemed to Puffer infinitely more
agreeable than that of the old aunt with her wrinkled
visage inside of the dark-eyed young lady's hood.
Marching arm in arm with Mr. Fishblatt, it is well known
that Puffer put several pointed and searching questions to
that gentleman, the answers to which were to the effect
that Mr. Sammy Sammis was an incessant letter-writer to
all parts of the state; a wire-puller and waker-up of
counties
and villages; that Miss Fanny was his only child,
the old lady, his aunt, and Fanny's grand-auntand
being
an unincumbered woman, with a round sum out at
interest
,
Fanny was her favorite. After procuring which
results
,
Puffer fell silent, and although Mr. Fishblatt addressed
him in several most elaborate and animated harangues,
he kept on musing, till they parted for the night.
CHAPTER XXXII.
THE DEATH OF FOB.
It was all a cheat. The lustre in his eyes was false
and treacherous as the glittering whirlpool; the bloom
upon his cheek was of the hue of the rose with the canker
at its heart. Fob was dying. Martha had procured a
little lodging directly opposite his chamber, and there she
stayed when driven from his bedside by the considerate
poor neighbors, who saw how her strength was wasted in
efforts to preserve his. Even on such nights as she was
not allowed to be a watcher in his chamber, she would
hover about the door and through the halla gentle spirit
eager to catch the slightest cry of pain, and taking
keen note if he but turned in his couch. Spring had gone:
Summer had come, and was ebbing fast, and, as its gentle
breath died murmuring by the window of the little tailor,
his pulses faltered more and more. At first he had been
able to rise at times, and going to his dormerthat
precious
window of all the Forkhad cheered himself with
the sight of the sun at its risingthe slow-lapsing motions
of the vessels as they glided down the river. Now that
he was stretched all day long upon his couch, he made
Marthaa service she was skilful to performstand at
the window, and report to him, day by day, all that
passed. The little street-sights, the crowds that gathered
about the blind flute-player, the color of the horses and
carriages that went by, the shape of the country
wagons
that clattered into town, with guesses whence they
came. But, most of all, he made her dwell upon the
aspect of the country beyond the river: from her look-out
she had followed the farmers through all their harvesting,
from the first glance of the sickle among the grain to the
garnering in the old red-roofed barns. She had told him
no more faithful chronicler than Marthathe color the
fields had put on in all their changes, from green to brown,
and back again to green; and how the woods grew bright
and ruffled and swelled with their palmy leaves; and then
when the yellow crept among thembut this she did not
dwell on as the other, for Fob's heart fell when he
heard that Summer, the sweet, calm, gentle Summer
was leaving the country. She had watched his fancy, and
served it even in bringing him cider to drink, pressed from
the old orchards in Westchester, where his youth, and hers
too for that, had climbed and frolicked. One day, he called
to her to bring all his country treasures, his plants, his
bird's egg chain, his asparagus, and the fair addition she
had made herself, and lay them on his bed. Martha came
and sate down at its head. As his look passed from one
to the other, tears gathered in his eyes and fell, like the
summer-rain, upon the pillow. His heart was full, and he
began to babble of old times. He spoke of his youth, and
asked Martha if she remembered how he used to come
riding into the country, seated gravely on the coach-seat,
high in the air, making a show of helping the driver with
his horses. She did, of course she did; and how she, with
her mother, now dead and gone, used to run and help him
down. Then, there was the visit to the garden, to see her
robin that she had been feeding sleek and plump all the
latter spring and early summer against his coming. Then
the black-berrying, and the grape-hunting, and the
birdnesting
.
So summer after summer had passed: his fatherthe
cousin of Martha's fatherhad, to the surprise of all the
country round, come by the will of their whimsical
grandfather
into ownership of the homestead, which Martha's,
as the expectant and favored heir, had occupied
before
.
Then, fortune turning once again, (a little law and
a little doubtful practice helping her to turn,) Martha's
father
had reinstated himself. Fobhis father had died of
vexation and a broken heart, it was saidyoung and
pennyless, was pushed forth upon the world, was driven
upon the unpropitious craft he had lately followed. Martha
begged him, when he came to this, to pass it bythough her
father had been her cruel jailer for yearsto pass it by as
he loved her. How dark and unnatural the little tailor's
features grew as he came upon these recollections. He
felt that his countenance was changed, and turned to the
wall that Martha might not learn how keen was his sense
of the wrong her fatherher unkind, her unpaternal father
had done him. He had done her too a cruel wrongbut
she showed by no change of look or color any remembrance
of it whatever. When this cloud had passed, and he
could speak again, Fob dwelt upon the old haunts he had
visited while she was in her dark dungeon at home, how
she had been with him in all.
In the lane, the meadow, the orchard, said Fob, I
lingered, striving to tread in the very tracks we had made
together when the world went right with us. But it was
all by stealthat early morning, or by the dull dusk; and
in the indistinct light, how often, Martha, did you seem to
me to be gliding about, pale and breathless, but still
lovingpaler than even now. As it wascautious and
secret as I could be in my watch, the laborers or boys of
the farm, crossing the paths on their way home at night
or back at morning, sometimes came upon me, and started
aside, as though I had been a spirit of evil.
I knew that it must be so, answered Martha, For
these were days (it was when report of yourself, the
strange wanderer, had reached my father's ear) when
they said my illness was deepening upon meI was
moved to an inner chamber, gloomier than the other, the
curtains drawn close, the shutters sealed, and secretly
nailed, toofor I heard the dull sound of the hammer
and light was shut from me as if it had been a wicked
thing.
Was that the result? cried Fob, with a piteous look,
What a fool I was, to bring such hardship upon you.
I do not say it was a hardship! said Martha, I
loved the darkness they thrust upon me, deep and deadly
as it was; it was full of voices and bright eyes, like your
own, telling me of your love and faithful constancy. They
said the darkness made me more cheerfuland they were
right.
And what followed to you, continued Fob, when
they seized me as I was stealing along under the garden
wall?
Fob stopped at once; the countenance of Martha was
whitening with a look of sorrowful entreaty, and her eyes
filling with tears. He understood it at a glanceshe
wished to have her father spared, though he had never
thought of sparing herand Fob turned at once to talk of
other things.
Do you remember the old orchard burying-ground,
he asked, and the uses to which we were wont to put it?
To be sure I do, answered Martha, recovering her
composure. The old burying-ground, full of fruit-trees,
with the little school-house pushed in at one side, as if it
meant to be a good neighbor. Toddling infants, dear
Fob, we strayed there to gather blossoms and flowers,
brighter than we could find any where else;as we grew
older and more learned, you know, we loved to read our
letters there upon the tomb-stones; and older still, and
wiser were we not?we began to pluck the red and
yellow applesthe earliest ripened of the neighborhood.
And then, said Fob, taking up the theme as Martha
paused, when our hearts ripened, and our cheeks flushed
like the fruit above us, we used to sit in the summer noon
under the broad shade, leaning upon a grave, it might be;
and while the country round, for a wide circuit, was
steeped in a listening stillness, the little burying-ground
swarming with bees and crickets, and melodious locusts
was filled with a gentle murmur, which seemed like the
undersong of the spirits that slept beneath its turf.
Martha bent above Fob, as he spoke, hanging upon his
words. And when, said Fob, rising in his couch in
his enthusiasm, the little brook between the school-house
and the graves, swelled by its tributes from the woods,
babbled above them allthe gentle hum died away towards
night-fall, and the children came tumbling out of school,
you knowthey used to cross it, and letting their feet rest
a moment on the graveyard's edge, they escaped into the
road, and scampered to their homes, leaving a sound of
cheerful young voices far behind. Therewhere little
feet tread every day, so that they may say, `Fob lies
here!'lay me there!
He had spoken beyond his strength; and these words
were no sooner uttered than he fell back upon his couch.
Martha seized his pale hand passionatelyas though she
could so hold him back from the world to which he was
hasteningand bending above him, begged him to speak
again. Presently his eyes opened, and he dwelt upon her
face with a bewildered gaze. Was he among angles
this at his bedside the first he was to know? There was
not a word spokenbut their eyes were busy
interchanging
their lustrous lighta calm, bright, spell-bound gaze
was this the talk of the spiritual world?
At this moment the door opened; a young gentleman of
an ashen aspect, sandy hair, and a look of strenuous
cunning
about the eye, came in, and behind him, treading
lightly, and with a mournful look, Puffer Hopkins.
The young gentleman bore under his arm a great
bundle
of papers, tied in a red string, which he was at the
pains to carry about, to notify the public that he was a
lawyer in practicea good, brisk, chopping practice, as
they might infer from the size of the bundle. While
Puffer
looked sorrowfully upon Martha and Fob, the young
gentleman busied himself in slashing the feathers of a
quill which he had brought with him, and in peering
about the apartment for an inkstand.
He's going fast, said the young gentleman, calling in
his glances from their unproductive search, and fixing
them upon the quill, which he was still trimming. Did'nt
he gasp, then, or was that a cat sneezing on the roof?
Puffer avoided his question, and asked whether it was
absolutely necessary to disturb him now; he seemed to be
in great pain.
To be sure it is, answered the young gentleman,
poising his papers in his two hands to show their weight,
You could'nt have a better. Testimony
in extremis
is
the finest in the world. Mr. Mouldy says he must have
it; and what Mouldy says is law!
Mr. Mouldy thinks he ought to be identified as the
person
that had the deed in possession, and who destroyed
it? I so understood him.
You understood him right, then, said the young
gentleman
,
turning calmly on his heel as soon as he had made
this answer, and breaking into a subdued whistling.
You attended to getting the old man here, I believe?
suggested Puffer.
I asked Mr. Mouldy about that before I left the office.
One of the boys has gone for him; he will be here in a
minute
.
With which answer the young gentleman stepped
across the floor, and unfastening the blackbird from where
it hung upon the beam, took it to the window, and began
to make it hop about in its cage, by pricking it under the
feathers with his quill. Puffer, standing aside, dwelt upon
Fob and his pale companion, holding his breath lest he
should disturb them. Quick feet, clattering up, were
heard upon the stairs, and Hobbleshank came hurrying
in; at first he started in surprise when he saw Martha,
but recovering himself speedily, he stepped about the
chamber, shaking hands with the young gentleman, then
with Puffer, and, last of all, accosting Martha.
This, then, is your friend, said he, smiling upon her.
She glanced at Fob, with a look that went to the old man's
heart, and he was answered. Fob lifted his eyes, and
regarded Hobbleshank with curious interest. Was this
another risen from the dead? Changed as he was by
years, the furrows on his countenance ploughed in, his
hair grizzled and grey-sprinkled by timehe could not
mistake him. It was the old wanderer of the Scarsdale
road. The melancholy midnightthe raging seathe
rent deedall came up before him. A chair was placed
for Hobbleshank, and he took his station by the bed-side,
where Fob could look upon his countenance with the light
streaming upon it. The young gentleman had drawn up
the curtain; led Martha and Puffer aside, to get rid of
their shadows upon the bed; and himself retreated
behind
32
a little screen at the head of the bed, from which
bower there issued, from time to time, a scratching sound.
You have had troubles, sir, said Fob, bearing in
mind what he had seen on the memorable night.
A few, answered Hobbleshank, rubbing his hands;
A few, but they are all clearing away. Have you had
none?
Yours are older than mine, resumed Fob. They
have followed you to an old age; but they are leaving
me while I am still a young man. Martha knew what
he meant, and turned and wept. You have been eighteen
years a sufferer, at least.
Let me see, said Hobbleshank, taking the square
breast-pin from his bosom and referring to its back, which
was graven and lettered. Quite as long as that; but
I'll soon be young again. Fortune is my friend, and all
is coming right. An old parchment or soa clue or two
moreand I shall find my child, and have a home to bring
him to. In a day or two all will be right.
They all smiled, the clerk even laughed aloud in his
bower, at the earnest hopefulness of the old man.
How a deed, all torn in fragments and parcels, can
come back, said Fob, smiling with the others, it would
be hard to guess. Wont you admit that?
It seems so at first, answered Hobbleshank; But
a good providence, I am sureI feel it whispering in my
ear this very minuteis putting it together. It will be
ready when I want it.
And that is now, said Fob, reaching backward under
his pillow. And here it is.
Hobbleshank held in his hand the parchment he had
scattered on the sea-shore a life-time ago. He would not
believe it, but springing from his chair, ran to the window,
where he would have read it, but his hands trembled and
made it waver, all blurred and confused before him. He
called Puffer to his aid, who going over it slowly line by
line, made known its contents. When Puffer came to the
passage relating to his child, he made him pause and read
it over twice, looking up into the reader's face with a look
of indescribable satisfaction. It was his old deed and no
other.
Where did this come fromwhere was it foundby
whom? asked Hobbleshank, looking toward the little tailor.
Eighteen years ago, said Fob, as soon as Hobbleshank
could be brought to take his seat again by the bed-side,
there was an old, sorrow-stricken man, travelling by the
shore of the Sound. Eighteen years ago this deed was
rent by his hands in a hundred fragments.
Wherewhere is he now? asked Hobbleshank,
from whose mind all recollection of the occurrenceso
fast had troubled thoughts and times huddled upon him
had entirely faded. Where is this man?
You are the man; older, but happier it would seem
and I am the other, your fellow wanderer that night.
Live and grow in happiness, while I pass beyond the
sphere of earthly pain or pleasure. You are the man!
His strength was utterly gone, and ere Martha could reach
his side, he lay, his arms stretched out, his head fixed and
rigid on the pillow. They all thought he was dead. In
a little whileMartha ministering what she could to bring
him backa faint color came into his cheek, his eyes
opened again upon the light; but now their expression
was changed. They wandered from face to face with a
hopeless and bewildered glance. His mind was gone
astray. He babbled incoherently of the green fields
the old coachthe homestead; sometimes he repeated
the name of Marthathen he had another upon his tongue,
but shuddering, it died away before it was uttered.
Whenever his hands, straying about the covering of his
bed, fell upon any one of his country treasureshe came
back and talked of early times. News had spread
throughout
the Fork that Fob was dying, and they thronged up,
and holding the little children in their handsFob had
always been a friend of theirsthey stood at the door,
looking on with sorrowful respect. At this moment the
young gentleman came from behind the screen, pressed
his quill upon his coat-skirt, and thrust the new paper he
had been framing among the others in the bundle. He then
scrutinized the deed curiously for a minute, and handing it
to Hobbleshank advised him to roll it up and put it in his
pocket; and clapping his bundle of papers under his arm,
he walked off.
As the sun waned away in the sky, the brightness
faded from Fob's look, and he spoke only at long
intervals
:
murmuring what he would say, so that no one but
Martha, whose face was always close to his, could gather
what he uttered.
A little while after sunsetthe room was growing dark
in all its cornershe began to talk aloud again. He called,
over and over again, for an old serving-man of the
homestead
,
whose name he mentioned, to come to his side;
fixed his look upon the poor blackbird, whose cage had
been restored to its place upon the beam, and clasped
tighter and tighter Martha's hand in his. With the gentle
motion of the wind upon a field of autumn grain, his spirit
stole away; and at an hour past sunset Fob was dead.
CHAPTER XXXIII.
PUFFER IS NOMINATED TO THE AMERICAN CONGRESS.
It would be a great wrong to Puffercolored as were
all his acts by some hue of his tradeto suppose that the
death of his poor neighbor had not touched him nearly.
The genial spirit of the Fork was gone; the kindly
sunshine
which had flowed from that little dormer through all
its chambers, was darkened. Puffer felt that a dear friend
was dead. He would have helped, with other ready
hands, to lay him in a quiet grave; but when he would
have offered aid, the bodywhich Martha had watched
alone, refusing, even angrily, all aid or companywas
gone, no one could tell whither. It had been borne forth
secretly at dusk; and one of the children, who had been
out at play upon the Meadows, brought news that he had
seen it upon the shoulders of two men, in the suburbs,
gliding toward the country, with Martha watching and
following it alone.
With the kindliest remembrance of his poor friend,
Puffer was not permitted long to rest; the pressure from
without forced upon him other thoughts. His fortunes
were on the advance, and he would set apart a quiet hour,
at some better day, to think of the little tailor and his
virtues.
An unlucky accident at the Capitol required that an
election should be held for a single member of Congress.
The late city representativethe lamented Slocum, he
was entitled in the newspapershad lost his invaluable
life under a surfeit of Potomac oysters and long speeches,
and his place was now to be supplied. To carry on the
contest with spirit, and any chance of success, it was
necessary
that an issue should be raised; it didn't matter
greatly what or which side either espoused. The Upper
Wabash presented itself, and was adopted. The
excitement
rose to an unexampled pitch. The orators of
Puffer's
partythe Bottomiteshaving mastered their cue
went all lengths in denouncing it as an infraction of the
rights of citizensan invasion of the Constitutionan act
of the most high-handed despotism; and foremost and
conspicuous among these was Puffer himself. He was
the very embodiment of the Anti-Upper-Wabash feeling;
and he was nominated to the vacancy. Was there ever
a more extraordinary character knownin history ancient
or modern, sacred or profanethan Puffer Hopkins, now
that he was nominated to Congress on the eve of a
decisive
contest? The newspapersmorning, noon and
nightteemed with his praises. Little, obscure,
out-of-the-way
circumstances in his history, were dragged forth
and made the occasion of the most flattering comment and
allusion.
Some one or other had discovered his habit of visiting
the city cellars in quest of oysters; he was immediately
styled the Patriot of the Pie-houses. He had caught, one
afternoon, in company with a crew of political cronies, a
small car-full of striped bass and Lafayette fish, in the
East river, and was declared the Hero of Kipp's Bay.
He had saved an omnibus-driver from being beaten to
death by a crowd, for riding over the legs of a boyand
he was the Champion of Conveyance. His very head
was taken off of his shoulders and put in plaster;
delegations
of tradesmen were constantly waiting upon him,
or writing complimentary letters, humbly soliciting the
honor of crowning him with a new hat, or arraying him
in a clean dickey. The Bottomitesbeing staunch friends
of free tradeinsisted on clapping him in a coat of Thibet's
wool, fancy pants of French jean, boots of Poughkeepsie
leather, and a Panama hat, so that he should be a
representative
of the unrestricted fabrics of the four quarters of
the earth.
On the other side, the illustrious Insurance President,
Mr. Blinker, being a bitter foe to fire, and quite as close a
friend to the opposite element, and having recovered his
popularity in the interval since his defeat, by insuring two
poor cartmen's sheds at his own risk, and adopting the
son of a disabled sailor as one of the secretaries of the
company, (though the young gentleman was as innocent
of pot-hooks and ledgers as a Kamschatkan,) Mr. Blinker
was nominated by the advocates of the Upper Wabash.
To carry out his principles, Mr. Blinkerhaving
discovered
that a second-hand senatorial coat and a green
and white neck-cloth were not always triumphant
assumed
a round-crowned hat, and a homespun coat and
breeches of the plainest texture; in which array he went
about diligently, drinking incessant glasses of gratuitous
water at the grocers' in furtherance of his Upper Wabash
principles.
He also proceeded to an active canvass of the churches
by attending a new one every Sunday, and rattling in a
donation of half a dollar at least, at each.
Puffer, not to be outdone by Mr. John Blinker, canvassed
the markets in opposition to the churches; and having drilled
a small company of young vagabonds, he made a circuit
of the market-places on Saturday nights with these
their rags flying to the wind, and an expression of doleful
gratitude in their facesrunning at his heels; Puffer
keeping
in the advance, and from time to time ordering a cutlet,
or steak, or tender-loin to be cast in. This was so well
enacted that he had not made a tour of the markets more
than twice, before he had the butchers in tears, and
swearing
by liver-and-lights, their own tender-loins, and all that
they hold holiest, that Puffer was an angel, with a heart
as big as an ox.
Every thing gave token of a close and furious contest.
Appeals, fresh and frequent, were made to every possible
interest and every possible voter. It was shown
conclusively
,
in more than one harangue, and a hundred leaders,
that every trade and denomination in businesslaity,
clergy, law, medicine, merchandizewere particularly
and vitally affected in the questions presented at the
coming election. And, as the time drew nearer, a forcible
address was made to that one voter in particular, by whose
deportment, as is well known, the fate of every contest is
determined. There was not a device for creating or
securing electors that was not brought to bear; and the
one party or the other was constantly startled into
unheardof
exertions by learning that its opposite was strengthening
itself with fresh recruits from quarters that could have
never been dreamed of.
There was one that toiled in Puffer's behalf more like a
spirit than a man; a little shrunken figure, that was
every where, for days before the canvassan universal
presence breathing in every ear the name of Puffer. There
was not a tap-room that he did not haunt; no obscure
alley into which he did not penetrate, and make its
reeking
atmosphere vocal with his praises. Wherever a group
of talkers or citizens were gathered, the little old man
glided in and dropped a word that might bear fruit at the
ballot-box. At night-fall he would mix with crowds of
ship-wright's prentices and laborers, and kindle their
rugged hearts with the thought of the young candidate.
He stopped not with grown men and voters, but seizing
moments when he could, he whispered the name in
children's
ears, that being borne to parents by gentle lips, it
might be mixed with kindly recollections, and so be made
triumphant.
It was given out that the Blinkerites had established or
discovered, in some under-ground tenements that never
saw light of day, a great warren of voters. When the
toilsome old man learned of this burrow that was to be
sprung against his favorite, he looked about for an equal
mine, whence voters might be dug in scores, at a
moment's
notice, should occasion demand. With this in
view, one afternoon he entered Water-street, at Peck Slip,
like a skilful miner, as though a great shaft had been sunk
just there.
And a strange climate it was that he was entering;
one where the reek and soil are so thick and fertile, that
they seem to breed endless flights of great white
overcoats
,
and red-breasted shirts and flying blue trowsers,
that swarm in the air, and fix, like so many bats, against
the house-sides.
Tropical, too, for there's not a gaudy color, green or
red or orange-yellow, that the sun, shining through the
smoky atmosphere does not bring out upon the
house-fronts
;
and for inhabitants of the region, there are
countless
broad-backed gentlemen, who, plucking from some
one of the neighboring depositories a cloth roundabout, a
black tarpaulin and white slops, sit in the doorways
launching their cigars upon the street, or gather within.
Hobbleshank, a resident of the inland quarter of the
city, certainly came upon these, with his frock and
eye-glass
,
as a traveler and landsman from far in the interior;
and when he first made his appearance in their
thoroughfare
,
looking hard about with his single eye, it could not
be cause of surprise that they wondered aloud, as he
passed where the little old lubber had come from, and
that more than one of them invited him to a drink of
sheep's milk, or a collop of a young zebra, that one
avowed they were chasing in the back yard for supper, at
that moment.
But when, as he got accustomed to the place, he
accosted
them with a gentle voice, said a complimentary word
for their sign-board, with its full-length sailor's lass
Hope upon her anchor, or sturdy Strength, standing
square upon his pins, they began at once to have a fancy
for the old man.
He passed from house to house, making friends in
each. Sometimes he made his way into the bar-room,
where, seated against the wall, on benches all around the
sanded floor, with dusky bamboo-rods, alligator skins,
outlandish eggs, and sea-weeds plucked among the
Caribees
or the Pacific islands, or some far-off shorehe
would linger by the hour, listening with all the wondering
patience of a child, to their ocean-talk. And when they
were through, he would draw a homely similitude
between
their storythe perils their ship had crossedwith
the good ship of state; and then tell them of a young
friend of his, who was on trial before the ship's crew
for a master's place. Before he left, in nine cases of
ten, they gave their hands for Puffer, sometimes even
rising and confirming it with a cheer that shook the house,
and brought their messmates thronging in from the
neighborhood
,
when the story would be recited to them by a
dozen voices, and new recruits to Puffer's side enrolled.
Then, again, he would be told of an old sick sailor in
an upper chambertied there by racking pains in his joints,
answering, they would say, each wrench to the trials
his old ship's timbers were passing through on the
voyage
she was now out uponand mounting up, he would
find him busy in his painful leisure, building a seventy-six,
razeed to the size of a cock-boat, for the landlord's mantle.
Gaining upon him by degrees, Hobbleshank would sit at
his side; and by-and-by, when he saw it would be kindly
taken, gathering up a thread of twine or two, and helping
to form a length of cable or rigging. By the time a dozen
ropes were fashioned he would have a promise from the
old sea-dog that he would show his teeth at the polls when
roll-call came.
There were some, too, engaged in boisterous mirth and
jollity in back-parlors, just behind the bar; where a
plump little fellow, in his blue roundabout, duck trowsers
supported by the hips, and tarpaulin hat, with a flying
ribband that touched the floor, and shortened him in
appearance
by a foot, broke down in a hornpipe to the sound
of an ancient fiddle, that broke down quite as fast as he
did. In the enthusiasm that held him Hobbleshank even
joined in, and with some comic motions and strange
contortions
of the visage, carried the day so well that he won
the back-parlor's heart at once; and they promised him
whatever he asked.
The little old mantrue to the interest he had first
shownbent himself with such hearty good will to his
task, that when, after many days' labor, he left
Water-street
at its other extremity, there was not a ripe old salt
that was not gathered nor a tall young sailor that was not
harvested for the cause. And so he pursued the task he
had set to himself without faltering, without a moment's
pause. For days before the contest came on, he was out
at sunrise moving about wherever a vote could be found;
nursing and maturing it for the polling-day, as a gardener
would a tender plant; watching and tending many in
out-of-the-way
places, and by skilful discourse, a chance
33
word, an apt story, ripening it against the time when
it was to be gathered.
Late at night, when others, who might have been
expected
to be stirring and making interest for themselves,
slumbered, Hobbleshank, taking his rounds through the
city with the watchmen, with more than the pains of
an industrious clear-starcher, smoothed the placards on
the fences; jumping up where they were beyond his
height, as was often the case, and brushing them down,
both ways, with outspread hands, so that they should read
plain and free to the simplest passer-by. Was there ever
one that toiled so, with the faith and heart of an angel,
in the dusty road that time-servers use to travel!
CHAPTER XXXIV.
HE DINES WITH THE MAGISTRATES.
In the very midst of these silent labors of Hobbleshank,
Puffer was at his desk meditating a letter from an
imaginary
constituent to himself, and had got as far as To
the Honorable Puffer Hopkins, M. C., when there filed
into his chamber three gentlemen, who, looking about
for a moment and discovering that there were not chairs
enough to hold them all, drew themselves up in a line
and stood before him. Puffer, quite equal to the
emergency
,
rose from his desk and faced his platoon of
visiters. One of them, the head of the line, was a tall
gentleman in a cigar-ash complexion, and a rough
frock-coat
,
in the pockets of which he deposited his hands; the
centre, a stout, rosy personage, whose head was propped
up by a shirt-collar of alabaster purity and stiffness under
his ears; and the other, a little black-haired man, with
a large mouth, and arms of an extraordinary length.
Mr. Hopkins inquired, delicately, into the object of their
mission.
We have come, sir, said the long-armed gentleman,
reaching forth convulsively to the chair from which Puffer
had risen, drawing it before him and fastening both
hands firmly on its top; We have come, sir, to express
our respect for your past public careerour admiration
of the unflinching fortitude with which you have adhered
to objects
Yes, sirto objects, interposed the stout gentleman,
cutting in as if he thought the long-armed man was getting
more than his share; Yes, sirto objects of a profoundly
patriotic character; and, sir, we feel the honor of being
delegated to wait upon you for the purpose of testifying
the interest with which your course has been watched,
not only, sir, he pursued, thrusting his left hand into his
coat and spreading it upon a ruffled bosom; not only,
sir, by the friends of good order and correct principles
of advanced agebut also
By the rising generation; continued the tall gentleman,
groping earnestly in the bottom of his frock-coat pockets,
and drawing himself up to his full height. You will not be
surprised, therefore, sir, to learn that we are authorized to
ask you, in the name of the Common Council of New-York,
to partake of a dinner with the magistrates of this city
At the almshouse, said the long-armed gentleman,
this afternoon
At five o'clock, said the stout speaker.
The three orators had put Puffer in possession of their
errand, and he had a shrewd guessas one of them was
an alderman, and the others assistantsthat this was one
of those cases where a committee had been unable to
agree upon a mouth-piece, and had compromised the
difficulty
by distributing the speech, as fairly as they could,
in three parts.
The invitation was not to be slighted; and, having
appointed
to call for him at four, they filed out of the
apartment
in the same order in which they had entered. At
four o'clock they re-appeared, coming up in a body to
wait upon him to the carriage, as if determined that no
one should enjoy a crumb of honor more than the other.
The vehicle into which the party mounted was an old
corporation hack, and the horses, having traveled this
road any time for ten years past, jogged along at an easy
gait, knowing well enough that an alderman does not like
to be disturbed in his agreeable reveries on the way to
dinner. Leaving the streets, in less than half an hour
they were out upon the avenue, where, as they glided
comfortably along, they were constantly passed by
gentlemen
in rough coats, just like the tall assistant's, who,
bending over in light wagons, gave the rein to
long-legged
,
dock-tailed horses, and emulated the speed of
other gentlemen with long-legged nags and rough coats.
Sometimes one passed, perched in the air upon an
invisible
axle resting between two huge wheels, and who held
himself suspended, it seemed, by a constant miracle. Not
more than fifty of these gentry had whirled by, tearing up
the avenue, and losing themselves in clouds of dust in
the distance, when the three aldermen, looking
unanimously
out of the coach-window, exclaimed in a breath,
Here we are!
Puffer looked out too. A great gate opened silently
from within; their carriage glided through, and rolling gently
down a broad way, they found themselves at the East
river's brink, shut out by thick walls from all the city
world. The buildings that stood behind them, and with
which they were fellow-prisoners in this silent realm,
were dark and grey.
The air and place were tranquil as midnight, and in
strange contrast with the incessant motions and shoutings
of the busy road they had left. The old Alms-House,
resting on the very water's edge, sate as silent as a stone;
the water, calm and smooth, seemed to stretch away
before
its dark old front, to furnish a glass in which it might
view itself and learn how it bore its age. The sun poured
a full afternoon into the yardand, sitting in its very
centre, his face against the river, in the porch of the
building
as they entered, was an old beggar, who, with a
countenance of marble firmness, and locks white as the
unhetcheled flax, seemed to be the image and god of the
stillness that reigned about.
The moment they ascended a few steps and opened a
door, a peal of laughter burst, like a cloud, upon the
silence
,
in their very faces, and passing through the hall,
they were in a room where the chief guests were
assembled
.
In the centre of the group stood Mr. Gallipot, the
mayor, in an entire new outfit, so ill-adjusted and
disproportioned
to his person, that there could not be a doubt
but that it had seen Chatham-street in its infancy, and
while it was growing into the dress of an adult mayor.
How are you, Hopkins? cried his honor from the
midst of his guests; Let's have you this way! Open the
ring, Jenkinsstand back there, Tom Smith; and,
falling
away as they were bidden, Mr. Gallipot came
forward
and seized Puffer cordially by the hand. Messrs.
Jenkins and Tom Smithtwo noted bottle-holders of the
mayor'soffered him as hearty a welcome, with others, the
chief politicians of the city, who were there; and a short
fellow, in a poor-house grey roundabout and poor-house
cut hair, coming in and giving the summons, they marched
across the hall to dinner. The table was spread in a large
square room, with delicious windows upon the river, and
under the auspices of a stout gentleman, who hung in a great
frame upon the wall, and gave warranthaving been a
noted haunter of the room in his life-timeof the good
cheer that there abounded.
There was no quarrel for precedence; the mayor, with
Puffer at his right hand, seized the head of the table; the
others fell into chairs, whose locality they seemed to have
pitched upon long before, and, seated once, they filled
them so happily, one might have sworn they were born,
each man, for the particular windsor or rush-bottom he
occupied
.
The three stickling committee-men, even, had
adjusted matters, the stout one sitting at the foot of the
table, in its centre, and each of the other two at his wings.
And when, speedily and in solemn order, the dishes
began
to appear, as one after the other came in at the head
of the apartment, a whole galaxy of eyes rolled that way
and fixed upon them with a lingering fondness that would
have moved the soul of a pagan.
And now that the table was full, Puffer was not a little
surprisedbut quite as well pleasedto see his old
friend Hobbleshank handsomely laid between a couple of
aldermen, with whom he seemed to have a good
understanding
,
at the other end.
Imperfect and obscure is the experience of any one
who has not eaten a poor-house dinner. The highest
happiness
allotted to manat least in his imperfect and
sinful
state of existence as a New-Yorkerit would seem, is
to dine at the old Alms-House. Jupiter, restored to
earth, would make his first call there; and there Bacchus,
if allowed, would undoubtedly bespeak lodgings for the
rest of his immortality.
For two weeks, in anticipation of the present banquet,
the garden had been hoed and harrowed and forced; the
neighboring river had been anxiously searched for
certain
delicate fish that were known to lurk in the rocks,
holding themselves in reserve for an alderman, for an
equal fortnight; and two sharp-eyed paupers had been
off on an excursion up the Sound, in watch for duck and
pigeon. Nothing could be more perfect, more delicious
and grateful, than the dinner spread upon the board; and
nothing more artful and ingenious than the arrangement of
the diners. The cooks and servants of the establishment,
moved by a sure instinctmost of the guests were habitual
frequenters of the placeseasoned each dish to a turn,
and each gentleman was now found seated directly
opposite
whatever a well-practised appetite most earnestly
coveted. For better than an hour, a silence profound as
death reigned through the hall. The waiters, in their
poor-house livery, and licking their chaps, moved about
on tip-toe; it would have cost them their standing as
paupers
to have broken the charm by a word. Dishes were
brought in and removed, in a mysterious stealth, which
lent a piquancy to the proceeding; and the very feeders
themselves, absorbed in the sacred rites of the place, only
ventured now and then to look off, for a minute, and smile
to each other, and then started afresh.
This at an endwine was brought in, a basket at a
time, and being placed near his honor the mayor, he
proceeded
to uncork, but so unskilfully, it seems, that the
corks took a blank range down the table, and, what was
singular, they always fell into a line that caused them to
strike, dead-point, the sconce of a little quid-nunc, who was
said to be a butt of the mayor's. Then the bottles were
distributed down the table, one to each manwhich, being
planted upon the board, stood there, a sort of tipsy
nine-pin
,
to be bowled down by the evening's mirth. When it
was known that every glass was loaded to the brim,
Mr. Gallipot sprang to his feet; every eye was fixed upon
him with intense anxiety, and when he announced, Our
Country, they started in like manner to their feet and fell
upon their wine with such patriotic ardor, that no one
could have in the least suspected that country or its
institutions
of being in any way the bottom and main supply
of the present festivities. But when Mr. Callipot followed
this with The Public Charities, a faint surmise might
have dawned on the beholder's mind, that the enthusiasm
was real, and that they meant all they did when they
drank a bumper to these excellent corporate contrivances
for such as are an hungered and athirst. And when,
further on, his honor, allowing scarce a breath between,
followed this up with, Our distinguished guest and next
memberPuffer Hopkinsa fearful tempest swept the
table from end to end; and one or two of the lighter
quid-nuncs
were even lifted from their feet, and landing upon
the table, shook the glasses and bottles till they danced
with them with joy.
They felt grateful to Puffer for furnishing them so
plausible
an opportunity to investigate the economy of so
excellent
a city charity. Puffer was bound, of course, to
respond to these admirable sentiments.
Really, (this was the train of his observations) he never
felt so oppressed in his life in rising to speak; he was
surrounded
by kind and generous friends. He was their
creaturethey had taken him a poor friendless youth and
made him what he was. Little had he dreamed when making
his first humble effort at Fogfire Hall of attaining an honor
like this. If any one had told him the time would arrive
when he should partake of canvass-back and champagne
with his honor, the mayor, and the common council of
New-York, at the almshouse, he would have laughed at
their folly. Canvass-back and champagne!they might
as well have talked to him of a steam carriage to
Chimborazo
,
or a balloon-ride to the first fixed-star!
While Puffer was speaking, one or two of the inmates
of the place were drawn to the door, and as he advanced
in his speech, and looked off in that direction by way of
illustration or gesture, he observed that two of them had
fixed their attention keenly upon him himself. One
of them was a woman, of a stout person, into whose
face some color was creeping through easy living and
good fare, and the other a man, thin and sorrowful of look.
By the time he was done speaking, one of the
poor-house
attendants had touched Hobbleshank upon the
shoulder, and he now helped to make the group that
gathered in the door-way.
When Hobbleshank and the woman met, it was, as
their looks told, as those who have been parted for years
between whom some mighty secret is kept, and who have
some great trouble in common. They talked earnestly
togetherthe woman and the forlorn-looking pauper
asserting
something over and over again, it seemed, to which
the old man would not yield, nor would he altogether
withhold, belief.
The diners were meanwhile fairly embarkedthe
stream of mirth was full: as it flowed up and down the
board it sometimes attained a rapid head, carrying all
before it, in a general glee; or paused in little eddies and
islets of drinkers, where it tarried and circled round and
round within itself. There was one, a roaring whirlpool
of jockeys from the Avenue, who with loud jokes and
broad gusts of anecdote, kept up a constant pother where
they sat; then, farther on, there was a more quiet fry of
ex-sheriffsfine, rosy fellowshanging and jumping of
the rope are your healthiest exercises, it would seem
and then, in a stormier latitude, a shoal of aldermen, who
kept up in their drink windy discussions without end.
Among these, Puffer, as the jollity grew apace, was called
down from his station near Mr. Gallipot; and it brought
him within ear-shot of the group in the passage, who had
watched him so strangely in his speech. They were still
theretheir heads close together, Hobbleshank's central
and busiest of alland they still turned from time to time
in their talk, and regarded Puffer with the same strange
gaze. Whatever Puffer, with an ear sharpened by a
curiosity
he could not control, caught, was so straggling and
disjointed, that it conveyed to his mind no distinct
impression
of their purpose. Their conference seemed at length,
at an end.
I think as you do; he heard Hobbleshank
whispering
to the others, looking from the woman to the stranger,
and then towards himself; I thought so from the first;
but I have been too often mistakenI could not bear
to be wrong againit would kill me, Hetty; let us be
cautious.
He muttered something in a broken and earnest tone
Puffer could see his lips grow pale and quiver as he
spokeand leaving them, he hurried up the room and
took the place at the table among the friends he had left.
There was no pause in the mirth of the magistrates and
their guests; fresh baskets were broached every minute
a tipsy song roared outand the adults there present
attached
themselves to the long-necked flasks, as if they
had been brought there to be nursed on claret and
champagne
at the city charge. It was a relief to Puffer to hear
what passed among the nurslings in their probation.
Obliquely
from him up the table, an arm's-length or two,
there were a couple whose nursing seemed to try the
constitution
to an alarming pitch; and instead of being
benefitted
in any degree by the dark spirit with whom they
held so many close and earnest conferences, they
always
got back from the interview less robust in person
and demeanor than ever.
You know well enough, Billthat I o'rt to have that
place if anychap has it, said one of them, a fine, large,
sturdy-looking fellow for a nursling, speaking slowly, out
of respect to the understanding of his friend. Dn it,
Bill, dep'ty street inspectorits chalk for cheesefor one
what's done whatwhatwhat
His chin knocked upon his breast, and he kept asking
himself for five minutes or more, what it was.
I'm the man that's got up twelve public meetings in
the course of a humble life, said the other at the top of
his voice, and looking around to call the attention of the
company: Carried banners in five processions;
pallbearer
to the late devoted alderman Smith; you know
me, Mr. Gallipot? Did you ever know a more ardent
friend of his country than William Scraggs?Who'll sign
this 'ere roll for Billy Scraggs? and Mr. Scraggs produced
from his breast-pocket a soiled scroll, which he unfurled
across the table, and holding an end in his hand, he tumbled
into the same slumber that had already engulphed his rival.
After an interval of half an hour they wakened, one
getting the advantage of the other by not more than a
minute, and renewed the dispute for the inspectorship;
and after a brief and slightly confused statement of their
claims, they lapsed back again into their dreams. There
was no abatement in the spirit of the alms-house dinner.
Even till midnight, speeches were made by aldermen and
34
laymen and ex-sheriffs; healthssometimes of
individuals
,
sometimes a broadside of the table against
broadside
were
drained, and Puffer, finding that a sadness
had crept upon him, out of all harmony with their mirth,
quietly withdrew, leaving his three committee-men on
their feet together, and at an advanced stage of
champagne
,
delivering speeches against each other; and his
honor, the mayor, with his bottle-holders squeezing lemons
vehemently at each side of him, brewing a drink for which
he was famous.
In the open air, he found the door-way and high steps
thronged with paupers, who had kept themselves from
bed that they might listen to the uproar and jollification of
their masters. It was such precious fun, one of them
said, to see the copporation feeding its copporationand
getting high on taxes and brown bread. Puffer thought
he had escaped unobserved, but as he entered the
carriage
he found Hobbleshank at his side, asking to bear
him company.
To be sure, answered Puffer, I would rather ride
back with one like you than the three I came up with.
The old man smiled, but was silent, and this silence he
maintained till they were half down the city; and when
he began to speak, Puffer observed that his discourse was
not of that in which either had an interest, but of remote
and indifferent things; like one unwilling to speak of that
which is nearest his heart, and who trifles in this way
lest he betray himself.
CHAPTER XXXV.
THE TRIAL OF MR. FYLER CLOSE.
Two months from the burning of Close's Row, a
large-nosed
man with brandy-colored cheeks was busy, at early
morning, locking the Hall gates, when a small old man
shambled up, and holding on at the outside, accosted him.
Does the trial come on to-day? he asked.
To be sure it does, answered the other, looking up;
Didn't you know that? A man with a augur-hole for an
eye might see that. Look at them wagons over there,
pointing with a key through the bars, into Chatham-street.
When you see 'em taking in pies at that rate in them
shops, there's a capital offence coming on up stairs. Them
shop-keepers is growing blessed rich on murders and
hommysidesthe Oyer and Terminer demand for pies
sells 'em out twice a day while the court sits.
How did he sleep last night? asked the old man.
He did not mention him by name, but the other knew that
he meant the prisoner.
Oh, beautiful, sirvery beautiful, sir! answered the
large-nosed gate-fastener. We haint had a lovelier
prisoner sin' Johnson's day.
An inexpressible spasm convulsed the countenance of
the questioner, which, being busy at the lock, the officer
did not observe.
No dreams? resumed the old man, holding hard upon
the bars. Wasn't he troubled a little in his sleep, sir?
He watched the answer with a breathless look.
Not a bit of it; not as much as 'ud stir a eye-lash;
I was in the passage by his cell the better part of the
night, and his breath comed and went like a infant's.
The old man's features fell; he had evidently
expected
a different report. The gates were by this time
all fastened close and surethe gate-fastener hurried
away, clattering his keysand going round where an
opening was left for passers in and out, the old man went
in. Climbing the winding stairs, he proceeded along the
upper passage, and took his station by the court-room door,
where he hoped the prisoner would pass. For a long
time he stood there alone, starting at every sound that
broke through the Hall. By and by they began to come
in, one by one, and cluster about the door; and by ten
o'clock the passages were all filled. Presently
blacktopped
staves were seen bobbing up and down in the
press, and forcing their way, with much jostling and an
occasional oath, the officers reached the door, and
thrusting
the crowd back, held them in check till the door was
unbarred from within.
The crowd poured in in a flood-tide, bearing the officers
every now and then from their post at the door, into the
very centre of the court-room. In less than a quarter of
an hour the room was overflowed, crowded in every
corner
,
all the seats back from the rail to the ceilingall the
passagesand some stood perched in the window-seats
and about the cornices, holding on by what they could.
The prisoner was already at the table inside of the bar;
he had been got in by a private stairs; and when the first
rush of the crowd broke in, he started in his chair
and looked wildly round, supposing, for the moment, they
had been let in to tear him in pieces.
He soon recovered himself, and turning his seat about,
watched them as they came in one by one. Among the
first to enter was the small old man, upon whom, from the
first moment, Fyler fixed his eye, and turning from time
to time, watched him in the crowd. Was that man abroad
yet? his look seemed to say. Fyler thought he had
driven his plans so keenly, that he must have been by
this time clean out of his wits, and pent up in some cell
of madmen or other.
Presently the judge entereda long, withered man, with
a face as dry and yellow as a mummy, and a shrub of
dusty-looking hair, standing off from his crown in every
direction. Fyler looked up into his face as he passed, and
smiled; the judge, without taking the slightest heed of
the prisoner, proceeded to his place upon the bench, where
he busied himself with a newspaper. In a couple of
minutes more he was followed by a large red-cheeked
man in a predominant shirt-collar, and a supple, small
man, who, bestowing themselves upon chairs on either
side of his honor, looked as judicial and dignified as a
pair of weazel-eyes and a highly-starched shirt collar
would allow them. The court was in session; and order
being demanded by the presiding judge, there was for five
minutes an incessant running to and fro of officers through
every part of the court room, crying hats off, and
waking up every echo that had slept over night in the
angles and cobwebs of the chamber. One rushed into
the outer passage shouting silence with such vehemence
that one might have supposed he was calling, in his
distraction
,
for a personal friend instead of a genius or spirit
with which he was on such doubtful terms of
understanding
.
The court was duly opened by proclamation, and
at the judge's bidding a crier of the court, a
white-haired
old fellow, began turning a wheel, and drawing
ballots on which were written the names of the persons
summoned for the present trial.
One by one, as they were summoned, they emerged
from the crowd and were sworn. Some had read the
newspapers, and couldn't sit on the jury without hanging
the prisoner. One had a theory about heads which would
compel him to acquit the prisoner; and another a theory
about faces which would oblige him to convict. There
was a keeper of a livery-stable that never knew a man
nor a horse with such an eye as the prisoner's, that wasn't
vicious. More than a hundred were dismissed in this way.
At last, by dint of baffling the point, and hunting scruples
in at a needle's point, and out at an eyelet-hole, they
succeeded
in obtaining twelve men, who, though they read
the newspapers, didn't believe a word of them; who
knew the facts of the case, but hadn't formed an opinion;
and who, though they had conscientious doubts about
hanging in any case, thought they could string a man up
if the law positively required it.
The case was calledthe prisoner was arraignedand
being helped to his feet by two officers at his side, was
asked for his plea.
I'm a ruined man, sir! answered Fyler, looking
wildly around; and I 'd like to have a pint of beer!
Saying which, he knocked his head through his hat, and
winked out at the top, at the judge, with all his might.
I see how it is; said the judge, coolly; remove his
hat, officergo on, Mr. District Attorney.
The district attorneywho was for all the world, just
such another looking person as the judge, cut down two
sizes, that is, he was as dry, as hard featured and
thin-haired
,
but not so tall by a headpulled down his
waistcoat
and opened the case.
The crime of arson was a dreadful crime; it had
prevailed
to an alarming extent in this community, and he
called upon the jury in that box to say whether a stop
should be put to it or not. Was there a more dreadful
crime conceivable, gentlemen of the jury, than the one
with which the prisoner at the bar was charged? Who
was safe in this community if such things were allowed?
Firethat terrible element whose wing scathed wherever
it swept; (he detected in the jury-box a Presbyterian
gentleman
who smiled at this allusion, and he worked it out
at great length.) Firethe accredited agent of
omnipotenee
in balancing accounts with the world; the element
by which temples, and palaces, and warehouses were to
be all wrapped into everlasting nothingness. He would
be able to show the circumstances under which the
buildings
in question, (he meant Close's Row) were fired; that
it was an act of cool, fiendish, and black-hearted villany.
That it had been premeditated for a long time, and that a
moment had been chosen to put it in execution when a
terrible loss of life must have ensued. He would show
that jury that the prisoner at the bar was inspired by the
spirit of a fiend; and had acted true to the spirit by which
he was inspired. It was to be seen whether this
community
would countenance such a spirit. He sat down,
and the moment he struck the seat called out for J. Q. R.
Sloat.
Mr. J. Q. R. Sloat thereupon stepped forward, and
proved to be a gentleman with staring eyes, a pair of
thick-set
whiskers, and extraordinary coolness of deportment.
He took the witness's stand, and, sucking his teeth
sonorously
,
was sworn.
You are an officer of police, Mr. Sloat? said the
district attorney.
I am, sir, answered Mr. Sloat.
What do you know of the firing of the buildings called
Close's Row, on the 19th of June last?
I was a-walking about that time, at nine o'clock in
the evening, answered Mr. Sloat, coaxing his
whiskers
with his hand, and addressing himself to the jury,
along Madison-street, in company with officer Smutch,
when we brushed by a man in a grey over-coat. `Smutch,'
says I, when we had passed him a step or two, `I smell
brimstone!' `So do I,' says Smutch, putting his fingers
to his nose; and here let me say, gentlemen of the jury,
there isn't a more indefatigable officer
Never mind that, interrupted the attorney for the
prisoner; you needn't puff the policewe all know
what they are! And the prisoner's attorney smiled
knowingly upon the jury.
As I was saying when I was interfered with, resumed
Mr. Sloat, rather impertinently; `It's that man in the
grey over-coat,' says I, `and we'll track him.' The smell
was strong upon him, and as Smutch and I's both quick
of scent, it wasn't much to do that. The grey over-coat
turned a corner, and went into an alley in Scammel-street.
Smutch and I followed. There the grey over-coat got
down into an areacrept into a windowwhich was too
small for Smutch and I to go in atand we saw nothing
more till there was a blaze in the middle of the floor, and
the grey over-coat along side of it, feeding it with shavings
out of a basket.
Well, sir, said the judge, hurrying him along, you
waited till the person came out, and then seized him.
No, sirbegging your honor's pardonno such thing,
answered the heavy-whiskered witness, bristling up;
`Smutch,' says I, `we'll walk away for an hour, and
then be hack and see what comes of this.' Smutch said,
`by all means;' and we went off to a porter-house and
played a couple of games of dominoesand then walked
back quietly, so as to come upon the prisoner unawares.
Did you now arrest the person? asked the judge
sharply.
We did not, sir, answered the officer: But as luck
would have it, when we got back there was a grand blaze
of light; the buildings was all in flames. `The best
thing that could have happened,' said Smutch to me, `for
now we'll be able to catch the prisoner when we see him.'
`You're right,' says I, `and there he goes!' A man at
that minute went by the alley, and run down
Scammel-street
at the top of his speed. `Now for it!' I cries to
Smutch, and we started off. We run him pretty keen
around four blocks, and got him at last into an
engine-house
.
Well, sir, you took him prisoner? said the judge
again.
No, sir, it was a watchman running to give the alarm,
rejoined the witness. But we chased two or three other
men in the course of the night, on suspicion; when luck
would have it, we thought of going back to the fire.
Where you took the prisoner, I believe? said the
district attorney,
Not quite yet, sir; there we saw the prisoner, and
there we watched him, on suspicion; and seeing what I
did, I felt justified, at last, in taking him into custody.
He tried gammon some, but Smutch and I was too much
for him. I takes no credit to myself, concluded the
witness
,
turning to the judge. Please your honor, it was
Smutch that planned the whole thing. If it hadn't been
for that indefatigable manBut he was cut short again.
The attorney for Fyler was a square-built man, with
iron-grey locks, a determined eye and look, and sate
confronting
the witness through his evidence, with his
coat-cuffs
rolled back.
Now, sir, said he, leaving his seat and taking a place
where he could put his face close to the witness; Do
you mean to say that a police officer has sufficient
knowledge
of law to know how to arrest a criminal in a case of
arson? answer on your oath!
Police officers know some things as well as other
folks, he replied, looking about the court to the
constables
on duty, for approval.
Now tell me, sirdidn't the prisoner tell you at the
time of his arrest that he was Barabbas, King of the Jews?
Yes, sir.
Yes, sirand didn't he tell you that his mother was
Mary Scott, the clear-starcher in Republican Alley?
He did.
And you knew his name was Close. One more
question
;
Didn't he, when you seized him, order your arm to
wither?
Yes, sir, he did, but I thought
Never mind what you thoughtyou forgot to mention
these rather material circumstances: That'll do!
Mr. Smutch being next called upon the stand,
corroborated
Mr. Sloat, with a single exception; he said it was
owing to Mr. Sloat's unparalleled exertions and ingenuity
that the prisoner was arrested, and not to himself.
During the testimony of these witnesses Fyler was
restless and uneasy, constantly murmuring to himself;
putting on and taking off his dilapidated hat, and
dancing
his feet upon the floor. Having at length drawn
the attention of the court upon him, the judge asked
whether there was not some way to restrain the prisoner.
Fyler's counsel answered that he believed there was a
young man in court who was familiar with his ways, and
who might perhaps be able to pacify him. Whereupon
Ishmael Small being summoned, came forward from
behind
a pillar, whence he had watched the proceedings of
Fyler with unbounded delight.
Do you know this man? said the judge.
A little, sir, answered Ishmael, scraping the floor
with his foot, and waving his crape-bound hat. Ishmael
always wore a weed in public; it was more respectable,
and made the public sympathize with him as a bereaved
young gentleman.
Can you mention any thing to make him quiet?
Nothin'll make him comfortable, answered Mr. Small,
with the air of an oracle, for the eyes of the whole court
room were upon himbut givin' him a small bag of
gold to look at, containin' about five hundred dollars.
A small bag of gold was accordingly sent for at a
neighboring broker's, in the name of the Oyer and
Terminer
;
and being brought in was set down in front of
Fyler.
You'll have to shake it, sir, added Ishmael, appealing
to the court, to satisfy him it's the full sum.
An officer was directed to put him at rest on that point;
as soon as he was assured it contained honest metal to
the proper amount, he fixed his eyes upon the black brand
on the outside of the bag, and was quiet.
The cobbler, one of the tenants of the Row, was called
to the stand. He set out in his testimony, with a protest
against the organization of the courtavowed a hostility
to all courts, and forms of lawagainst all proceedings,
officers, sheriffs, and appurtenances of lawand was at
last brought to admit, which was the git of his evidence,
that with his wife, he was in Close's Row on the evening
it was fired.'
The lightning-maker proved a much more exuberant
and productive witness. He expatiated upon the domestic
comforts he had enjoyed; shed tears when he spoke of
his two children and his lame wife; and concluded by
saying he was never more taken aback in his life, except
once, and that was when Commodore Decatur was struck
in the pit of his stomach with a couple of quarts of
lightning
,
off Algiers. When called upon, in his
cross-examination
,
to explain this incident in Decatur's career, he
35
stated that it occurred at the theatre, by mistake, when
Mr. Smirk, an intemperate gentleman, performed the part
of the Commodore.
Two or three other tenants of the Row were brought
forward, who showed that they were at home in the Row
when the fire occurredand the district attorney, raising
his voice, saidWe rest!
Springing from his chair at this summons, counsellor
Blast unslipped the knot of his tape-tied bundle of papers,
and dashed them sideways with his hand so that they
spread out over the table. Confirming the backward roll
of his coat-cuffs, and dotting the floor with a discharge of
tobacco pellets, he addressed the jury, in a manner peculiar
to himself; sometimes starting forward with doubled fists,
as if it were his purpose to challenge the twelve
respectable
gentlemen before him to a personal encounter, and
sometimes ranging up and down their front discharging a
broadside of invective into the jury-box as be passed.
He had never risen, he said, under so great a sense of
embarrassment
in his life, as in the present case. His client,
the prisoner at the bara poor, friendless old manlooked
to him as his last hope, the final wall and barrier between
himself and the grave that yawned for him. It had never
been his fortune to present to a court and jury, a case like
this one, so full of all that appealed to the noblest
sympathies
of our nature. They beheld before them, in the
prisoner
at the bar, a melancholy caseone of the most
melancholy he had ever knownof mania in a subdued
form. The unfortunate prisoner was
non compos mentis
, as
he meant to show, at the time of the alleged crime; and
they now saw in him a wreck of what he had been.
Fyler Close, gentlemen, the prisoner at the bar, was
once blessed with peace, and health, and competence like
you; but now what is he?Behold for yourselves!
(Fyler was busy eating the end of a pipe-stem which had
been handed to him by his counsel before he rose to open
the case.) His faculties are all in disorderhis eye has
lost its lustrein a word, reason has left its throne. By
a series of misfortunes, gentlemen, which it is out of the
power of the best of us to foresee and guard against,
this unfortunate prisoner has been deprived of all he
possessed
and
at one time it was considerable. It was not
necessary to go into the particulars of this loss; it was
enough to say he stood before them that day pleading in
behalf of a starving, a penniless, and a houseless lunatic.
And how was this lunacy brought on? Why, gentlemen,
as you have doubtless anticipated me, by the peculiar
state of his pecuniary affairs. It was four weeks and
four days, as they would show by competent testimony,
from the commission of the alleged act of firing, since the
belief first entered the mind of the prisoner, that he, the
prisoner, was an angel of light. We will show you,
gentlemen
,
that he acted up to the belief; and we will show
you further, that he, the prisoner, was of the opinion that
when he had served out a brief apprenticeship of four
weeks and four days, as a rag-pickerbeing all this time
an angel of lighthe would become a regularly licensed
angel of Fire, empowered and authorized to burn buildings
and kindle conflagrations wherever he chose, throughout
the city of New-York. It does not appear that his patent
extended beyond that. And now, gentlemen, continued
the learned counsel, raising his voice after a visit to his
papers at the table; and now, gentlemen, how is this
borne out? Why, gentlemen, by the most incontrovertible
proofs that all his habits were regulated on this belief;
that he conformed as far as it is in sinful man to conform,
(this was for the Presbyterian juror, in offset to the
prosecuting
attorney's appeal,) to his angelic calling. He had
from that time forward led the life of a pure spirit in all
his private acts, serving out only his probation as a
rag-picker
.
If he succeeded in showing thisif he succeeded,
as he believed he would, in proving that the insane belief
had taken entire possession of the prisoner's mind
how much soever it might conflict with the policy and
interests of insurers, increasing the risk, as it did, of fires;
howmuch soever it put to the blush the religious portion
of the community, who had had in this poor, aged
rag-picker
an example of true and beautiful humility; he was
sure of their verdict.
Mr. Clerk, call Ishmael Small.
Counsellor Blast retreated to his chair, and Ishmael,
emerging from a knot of officers with whom he had been
conferring, passed Fyler, casting a mournful look upon him
as he went by, and appeared in the witness' stand, with
his crape-wreathed hat upon his head.
The Clerk presented the Bible, and hinted a removal
of the hat.
Conscientious scruples, your honor, said Ishmael,
looking toward the judge, and laying his right hand upon
his breast. The 'Pocryphalgive me the 'Pocryphal.
It being found, on investigation, that the Apocryphal
books were not included in the court version, Mr. Small
consented to compromise matters by spreading his palm
upon the blank pages between the Testaments, and was
sworn.
Be good enough to tell the court and jury, Mr. Small,
said Fyler's counsel, what you know of the belief that
has got possession of this unfortunate prisoner's mind?
When did you first begin to observe symptoms of his
malady?
I'm inclined to think, answered Ishmael, it's a long
time since he thought he was a angel of light, but it's only
latelyabout four weeks and four days before the fire, as
you mentioned in that eloquent openin' of yourssince he
took up the business regularly.
He seemed to consider himself a sort of angel a long
time agodid he?
He did, sir, judgin' by his conduct, continued Mr.
Small. He seemed to despise all sorts of plain food
and as for roast beef and baked 'taters, the very smell of
the family dishes from the baker's down stairs, almost
drove him mad.
How was it about fire and clothing?
Worse and worse. To see how he'ud sit in that
room o' his in the sharp, blowy nights, countin' the bare
bricks in the fire-place, one would ha' thought there never
was such a angel for standing low temp'ratures; and as for
clothing, he thought flannels was invented by a man out
o' work. He was a great advocate, when he was himself,
for cut-down shoes and round-jackets. That was Mr.
Close's model for a well-dressed angel.
Did Mr. Close ever assume such a dress himself?
He did, sir, when he began to turn out as a rag-picker.
He was to be a rag-picker four weeks and four days, and
then he was to be a angel of fire.
That will do, Mr. Small, said counsellor Blast; you
may go down.
Stop a minute, cried the prosecutor, as Ishmael was
stepping from the stand. Do you say, sirrecollect
you are in a court of justice
I do, sir, interrupted Ishmael, and I feel a
veneration
for that plaster-head over there, that I can't
express
.
The audience turned in a body towards the nondescript
bust fixed in a niche of the opposite wall, and laughed.
The court ordered silence; the officers shouted silence;
and an echo, to the same effect, came from the niche
where the cast in plaster stoodand the district attorney
put his question directly
Do you say that this prisoner's conduct has been,
since the time you speak of, that of an angel?
Not havin' the pleasure of a personal acquaintance in
that sphere of life, answered Ishmael, I wouldn't say.
I will ask you, continued the district attorney, if
you don't know that he was in the habit of taking heavy
usury on money which he loaned?
If he did take twenty or thirty per cent. from a seedy
feller, now and then, he learned it from a church-member
that he knewand he was the most angel-like gentleman
that ever come to see him. The church-member used to
tell Fyler he felt the cherrybins wings a-fanning him.
Then you consider the prisoner an angeldo you?
All things considered, answered Ishmael, pondering
and turning his hat in his hands, I do. If there ever
was a angel on earth, he was one.
It's a liehe was a thumping villain! cried a voice
in the crowd.
The court started to their feet; the lawyers sprang up
and turned around; the officers ran to and fro, shaking
their staves, and on the look-out for the offenderthere
was an universal commotion.
Bring that man up! shouted the chief judge. The
officers echoed the order from one to the other; every
eye was hunting for the culprityet he was not found.
The prisoner knew the voice well, and would have
named the peace-breaker if he had dared. It was the
little old man who had been the first at the Hall-gates in
the morning. After a while the excitement subsided, and
they resumed business.
I'd like to have that gentleman as a witness, said
the state's attorney to a brother counsellor, in a whisper,
and then to Ishmael, who was withdrawing from the
standAre you related, in any way, to the prisoner,
Mr. Small?
I call him uncle, sir, sometimes, answered Ishmael,
falling stupid, suddenly, at the question; I'd call you
uncle, sir, if you'd let me.
Has it ever been suggested to you, that there's a
family likeness between you and the prisoner?
A family likeness, exclaimed Ishmael, between
me, a sinful eater of cutlets, and that pure-minded old
gentleman
that lives on fresh air and sea-biscuit! Don't
mention
sich a thing again, siryou hurt my feelings!
I see how it is, said the district attorney; you may
go down, sir.
Ishmael touched his hat to the judge, and making a
graceful bow to the court-room generally, descended to
common life, and resumed his post as an observer, as
before
.
The next that appeared in behalf of the defence, was a
sharp-eyed little man, (the dealer in crockery, whom
Fyler
had foreseen as a witness,) who hopped upon the
stand, and was very uneasy till he was sworn; a rite
which he seemed to enjoy.
You know the prisoner, I believe, suggested Fyler's
counsel.
I do, sir, answered the crockery-dealer, fastening
upon the rail before him with both hands, and jerking his
body back and forth as he delivered his testimony. His
name is Fyler Close, he lives in Pell-street, up one pair
of stairs; there's a bakery underneath with a back-yard,
there's a cistern in the yard, but the water isn't good;
that's owing to pigeon-houses in the next streetthere
isn't a finer collection of pigeons in the city, however
the owner's a potter-baker in Doyer-street, a large man
with a wen on his nose
Stopstop! cried Mr. District Attorney Pudlin, as
he would have done to a runaway horse; You must
come a little nearer the case. We don't want
Long-worth's
Directory.
Be good enough to tell the court, resumed
counsellor
Blast, what you know of an aberration of mind on
the part of the prisoner. Answer directly, if you please.
I will answer directly, said the crockery-dealer, and
I know this muchI was standing in my shop-door, if
the court please, in the month of June last, looking about
me, as is my custom, when about two blocks off I saw
Two blocks? interrupted the district attorney.
Yes, sir, two blocks, retorted the crockery-dealer
rather angrily; I saw a man engagedhe was about
five feet high, a little under perhapsthe sun was setting
up the street, and I saw his face was as pale as a white
china dinner-set; he had on a blue roundabout, a broad
straw hat, and he was running backward and forward in
the gutters, at a terrible rate, stooping down and raising
up like whalebone. `I see how it is,' said I to myself;
`Judging by the rate at which he's at work, that's an
insane
rag-picker.' Presently he works his way down
directly
opposite my shopI keep in Division-street,
gentlemen
of the jury, No. 19, china-ware, earthern-ware
and every thing, of the first qualityand by that time his
basket was brim-full and running over the top of the
handle
,
and I saw it was the prisoner at the bar.
Well, sirwas there any thing peculiar in his look at
that time? asked the judge.
There was, sirhe looked sideways out of both eyes
at once. I saw the mania was coming on him strong, for
he began to fumble with his jacket-buttons, and whistled
for an invisible dog.
What was the dog's name, sirperhaps you'll be
good enough to give us that, said the prosecuting
attorney
,
looking at the jury and then at the witness.
He didn't whistle it quite slow enough to make it
out, answered the omniscient dealer in crockery; but
as soon as he whistled, and the dog didn't come, I know
he dashed his basket upon the ground, and running
backwards
first, came back to the basket again with such a
supernatural leap as I shall never see again while I live.
And this he kept doing till it was broad dark, and when I
went in to strengthen myself with a cup of tea and a piece
of toast, (I like my toast done brown, please your honor,)
against the shock of such a pitiful sight, leaving my
shop-boy
to keep an eye on it. When I got back the basket
was gone, the prisoner at the bar was gone, and when I
came to question the boy, I found out
That will do, sir, interrupted the district attorney,
bringing him to a dead pause; We don't want to know
what your boy said or what your boy saw. Now, sir, if
your friends can spare you I'll put a question or two to
you.
He's your witness, sir, said counsellor Blast, waiving
his hand over the table.
Now, sir, you say you judged the prisoner to be
insane
from the rate at which he was picking rags into his
basket when you first saw him. How fast would that be,
sir?
Why, sir, rejoined the witness, not taken by surprise
in the least; A sane man might pick a ton a day.
Then an insane one would pick a ton and a quarter,
perhaps?
No, I don't think that would be conclusive of his
insanity
a
ton and a half might.
Will you be good enough to account for the
remarkable
observation you have made: How do
you
explain
it, smiling to the jury.
Why, sir, if the court will pardon me, I should say it
was owing to an increased nervous vitality in the
fingers
You needn't go any further, interrupted counsellor
Blast; we are done with you, and much obliged. We
have a medical gentleman here, Mr. District Attorney,
who will perhaps be able to put your mind at ease on
that point. Will Dr. Mash be good enough to take the
stand?
At this request, a stout gentleman in a red face, a red
camlet wrapper, as much overrun with frogs as the land
of Egypt itself, and bearing in his hand a burly cane with
an ivory head, came forward, and climbing into the witness'
station, propped himself with both hands upon the cane,
and looked steadily at Fyler's counsel in waiting for a
question. He was evidently loaded to the very mouth.
Dr. Mash is so well known, I will not put the usual
questions as to how long he has practiced, &c., said
Fyler's counsel; will you be good enough to oblige the
court, Dr. Mash, with a definition of insanity?
Insanity, I would say, sir, answered the doctor
swelling
,
till he strained his very red-camlet coat fastenings,
with professional pride; insanity, I would say, sir, is a
general looseness, or incoherence of ideas, brought on by
the over-action of the brain. For instance
Ah, interposed Fyler's counsel with deference; you
will favor the court by giving an example.
I will, sir, rejoined the doctor; for instance: if the
district attorney, there, should become so engrossed in his
duties as a public officer, as to put the fines he collects into his
own pocket, instead of carrying them to the city treasury;
that would be a case of limited mania, or partial insanity.
There was a general laugh at this view of the case.
That would be an example of looseness of ideas
brought on by over-action of the brain, would it? asked
counsellor Blast, grinning; How would that apply to
the case of the prisoner?
Very clearly, sir, answered the doctor; the sudden
loss of fortune fixing the mind upon one point constantly
that of the loss in questionwould exhaust the
recuperative
powers of the other faculties; and the consequence
would be, that in a very short time the brain would go by
the board.
Have you had opportunities of observing the
deportment
of the prisoner before to-day?
I have, sir; and I am decidedly of opinion, as I was
then, that he is disordered in reason. I have seen him in
the public streets, and such were my convictions as a
professional
man, that I thought the public safety required
that he should be lodged in an asylum.
That's all, Dr. Mash.
Stop a minute, sir, cried Mr. Attorney Pudlin;
Perhaps
you will be good enough to tell us who first called
your attention to the lunacy of the prisoner?
I think it was the young gentleman on the stand this
morning, answered the doctor.
You think?You
know
it was, Dr. Mash, pursued
the district attorney; and now tell me, sir, hadn't you a
36
suspicion all along, that this was a got up thing between
the prisoner and that young gentleman?
Not the slightest, said the learned doctor. He
seemed to be a benevolent young person, who meant
well by the communityand I gave him a certificate of
prisoner's lunacy.
At this there was a general laugh through the
court-room
;
every body that had seen Ishmael seemed to be
pretty thoroughly satisfied that he was badly treated when
he was called a philanthropist.
You did, eh? said the district attorney; then the
sheep was wronged that was killed to furnish your
diploma
:
we are done with youyou are not wanted any
more.
Dr. Mash went down, clinging to his came in his
vexation
till the sweat poured from his brow.
As it may be as well to set the jury right on this
question
of insanity, I'd like to put a question or two to Dr.
Parsley if he is in court, said Mr. Attorney Pudlin.
Dr. Parsley, being called, came forward briskly: he
was a little bald-headed man with glasses, and a nose as
red and shining as a cherry. He hopped into the witness'
stand smartlyand having his coat buttoned, and a slight
shrub of hair brushed away from either side of his head
to give him a more formidable appearancehe stood ready
for questioning.
Dr. Parsley, will you be good enough to give the court
your definition of insanity? asked the District Attorney.
With pleasure, answered the bald-headed Doctor,
speaking up: Insanity, according to my notion, is a
general
concentration, not a looseness, of ideas superinduced
by the apathy or imperfect action of the rest of the
brain.
Do you think the prisoner insane from what you have
heard?
I do not, sir.
Will you be good enough to tell the court and jury,
Dr. Parsley, why you think the prisoner
not
insane?
I will, sir, with great pleasure, answered the Doctor.
It appears, from a part of the testimony, that the
prisoner
,
in his supposed attacks of the disease, jumped
backward
and forward over a basket. It does not appear that
he ever jumped into the basket. Now, insane menas
far as my observation extends, and it has been by no
means limitedalways jump into a basket when they get
a chance.
He is your witness, said the District Attorney.
One question only, Doctor. How does that agree
with your definition, asked counsellor Blast.
Well enoughin this way, sir. If his mind had been
concentrated, or overtasked to an insane degree, he
must
have jumped into the basket.
The case was now mainly closed, and a clerk of the
Phnix
Company being called, only to show that the buildings
in question belonged to Fyler Close, and had been insured
for a handsome sum in that Company, rather more in fact
than their real value; the court suggested that it was
ready to hear the summing up of the prisoner's counsel.
The plea for Fyler was brief:he was an old man; he
had lost his all; he was before them a melancholy
spectacle
of dethroned reason; a verdict of Guilty would
be a judicial murder; and he appealed to them as humane
menmen having grandfathers and old uncles, to deal to
the prisoner justice tempered with mercy.
The district attorneyhoisting and lowering his
waistcoat
incessantly, in the intensity of his eloquencefollowed
at greater length.
He had proved the arson beyond all question: the
prisoner's
counsel had yielded that point: and now, as for
the insanity, he regarded it as a fetch from beginning to
endthere were certain eccentricities in the prisoner to
be sure, but not more than an old apple woman exhibited
every day in the year. There was cunning, he was inclined
to think, mixed with the prisoner's madness. Did you
observe, gentlemen, in opening this case, how silent the
prisoner was when his own counsel was before you? and
yet when I addressed you, you recollect, he was as busy as
he could well be crushing his teeth and kicking the table
in the legs. You can draw your own inference from that,
gentlemen. I had expected to prove that the young
gentleman
,
who appeared on the stand, was more nearly
connected
with the prisoner by ties of blood than he was
willing
to admit? that a corrupt understanding existed
between
them in relation to the circumstances of the present
case, there could be no reasonable doubt. I have now
done my duty, gentlemen of the jury, as prosecuting
officer
,
and it only remains for you as good citizens to do yours.
Calling an officer to him, and whispering him to bring
a tumbler of brown stout, by the private stairs, and place
it in the folds of the erminethe red curtain behind him
to be ready when he was through, the long judge rose
from his chair, drawing himself out, joint by joint, and
proceeded to charge the jury. As the sole object of the
long judge seemed to be to wrap the case up in a
swathing
of words and generalities, to prevent its taking cold,
it would be impossible to do him any thing like
justice
in a report. The result was, that after he had been
on his legs better than two hours, when the clock
numbered
towards midnight, the juryall abroad as to the
facts, the law and the equitywere put in charge of an
officer and led off through a door into a small, dusty,
cobwebbed
,
candle-lighted room, where they were locked in,
in company with a small square table, to meditate upon
the case.
CHAPTER XXXVI.
THE JURY-ROOM.
For the first few minutes after they entered the jury-room,
not a word was spoken; they sate around the square table,
which just held twelve, with their heads toward the centre,
watching each other's faces sharply for the first glimpse
of a verdict.
A spider's thread fell from the ceiling and hung
dangling
above the table, bearing a fly struggling at its end.
Guilty or not guilty, gentlemen? said the foreman, a
close-shaven, blue-faced man, with glittering eyes,
glancing
round the board as he put the question, by way of
breaking ground.
Guilty, for one, answered a fat citizen on his right
hand, sweeping the struggling fly into his hat which he
produced suddenly from behind his chair. We must
have an example, gentlemen. The last three capital
indictments
got off, and now it's the sheriff's turn for a pull.
We must have an example.
Three for breeders and the fourth to the bull-ring,
spoke up a gentleman with a deep chest and brawny
arms. That's the rule at the slaughter-house. We
always
follow itand so I say guilty, if the rest's
agreeable
.
But the rest were not agreeable, and they launched
into an elaborate and comprehensive discussion of the
case, led on by a high-cheeked gentleman in a
white-neck-cloth
,
who begged to ask whether any one there was
prepared
to say whether angels could, under any
circumstances
,
become rag-pickers? That was the gist of the
case. There might be angels of firehe had heard an
excellent discourse on that subject in the Brick church
and that would account for the prisoner's burning the
buildings. He had been rather pleased with the district
attorney's calling Fyler Close the demon of that element;
but then would it be in character for a demon to go about
with a basket and a hooked stick? He couldn't see into
it just yethe would like to hear the opinion of the other
gentlemen of the jury on that point.
It is n't always easy to tell them insane chaps at first
sight, pursued another, a short juror, who, resting his
elbows upon the table, looked out from between them
with flat face and saucer eyes, fading far away in his head,
like the hero of a country sign-board. There was one
of 'em got into our house in Orchard-street one day, and
when he was caught, he was at work on a stun' lemon
with his teeth like vengeance. Now, that was insanity at
first view, but when we come to find his pockets full of
silver-spoons and table-knives, that was
compos mentis
and
the light of reason.
How many stun' lemons would you have a feller eat,
I'd like to know, retorted the deep-chested member, to
make it out a reg'lar case?
One full-grown 'd satisfy me, answered the
sign-board
,
other gentlemen might require more.
The Board was unanimous on this point, one would be
enough.
I'd have you take notice of one thing, gentlemen,
said a thin little man, starting in at this moment from a
corner of the table, with a nose like a tack, and eyes like
a couple of small gimlet-holes. There was a point in the
testimony of that Sloatthe police-officerthat's very
important, and what's better, it escaped the district
attorney
,
and the prisoner's counsel, and the very judge on the
bench. Now, I want your attention, gentlemen. You will
recollect that Sloat testifies to a man in a grey over-coat
going into an alley in Scammel-street, and getting into the
basement of Close's Row. That was the incendiary, no
one doubts that. Very good. And then Sloat goes a
little further, and says he was gone long enough to play
a couple of games of dominoes; and when he gets back,
he says, a man went by the alleymark thatwent by
the alley and down Scammel-street. That wasn't the
incendiary
,
was it? By no means, gentlemen; where was
he then all this time? I'll tell youhe drew his breath
hard, and turned quite pale as he looked around. It's
my opinion, gentlemen, the incendiary was roasted alive
in the basement of them buildings.
There was a shudder through the jury-room: the jurors
turned about to each other, and said, Who would have
thought of that? and it was admitted on all hands to be
a very plausible and acute conjecture and well-worthy of
the gentleman in the eyelets and tack-shaped nose.
It can't be, said the fat citizen, balancing his hat in
his two hands, and looking sternly at the fly in the bottom
of the crown. If you could only make that out, we
might let this prisoner at the bar off. I can't believe he
was so nicely caught. No, noif that had been the case,
somebody would have found the bones done brown and a
pair of shoe-buckles. Don't give way, I beg you,
gentlemen
,
to the pleasing illusion.
And so saying, he knocked his hat upon his head and
smothered the fly.
I have great faith in that China-ware witness, said the
gentleman in the sign-board face. He was right in that
observation of his: a man out of his wits always talks to
people a couple o' hundred miles off and whistles for a
invisible
dog. I had a cousin, gentlemen of the jury, that
went mad as he was coming through this ere Park one day;
he was a boat-captain, and was a comin' from his sloop, and
he asked the Liberty-Goddess, a top of the hall, to take
snuff with him. On re-considerin', I think Fyler Close's is
a case of lunat-ics.
Two or three other jurors thought as much.
That mug of beer satisfied me, said one.
Would he ha' sp'ilt a new hat that his counsel had
bought to give him a respectable first appearance in court
with do ye think, Bill, said another, appealing to the
last speaker, If his head hadn't a been turned clean round.
It's a gone nine-pin, that head o' his?
Now, gentlemen of the jury, you must excuse
me
a
few minutes, if you please, said a stout, rugged,
hard-headed
gentleman, with heavy eye-brows, rising at one
end of the table, and thrusting back his skirts with both
hands. This is a great moral question, whether the
prisoner
shall be hung or not. Am I right? You are!
You are! from several voices at the upper end of the
table. A great moral question, I say: and its owing to
a great moral accident that I am with you this day, for if
if I hadn't eaten too many tom-cods for my supper last night,
I should have been off in the seven o'clock boat this
morning
,
to the anniversary of the Moral Reform at
Philadelphia
.
Now the community looks to us for action in this
case. If this man escapes, who can be hung? Where's
the safety for life and property if we can't hang a man
now and then? Hanging's the moral lever of the world,
and when the world's grown rotten by laying too much on
one side, why, we hang a man and all comes right again.
If we don't hang Fyler Close he'll hang usmorally, I
mean.
This was a director in a fire company, who had
smuggled
himself upon the jury, by giving out that he was a
gentleman, and blinded Fyler's counsel, by hinting that he
was doubtful of the policy of hanging; what he said
produced
a sensation in the jury-room. The twelve judges
began to put it to themselves, some of them, whether
premiums
wouldn't go up if this house-burner escaped;
others, that New-York might be burned to a cinder if this
was'nt put a stop to somehow or other (There had been
a brilliant and well-sustained series of fires for better than
a twelve-month;) and others, that as he had failed to turn
his insanity to the best account by hanging himself, they
would take it off his hands and attend to itas he was a
decrepid old gentlemanfor him.
Pardon me, gentlemen, said the foreman at this stage
of feeling; I think this is a clear case for the sheriff.
The prisoner is an old man; he has no friendsnot a
relation
in the world, one of the witnesses said; he's lost
his propertyand as for his wits, you see what they're
worth. Now the next candidate that comes along may
be a fine black-haired, rosy young fellow, who may have
tickled a man with a sword-cane, or something of that
sort, with a number of interesting sisters, an aged mother,
and a crowd of afflicted connexions. You see what a
plight we would be in if we should happen to be drawn
on that jury. Are you agreed, gentlemen?
There was not a little laying of heads together;
discussion
in couples, triplets, and quadruplets; and in the
course of two hours more they were agreed, and rose to
call the officer to marshal them into court.
Stop a minute, gentlemen, if you please, said the
fat citizen; this is a capital case, you will recollect
and it wouldn't be decent to go in under five hours.
He's right, said the foreman; and you may do
what you choose for an hour.
Two of the jury withdrew to a bench at the side of the
room, where, standing close to the wall, one of them
planting
his foot upon the bench, and bending forward, entered
upon a whispered interview. Two more remained at the
table; while the others grouped themselves in a window
looking forth upon the Park at the rear of the hall, and amused
themselves by watching a crowd that had gathered there,
under a lamp, and who began making signs and motions to
them as soon as they showed themselves. The most constant
occupation of the crowd seemed to be passing a finger
about the neck and then jerking it up as though pulling at
a string, with a clicking sound, which, when once or twice
they lifted the window, and as it seemed the most popular
and prevailing sound, could be distinctly heard.
This is the luckiest thing that could have happened
in the world, said one of the two jurors that had taken
to the wallthe gentleman in the sharp nose and
weazel-eyes
addressing
himself to the deep-chested juror with
brawny arms, who was the other; I wanted to speak to
you about that black-spotted heifer, and this is just the
chance.
You couldn't speak on a more agreeable subject,
retorted the deep-chested gentleman; but you mustn't
expect me to take off the filing of a copper from the price;
what I asks at Bull's Head this morning, I asks now.
I know your way, rejoined the other; you never
come down even the value of a glass of beer to bind
the bargain; but it wasn't thatwhat grass was she
fatted on?
Short blue, answered the deep-chested gentleman,
firmly.
Any salt meadow near? asked the other.
Not more than twenty acres, responded the
deep-chested
juror, with the air of a gentleman carrying all
before him; and swimmin' a healthy run o' water a
rod wide give the critter a belly-full any time.
Two years old the next full-moon?and a cross of
the Durham in her, I think?
Not a cross of the Durham, I tell you, answered the
deep-chested gentleman, raising his voice a little, but
the Westchester bottom, and hasn't known a dry day,
nor a parched blade, since she was calved.
No Durham blood? I'm sorry for that, said the
sharp-nosed gentleman; If you could throw me in that
lamb I took a fancy to, we would close.
Throw you in the lamb? That's a good one, cried
the deep-chested gentleman, bursting into a laugh of scorn.
Why, I wouldn't throw you in the singeing of that lamb's
wool. Only five and twenty for the prettiest heifer that
ever hoofed it down the Third Avenueand throw you in
a lamb! That
is
a good one! And he burst into another
scornful laugh.
Well, well, said the sharp-nosed gentleman, soothing
him with a prompt compliance. Drive her down to my
stable as soon as the verdict's in.
Meanwhile the two that remained at the table were
employed
.
Have you got that ere box in your pocket, Bill? said
one of them, a personage with a smoth clean face, from
which all the blood would seem to have been dried by
the blazing gas-lights under which he was accustomed to
spend his time.
To be sure I have, answered the other, a gentleman
of a similar cast of countenance, but a trifle stouter. Did
37
you ever catch Slickey Bill a-travelling without his
tools? He produced a well-worn dice-box from his
coat, and began rattling. What shall it be?
The highest cast, `guilty,'  said the other, and three
blanks shall let him go clear. That 'll dowont it?
Jist as good as the best. It's your first throw.
The other took the box in hand, gave it a hoarse,
rumbling
shakethree fours. The other shook it sharply
two blanks.
Guilty by , they both said together.
They then indulged themselves with a variety of fancy
throws, as to the state of the weatherthe winning-horse
at the next Beacon coursewhether the recorder (a
gentleman
in whom they felt a special interest,) would die
first or be turned off the bench by the Legislature. Every
now and then they came back to the case of the prisoner,
andwhat was singularthe result was always the same.
The Hall-clock struck threethe legitimate five hours
were upand the jurors gathered again around the table.
Gentlemen, are we agreed? asked the foreman.
We are! answered the jury.
Yes, and what's queer, we've been trying it with
dice, and every time it's turned out three twelves agin
the prisoner; so the result's right, any way you can fix
itisn't it so, Bill?
Exactly! answered the gentleman appealed to.
The officer was summoned, and putting himself at their
head, they marched into the court-room with the air of
men who deserved well of the newspapers for their moral
firmness; and who, at the sacrifice of their own feelings,
were rendering a great service to the community.
The court-room was nearly a blank. The judge and
the two aldermen had waited with exemplary patience
the deliberations of the jury, and were now in their places
to hear the result. Fyler's counsel, with a clerk, was
there also; and the district attorney, the clerk of the court,
and two or three officers and underlings, loitering about.
The prisoner himself sate at his table, a little pale, it
seemed in the uncertain light, but unmoved.
The crowd of spectators had dwindled as the clock struck
teneleventwelve. Mr. Ishmael Small, after tarrying
an hour or two, had gone out with the others, and
disposed
of his leisure in playing a new game of ball, of his
own devising, in the west side of the Park, with a crew
of printer's boys from the neighboring offices.
In the whole outer court-room, there was but a single
spectator, the little old man that had been the first at the
Hall-gates in the morning, who looked on, leaning against
a remote column, at the judges, who, from that distance,
seemed, in the dusky shade of the unsnuffed candles
standing
about them, like spectres, gradually fading into the red
curtain that hung at their back.
Mr. Clerk, call the jury! said the chief judge in a
voice, which great usage on the trial and the incidents
of the place made to sound sepulchral.
The jury was called, man by man.
Arraign the prisoner! in the same unearthly and
startling voice.
The prisoner was arraigned.
What say you, gentlemen of the juryGuilty or Not
Guilty?
Guilty!
Fyler started for a moment, but instantly recovering
himself, smiled vacantly upon the judge and jury, and
began
whistling, as described by the crockery-dealer. The
little old man clasped his hands firmly together, and
breathed an earnest thanksgiving from the dusky corner
where he stood alone. In a few minutes it got abroad that
the prisoner was convicteda shout shook the air
without
,
and presently a crowd rushed in that filled the Hall
afresh. The prisoner was to be taken out by the private
way, but the little old man was not to be cheated this
time. He had urged himself through the press, and
stood against the lintel of the door through which he must
pass. In a few minutes he came alongwhen Fyler saw
who it was that watched his steps, he glared upon him.
Hobbleshank gazed after him as he passed away to his
doom, with a look of unrevengeful triumph.
CHAPTER XXXVII.
MR. CLOSE'S LAST SPECULATION.
In the Tombs' prison, where he lay under sentence of
death, Fyler Close maintained, as far as the limits of his
cell allowed, the same sports and humours he had practised
in the open air. The turnkey, who had charge of this
range of cells, whenever he looked in or brought his food,
never failed to come upon him in the very ecstacy of a
new device or gambol. This was in the day when
Fyler would place himself in the middle of the floor, and sit,
huddling his limbs together, gathering the sunthat
streamed
in at the window of the cell at certain hoursin his
outspread hands like so much fire. But with the night
he crept into a corner, and stood shivering and driving off
with the self-same hands, shapes that swarmed thicker than
the sun-beams by day. He cursed the darkness; it was no
friend of his. The very first night he had lain there after the
trial he got into the corner furthest from the door, and while
he crouched there, the jurors glided across the floor, one by
one, and whispered in his ears, Guiltythen after them
the judge, with the same word in his mouththen the
haberdasher
,
the poor blacksmith, Hobbleshank, and whoever
else he had dealt with, and muttering the word so that
it hissed in his ear, passed away.
One night the two lamps that light the prison-yard at
the rear, and lend a ray or two to the condemned cells,
went out; and Fyler, vexed beyond measure, dashed his
hands against the door, and shouted for LightLight! They
left him alone, supposing it was some new freak, until he
fell down in his agony, and was found in the morning pale and
trembling, his eyes starting from his head, and his hair
bristling
up. The keepers wondered what he had seen to stamp
such a horror in his look. With the day he recovered his
strength, and tried his gambols afresh. It was the second
morning after this that the turnkey entered his cell, and
placed his food before him, standing aside while he
despatched
it if he choose. This officer was square and
heavy in his frame; but with one of his lower limbs so
far beyond the other in the length that he had the
appearance
,
as he came along the gallery, swinging his long arms,
and stretching it out before him, of working a great wheel
the revolutions of which drove him on. He stood against
the door, his long limb planted before him like a table, and
on this he rested his elbow, and regarded Fyler, who
made it a part of his scheme, to devour such food as was
set before him, with the ravening eagerness of a wolf.
I suppose you're aware the hanging comes off next
Friday? said the turnkey, by way of sharpening his
appetite
.
That's a capital idea! answered Fyler Close,
looking
up from his meal, I hope I'll have flitters and fresh
biscuit for breakfast that morning: Whose to be hung,
eh?
You are the queerest chap! pursued the turnkey,
slapping his long leg with his knuckles. Why, next
Friday's you're dayyou own it and can do jist what you
please with it till twelve o'clock. It's only a half apple,
after all. Next Friday's got no afternoon to you, old chap.
Now, between ourselves, aint you afeard to die?
This interrogatory moved Mr. Close's mirthful feelings
greatly: he rose from his bench, tossed his knife and fork
high in the airand marching to the basket that had
brought his food, and which was at the turnkey's side, he
cast in the great blue plate from which he had eaten, as if
it had been a huge coin, and said: There, sirthere's
two hundred and fifty thousand dollars for the bread and
steak. He broke into a dance which extended through
the cell, and occasionally included his bed, upon which he
mounted, by way of interlude.
The turnkey was answered: he gathered the basket
under his armturned for a look at Fyler, shaking his
headand locking the door, set his wheel in motion and
moved away.
A week only. Fyler began, in his mind, to see the
gallows-tree
rising in the yard. Instead of sleeping now, as
he had done all along, with some comfort, he spent the
better part of the night, standing upon his bed, which he
had drawn there, stretching himself up, his whole length,
and gazing through the narrow window of his cell, to catch a
sight of men moving in the yard below, or the stars, or the
line of dusky light that rose beyond the prison-wall, where
men were free, and walked the streets unchained. A week
only. The chance of a commission to inquire into his
madness, with a hope of which he had toiled so hard and
long in his freaks, seemed fading fast and leaving him
manacled
more than ever. One trial more and he would fix
his mind. The next day when the turnkey came in he
took him apart, as though there had been a great crowd
listening
to catch every word that dropped, and in a
mysterious
whisper made known that he had great news for the
keeper, and begged him to be brought at once. The
turnkey turned about and stared at Fyler, but not
knowing
what there might be in his wish, went away and
presently
came back announcing that the keeper was at hand.
This was no sooner made known than Fyler, standing out
upon the floor, and fixing his hand, bent up after the
fashion
of a born, began blowing furious blasts. The keeper
was a stout personage, with an inquiring nose, and dark
brows; he stood in the door, filling it to a hair, and
looking
doubtfully at Fyler, asked what this meant?
That's what he calls his Final Trump, answered the
turnkey; he was blowing trumpets all last night.
When he had blown not less than forty peals, Fyler
came down his cell, and taking the keeper by the collar,
led him into the middle, and turned him about so that
he faced a blanket pinned against the wall. Having
provided him with this eligible point of view, he pulled
down the blanket and disclosed a great number of rude
figures, sketched upon the stone in chalk.
What's all this? asked the keeper, again.
You know he's a angel of fire, sir, as was shown at
the Oyer, answered the turnkey; and these is his
victims
!
On a closer inspection, one of them was found to
resemble
not a little the long judge; there was another, a little
shambling figure with one eye out, and another,
heavy-browed
,
and solid of port as he could be made to appear
in rude chalk. This the turnkey thought was a juror who
had pressed matters against Fyler at the trial. They
were all scarcely more than scrambling lines upon the
wall; about them was a great pother of shrubby marks
and scratchesthis was the fire.
Well, sir, said the keeper to Fyler, when he had
studied the lines a while; What are you going to do
with these gentlemenwith this one for instance?
pointing
to the long judge.
He's in for a couple of hundred years, only, answered
Fyler; but it's a slow fire, and it'll roast him tender
before his time's out.
You don't give a juryman as much as a judge? asked
the keeper.
Fyler feigned to be all abroad for an answer till the
question was renewed by the turnkey, when it appeared
that he had allotted to the juror for special reasons, a fire
that was to last three hundred and twenty-five years and
a day.
But the fire seemed by all odds to rage hottest in the
neighborhood of the little figure with the single eye; he
seemed to have never tired of piling on the fuel, and as
far as chalk could represent, it was all a live coal. At
first Fyler said that was to burn a weekthen he added
a yearthen a hundred yearsand so kept on extending
his term, till the keeper, out of all patience, broke away.
A clear lunacy case as ever was! said the turnkey,
appealing to the keeper with deference.
Hold your tongue! rejoined the keeper; there will
be no more lunacy cases. The governor was gammoned
in the last case. Wearing spectacles without glasses and
eating sticks for beef steaks wont go any longer. Lock
the door and come along!
Fyler pondered on what fell from the keeper. Another
rivet held his prison doorhow should that and all others
be drawn at once? That same afternoon he read in his
cell, by close stealth, although no soul was present, a
paper which had got there, heaven knows how. Late
the night before a mysterious figure, more like a goblin
with interminable legs than any thing else, (it might have
been Ishmael Small,) had stalked in the street at the
back of the prison; some said afterwards it had climbed
the wall. As the paper fell through his window, dropped
from above, this might be so. Whatever it was, and
whoever
might be its sender, it quickened his thoughts not a
little. It was clearly expedient for him to get back into
his wits at once. Accordingly when the turnkey brought
his supper that night, he found Fyler quietly seated and
looking about him with the air of one just wakened from
a dream.
Where am I? who am I? said Fyler. How long
have I been in this place?
Why, old fellow, you're in the Tombs, Centre-street,
answered the turnkey, where you've been these four
weeks and better; and as to who you are, you're Fyler
Close as you was yesterday, and the day afore, and the
day afore that. That's who you are.
You must be wrong, rejoined Fyler, quite calmly.
I have been asleep twenty-five years or so, I think.
What a dream I've had! Angels about me in swarms,
dressed in handsome red dresses, and beautiful cherubs
carrying sticks with gilt tops.
Oh, oh! cried the turnkey, slapping his long knee
like one that makes a great discoveryI see how it is:
them red angels that was about you so thick was
volunteer
firemen; and as for the cherubs they're nothing else
but the indefatigables that you see in court on your trial
with their staves. Oh, ohthat's a very good one, Mr.
Prisoner. I see you're a coming-to.
So I think, too, continued Fyler, placidly. And now
that I have got back to this sinful world, I'd like a slice or
two of the bread o' life, just to cheer me up and keep me
from fainting.
Something in the way of a parson, eh? asked the
turnkey, looking curiously at him. Fyler gave him to
understand
it was; If that's it, you can have a whole loaf:
we have a wonderful run of blackcoats to this prison.
They come here to get moral texts for their sermons: you'll
be a capital oneand when it's known, won't there be a
competition! I guess not! The turnkey laughed
disdainfully
at himself: and Fyler hoped he might be made
a good text, and be a comfort to some poor creatures in
that way. The turnkey took his basket and keys and
went away; but presently returned and, putting his head
in at the door, asked Fyler What he'd begin with?
You may send me a Presbyterian gentleman, if you
please, said Fyler.
You shall have one fresh and first-rate, answered the
turnkey. I'm glad you're come-to, old feller, you'll
hang so much cheerfuller. Good night! He locked the
cell, and propelled himself at an increased speed along the
gallery, making known to the other keepers, as he passed,
that the old prisoner was in his wits again.
The Presbyterian came. Fyler eyed him sharply: he
was tall and narrow-faced. After a very brief interview
he left, finding the prisoner not open to his counsels. Fyler
confessed he didn't like his views of predestination at all,
and called for another parson. The next was large and
stout: and Fyler discovered there was an irreconcileable
difference in their notions of total depravity. Then there
came another, a short square man, who broached such
doctrine on the subject of infant baptism that Fyler almost
drove him from his cell. What a delicate conscience this
prisoner had, and how hard to please! He had but three
days more to live, and they would give him such comfort
as they could. At last there came along, after so many
trials, a snug little man, about Fyler's size, who wore a
wig, and whose religious views harmonized so entirely
with Fyler's that the broker took a fancy to him at once, and
made him spend hours with him in his cell. Fyler spared
no pains to cultivate an intimacy, and was not backward
in showing his affectionate regard for the little parson.
One night, after a long and delightful interview, in which
the little parson had inculcated a great number of
excellent
principles, Fyler said to him, Did it ever occur to
you how much we resemble each other in look? The
little parson confessed it had not.
Now I'll show that it is so, said Fyler; Let me
take your wig a minute.
He accordingly removed it from the parson's head, and
placed it on his own.
It would be so odd, said Fyler laughing, if any one
should come in nowI guess I'll fasten the door.
He drew a string, which was somehow or other hanging
there, and the door was held close.
Now let me have your coat, said Fyler. The little
parson yielded it with some show of reluctance. Then
he took his vest, his pantaloons, his shoes; then he put on
his neck-stock and his plain black hat.
Isn't the resemblance wonderful? asked Fyler, giving
the parson, who stood shivering by, a look that made him
38
shake a little more. Fyler then invited him to another
quarter of the cell, where he insisted it would be to his
advantage to have a bandage put about his arms and
waist, to keep him from catching cold. The little parson
might have made some trifling objection, but he saw that
in Fyler's look which silenced him.
It must be death to one of your tender constitution,
said Fyler, if you should get into the gallery in your
present state. He bound him to a ring in the floor,
and fastened an end of the cord to the water-fascet, so
that the least motion on the part of the parson would
flood the cell. He then placed in his hands the pocket
Bible he had brought in with him, and opening it at the
book of Job, and commending patience to him, as the best
virtue under present circumstances, he left himshivering
and bald-headedupon the floor, and stepped lightly
forth.
Moving smoothly along in his parson's dress, and
catching
as much of the parson's gait as he could, he reached
the prison-yard. When his feet struck the ground he
felt freebut looking up, with the high prison walls about
him, he breathed hard again, like one at the bottom of a
well. The sky was strangely overcast, and a chill crept
through his frame. The officers of the lower door were
away, and he was obliged to pass through the Session's
court-room. He stole up the steps, and looked through
the glass door leading from the prison-yard into the court.
A trial was going forward, and the court-room was thick
with people. He looked on for a moment with a curious
eye, remembering his own; and then shrunk back,
shuddering
at the prospect of passing through. With a keen
sense in himself of what his parson's dress concealed, he
feared they might seize him and hurl him back to the cell
he had left. He opened the doorthe officers glanced at
his black coat, and tapped the nearest of the crowd to
give him way. With a respect for the errand of charity
on which they supposed he had been bound, they fell
back, leaving a wide space through which he must pass
to the outer door. He would rather they had stood close
packed, and treated him in that regard like the meanest
of themselves. At length, with a heart fifty times at his
throat, he was upon the outer stairs; creeping stealthily
down from column to column, he reached the street. He
started forward at a swift pace, but becoming presently
confused, he halted and looked about. There was a
trouble in the skya darkness, not of tempest or
customary
clouds; an eclipse was brooding above him. A cold
shadow filled the air, and Fyler was bewildered and
alarmed. At first he went to the right, and coming upon
an object that told him he was wrong, he returned upon
his track and went as far astray on the other hand. He
had lost his way, and seemed to have forgotten, all at
once, the bearings of the streets. While he wandered, in
this uncertain mood, the cold drops starting to his brow,
there came upon the wind a loud clamor of drums and
trumpets and marching feet. Torches flashed upon the
darknessas a long procession turned a cornerand
Fyler, aided by their light, crept along a coal-yard wall.
In a minute more he was at an opening of the Great
Sewer, which was undergoing repair; falling flat upon his
face that no eye might watch him, he crept down its mouth,
holding on to the broken stones and fastenings of iron with
his hands, till he reached the bottom. He heard the tread
of feet above hima gleam of lightand all laws silence
and darkness. How far within he ever groped his way
was never known, nor what scheme he had in view, unless
it might have beenwild and bold enoughto escape in
this way to the river, where Ishmael Small, it was said,
had been seen for many hours hovering in a boat about that
mouth of the Sewer.
Nor was Ishmael himself, who had the morning after the
arrest borne away an old trunk or two from the den in
Pell-street
,
seen after that night. The last act that could tell
where the broker stopped, was, that passers-by had heard
at a certain place, as they crossed the street, a sharp and
dreadful cry for help, riving the very earth beneath their
feet. The broker's body, perishing thus amid all the
foulness
and infamy of the city's drain, was never found.
CHAPTER XXXVIII.
THE NIGHT-PROCESSION.
The unparalleled outrage of clearing the Upper-Wabash,
being sufficiently insisted upon, answered the purpose as
well as any device they could have contrived. The triumph
of Puffer was complete: he had carried his election by a
handsome majoritybowling down Mr. John Blinker,
majestically
as he carried himself, as easily as a nine-pin with
a rolling bottomHobbleshank's strong recruits (of which
Puffer had just now heard) coming in to give the
decisive
blow. The popular mind still heaving and
surging
,
searched for a channel through which to vent the
enthusiasm, (in such cases there's always a little over)
which had not been exhausted in the contest itself. The
Bottomites resolved to make a public demonstration of their
victoryone to allure new friends and terrify old enemies
and a street parade, a Grand Procession by torch-light, was
fixed upon as most imposing. The newspapers began
immediately
to trumpet the show: the wire-pullers and
busybodies
in every direction were on the alert, dusting their
banners
and waking up their retainers. In a week from the
election the preparations were concluded, and at sun down
of the day appointed, the forces of the procession began to
assemble in the Houston-street Square, East-River. Two
men were seen with highly flushed faces, the dawn of the
procession, to roll off a couple of barrels around a corner
from a neighboring pump, and hoist them upon a truck behind
a canvass banner, which denoted that these were two
genuine
and unadulterated barrels of the water of the
Upper-Wabash
,
in its aboriginal condition before the clearing
under the New Bill. A few minutes after two other
flushfaced
gentlemen came around another neighboring corner
with a couple of rolling barrels, which were duly planted
on a second truck, and which were, in like manner, given
out as so much pure fluid drawn from the mighty Hudson
by an aged sailor, who would ride in one of the barouches.
Presently a body of horsemen, with new beaver hats and
blue ribbons at their button-holes, came scampering
distractedly
into the square; and rode about issuing
enthusiastic
orders, and inspecting with military activity the
condition
of the square, from one end to the other. These
were the marshals of the procession; and in less than a
couple of minutes they were followed by numerous
detachments
of one kind and another, dropping in at
different
points. In an hour the square was full of horsemen,
pedestrians, barouches, carts, bannersand for a time there
was an unbroken hubbub of shouting voices, and an
inextricable
confusion and entanglement of all classes and orders
of society.
By dint of driving up and down at the top of their
speedriding every now and then over a child or an old
womanassailing a detachment of clamoring clerks in a
high voice of command, or imploring, with bended knees
in their saddles, a squad of mounted cartmenthey
succeeded
in forming the line. A gentleman in a dirty
round-jacket
filled his trumpet till it overflowed; a short-legged
drummer dashed his sticks against the parchment; the
crowd gave three cheers, as they do when a ship breaks
from her stays, and the Great Bottomite Procession was
launched upon the streets. There was a barouche
containing
a standard-bearer, with two committee-men to fill
up, that led the van; then a barouche bearing two
ancient
residents on the Wabash, (brought on expressly for
this occasion,) extremely pale and sicklyas might have
been expectedand obliged to be fed out of a bottle, by a
boy in the carriage with them, to keep the breath in their
body. This device the crowd approved of, and gave
three cheers more as they trotted in the wake of the
procession
.
Then there was a barouche with two
fishermen
great,
sturdy, grampus-like fellowseducated, of
course, on the banks of the Hudson, and chewing pig-tail,
in evidence of the holiness and majesty of the anti-Wabash
cause.
But when behind these the crowd caught sight of
another
barouchewrapped round and round with banners
the very horses trotting forward in trowsers made of striped
bunting, there was no limit to the popular enthusiasm. In
this, the Hero of Kipp's Baythe redoubtable Champion
of New-Yorkthe illustrious Hopkins himself, stood up,
and removing his hat, waved it pleasantly to the crowd,
at full arm's length, as though he was bailing up their
cheers, and pouring them out of the hat into the barouche.
High above his head danced the banner wrought by the
dark-eyed young ladythe blank filled as she had wished
Uncompromising Hostility to the Clearing of the
Wabash
.For
Congress, Puffer Hopkins, the Hero of
New-York
!
In the carriage with Puffer rode Mr. Halsey Fishblatt,
who had assumed a clean ruffle, of extraordinary
dimensions
,
and whose very waistcoat seemed swelling and
ready to burst with a speech, with which he was no doubt
prepared to explode the moment he should be touched. Then
there were the fire companiesthe earnest and ardent
friends of the successful candidateall in their red shirts
and leather caps, dragging their engines by the rope, and
joining in the cheerings of the crowds with lusty voice.
A throng of sailors, surging and swaying along, twelve
abreast and arm in arm, in duck trowsers, blue shirts, and
hats of tarpaulin; and then, in an uninterrupted line, in
seventeen carriages, the seventeen wards of the city,
represented
by as many emblematical gentlemen; the first,
second and third being solid, substantial old fellows, with
well-fed persons, and a cross of the Dutchman in their
look; the sixth a strapping, raw-boned genius, with a cane
in his hand quite large enough for a club or shillelah; the
seventh a plain citizen, evidently, by his dress and aspect,
rising rapidly in the world; the fifteenth a dainty
gentleman
,
with a well-plaited ruffled shirt, and copious rings
upon his fingers; and so throughout the seventeen. In
strong contrast came a shoal of woe-begone, unhappy
looking gentlemen, who called themselves, in a portentous
banner which they bore above their heads, The
Proscribed
Watchmen, (they complained that the public
offices, to which they had acquired a legal right, by ten
years uninterrupted possession, had been taken from
them,) and they wore their caps hind-foremost to denote
the depth and agony of their bereavement. With thesea
fellow-sufferer in a common cause, there rode, in a single
gig, a lady of a venerable aspect, who had for fifteen
years dispensed at one of the public watch-houses,
pigs-feet
and coffee, to the watchmen, as they came in from
their rounds. She was the mother of five childrenher
husband now dead, had lost an arm in an election riot
and she, a widow, had been ruthlessly thrust from the
watch-house
.
All this was expressed in the banner which her
eldest boy carried above her, on which were painted the
Goddess of Liberty, with a crape around her liberty-cap,
(to denote the lady's widowhood;) a one-armed ghost
appearing
from a neighboring tomb, (her late husband;) and
a table spread in a corner of the standard, at which five
small skeletons were represented as feeding on pea-soup
out of a large blue bowl.
This division of the show was received by the crowd
with an outbreak (as it was described in the newspapers)
an outbreak of irrepressible indignation. Public opinion is
always outraged in such cases, and follows the perpetrators,
they said, as surely as the shadow the sun; and here came
public opinion itself. Through all the length and breadth
of the United States there is, at all times, supposed to be
rolling a great sphere or ballpausing sometimes at
villages
which it takes in its way, then at cities or hamlets
but ever rolling on, on, along the seaboard, up
mountainsides
bounding
and rushing through valliesgrowing
steadily larger, larger, and keeping up a horrible rumbling
and tumult wherever it moves. The knocking to and fro
of this mighty ball is a favorite sport of congressmen,
editors
and others, who find a great diversion in their
sedentary
and arduous labors in racketting it about.
It was this mighty ball that was set in motion in behalf
of the lady in the single-gig; and typifying thispublic
opinion, which rolls and gathers like an avalanchea
great canvass wheel was now pressed forward, at the rear
of the single-gig, by an axle, at either end of which toiled
a dozen or two sallow gentlemen with ricketty legs, who,
in the present case, stood for Congress and the public
press. Directly behind public opinion, and taking such
advantage of its motions as he could, in a special
hackney-coach
to preserve his invaluable health from the assaults
of the night air, came Colonel Clingstone, a venerable
revolutionary veteran, whose patriotic ardor had been
incontestably
established by his eating an entire British ox
(the property of a cowboy) during the first week of the
war, which proved to be so substantial diet that he was
able to live on the very name or shadow of it ever after:
seasoned with a rumor of some gunshot wound or other.
In the rear of the venerable colonelwho did not fail
from time to time to show his frosty head at one window or
the other, just to see how public opinion got alongthere
swarmed a lean, cadaverous, deadly-looking troop, in
soiled garments and battered hats, and headed by our
electioneering agent, Mr. Nicholas Finch, with a banner
representing a group of citizens greatly cast down, and
with pocket-handkerchiefs at their eyes, weeping profusely
at the Tomb of Washington. It was observed of these
gentlemen, who had chalked their faces to an interesting
paleness to create public sympathythat whenever the
revolutionary veteran thrust his portly person into view,
one or other of them would mutter between his teeth
Cu's' that old chap! he's had fat pickings forty years
from a pin-prick! The sympathies of the crowd were
evidently with the cadaverous followers of Mr. Finch.
I know them fellers, said a squint-eyed bar-tender,
who was on the look-out; them's Finch's hunters;
they're wonderfully ill-used gem'menthey wants berths
in the custom-house, for the sake of their country, and
their country wont let 'em take the berths! Aint that a
hard case, Joe?
Crueller nor the anaconder! answered Joe, a
dependent
of a neighboring bakery; I say let every man
bake his bread in the gov'ment oven, if he likes to. Don't
we own the gov'mentand what's gov'ments good for
if they can't do a man's private washing and ironing, and
bread-making? That's my views.
The lean gentlemen, in a word, were office-seekers,
ambitious to serve the public on any termsbelonged to
either side, or both sides, as occasion required. It
was
a
great wrong to keep them out of place, for if they expended
half the ardor in serving the public which they did to
serve themselves, public affairs must have been managed
with extraordinary prudence and despatch. Poor fellows!
they were in a sad plight; no bread nor beef at home,
and their ungrateful country refusing to cash their bills.
It was as much as Mr. Finch could domoving about and
whispering cheerful promises in their earsto keep them
in spirits to go through their parts in the procession.
Behind these, comfortably quartered in a series of light
wagons, followed a body of gentlemen in high glee,
rosy-gilled
,
laughing and making merry of every object on the
road. They seemed entirely at their ease, and to have
nothing to do in this world but to carry certain torches
which they waved and flaunted about their heads as in
pastime, and merely to show the world how comfortable
they were. It is hardly necessary to add, that the
gentlemen
in the light wagons were office-holders: and that
in evidence their grateful remembrance of the man who
founded
such
a government, they carried a full-length of
the Father of his country. On a closer inspection
certain
members of the Bottom Club might have been
discovered
settled in the light wagons; they had doubtless
left off ameliorating the condition of society in order to
devote
their undivided attention to their own comfort and the
public service, on which their outcry had quartered them.
Behind these, singling himself out from the common herd,
a little man, marched about a platform, which he had
caused to be built at his own private expense and borne
up on the shoulders of four sturdy partizans, blowing a
small brass trumpet, of great depth of wind, from time to
time, and waving a small white flag with great earnestness
about his head. This gentlemen, too, was ambitious of
office, and by no means inclined to have the magnificence
of his claims confounded with the demerits of the gentry
who plodded on foot.
And then came scampering forward Mr. Sammis at the
head of a hundred and fifty mounted cartmen; and as
they rode in their frocks, tottering and tumbling in their
saddles, they resembled not a little a hundred and fifty
clowns in an equestrian pantomime, slightly beside
themselves
with strong drink.
There was a part of the line obscured by a cloud of
hangers-on, from which a report of lusty voices constantly
broke in cries of Here's the extra infantry!
Terrible
murder, sir,don't tread on my toes! Only three
centsand full of pipin'-hot soocides and seductions!
When, in turning a corner, the cloud broke, it disclosed in
their usual undress uniforms of baggy caps, half-coats and
inadequate breeches, a detachment of news-boys bearing
aloft, with an air of haughty defiance, numerous paper
ensigns
on which were inscribed, Freedom of speech and
plenty o' pies! Long Nines and Liberty! and other
decisive axioms of the news-boy creed.
39
At the heels of the news-boys, there fell in great swarms
of citizens, in long coats, short coats, hats, caps, badges
and locked arms; and, when every joint was set, it began,
at first slowly, but afterward with increased motions, to
creep like a three-mile snake, along the streets. As far as
the eye could reach either way, there was a tumultuous
flow of faceslighted up by torches, borne on high or
shadowed by banners and emblems, seeming to fill the
city, and hold possession of the night at every point.
The drum beat, the trumpet sounded, the marshals in
an ecstacy of excitement, hurried up and down the line
there was one in buckskin breeches and military
top-boots
,
who did immense execution in clearing the line
of the curbstone by riding over loafers and women who
stood in the guttersthe procession moved on. With
flaring torches they filed through the streetsturned the
distant cornersand swept in in their course whole armies
of recruits. About the chief divisions of the line the
populace clustered in swarms; and the rear-ward was
swelled with a great crowd of laggards, who in tattered
garments, many of them shoeless and hatless, shambled
after. Wherever they passed there were innumerable faces
at the windows, peering out; and the side-walks were
thick with gazers. Like a turbid stream it rolled on, street
after street, staying itself only for an instant, at different
houses, to heave a great cheer in compliment to some friend
of the party who dwelt within, or a portentous groan in
condemnation
of an enemy. When they arrived at a narrow
street that crossed their way, they came to a dead halt.
A stumping noise, in the deadly silence, was heard upon
the steps of an oyster-vaulta jolly face presented itself
the crowd burst into a cheer of recognitionMr. Jarve
Barrell laid his hand upon his breast, waved his hat
and the crowd passed on.
At length, in an overwhelming flood of a thousand
tributaries
,
they poured down upon the great square in front of
Fogfire Hall. At a given signal, and as one man, the vast
gathering bellowed forth cheer after cheerthe very air
rocked. The torches were gathered in a ring, shedding
a gloomy light upon the Park, and on the tall gaunt
buildings hard-by; a gallows-tree was brought from a
neighboring deposit. As soon as it was planted in the
centre of the square, the red-shirted firemen swarmed in
from every direction at its foota chain dropped from its
summita blazing fire kindled beneath, and a hoarse
voice shouted through a trumpet, bring him forth!
The crowd shuddered involuntarilybut when they saw
what it was that hung dangling from the chain, they burst
into a huge laugh. All the uplands and winding ways of
the city, wherever the eye could reach, were set thick
with faces, fixed upon the gallows with its iron fingers
ready to pounce upon the victim. It was a portly little
figure with a white head and green coata pair of
supercilious
eyes, (these they couldn't see)altogether not
more than eighteen inches high. Such as were near
enough said it was the great Insurance PresidentMr.
Blinker, the late opposition candidate, reduced half a
dozen sizes or so, and it was given out that he was brought
to his present ignominy by the firemen, who may be
supposed
to have harbored a special ill-will against one who,
by his constant presence at burnings and conflagrations,
caused their sport to be stayed half way. However this
was, he had been brought thither in an engine chamber,
and was now swinging above the flames which crackled
up and lovingly licked his feet, while the engine men stood
grinning about. For a long time he hung, swaying to
and fro, toying as it were with the fire, to the infinite
delight
of the crowd, who gathered in masses upon the
wagons
,
barouches, trucks, even upon each other's shoulders,
watching the progress of the immolation. At length fire
took upon his person. It's caught his right boot! cried
one. There was an uproarious shout. It's caught his
left! There was another still louder. But when the
flame began to invade the vital parts, there were no limits
to their satisfaction, which they expressed by ironical calls
to the firemen to put him out.
Why don't you play upon his second story and
upperworks
,
you fellers!Give him a jet in th' abdomen!
Why will you let the cruel flame take the venerable man
by the nose in that way! It was to no purpose; and though,
as the blaze twinkled in his eyeslooking mischievously
into their very socketshe seemed to frown scornfully
upon them, in the course of half an hour, during which the
volunteers had given the fire many an ugly stir, the great
Insurance President, with all his dignity of person and
majesty of look, was a cinder, picked up by a quid-nunc,
and in less than an hour deposited in the neighboring
museum, among the bears and alligators, and potted
beetles there preserved. Some say that this was Crump,
the Secretary of the Phnix Company, who had made
himself active in feeding the flame by which the President
had been burned.
This business overMr. Blinker done to a turnto
the entire satisfaction of every body present, there was a
loud call upon Puffer Hopkins for a speech; which call
his associate, Mr. Halsey Fishblatt, was quite anxious to
respond to.
Let me answer it! said Mr. Fishblatt; I'll tell
them a thing or two about the old villain we've just burnt.
I know him from his cradle. They expect something
about him. And while Puffer kept his seat, Mr.
Fishblatt
mounted to his legs in answer to the summons. A
broad, universal sibilation or hissing, admonished Mr.
Fishblatt that his orations were not, just then, in request,
and he dropped back into his seat like one stricken with
a ball.
There was the broad sky above themthe surging sea
of headsthe Goddess of Justice, in snow-white wood,
at his backthe streaming banner and refulgent
transparency
of Fogfire Hall in frontand, by no means least of
all, the two pure barrels of Hudson, and two of reeking
Upper Wabash, under his very eye, upon the trucks;
could Puffer fail out of all these to frame a triumphant
speech? He could not, and, as he concluded, three peals,
four times renewed, rent the circuit, and made the very
pennons rustle in the air.
Re-forming as soon as they could recover from the
bewilderment of the harangue, and in much less order
than they had set out, the procession returned up the city
in the direction of the Tombs. Though the music still
sounded, and the torches still flared against the sky, a
sudden depression seemed to have fallen upon the crowd.
Many of the standard-bearers dropped their standards,
and allowed them to trail in the dust; great numbers left
their places in the ranks and skulked away. A change
had come over the very heaven itself; the face of the sky
was darknot with accustomed clouds or shadowsthe
great shadow of the earth itself was spreading over the
firmament; an eclipse was at hand. At this moment, and
while yet there was some show of triumph and rejoicing
in the crowd, Puffer's attention was withdrawn to a dark
figure, which, scudding away from the glare of the
procession
,
coasted along the walls, turned a corner and
disappeared
,
as though it had dived into the earth. The
contrast of this single silent figure, and the great
tumultuous
crowd, was so marked, that Puffer's mind was
strongly fixed upon it.
The darkness deepened, and multitudes kept falling
off; among others, Puffer descried Mr. Sammis, as he
left his place and passed by, looking up and smiling as
he passed.
Then Mr. Fishblatt ordered a sudden halt, and without
a word of explanation disappeared from his side. What
could this mean? Were all things coming to an end? He
was meditating upon the incident, when a small, spare
figurewhich he had noticed throughout the night
hovering
about the carriage, and keeping its face turned
constantly
towards his own, on whichever side he looked,
but which, in the uncertain light he could not more closely
discernleaped upon the wheel and twitched him by the
sleeve. How like it was to a similar summons at the
very outset of his career! A voice was at his ear
entreating
him to leave the carriage.
You know you are mine, now! said the voice.
It sounded other than it ever had before.
To see your friends at the Farm-house, I know,
answered
Puffer, bending toward the questioner; but why
not come into the carriage with me, and ride out together?
No, no, you could not get out of the line, answered
the other quickly. You will not deny me this wish?
Come quicklyit darkens apace.
Puffer did not hesitatethe pageant was fast growing
to an endbut seizing a favorable pause, escaped to the
ground and followed the other cautiously through the
crowd.
CHAPTER XXXIX.
HOBBLESHANK AND PUFFER HOPKINS VISIT THE
FARM-HOUSE
.
In a few minutes they were beyond its skirts, and
moving
at a good pace toward the suburbs. Hobbleshank
led the way at such eager speed, looking forward to his
path and back to Puffer, constantly, that it was some time
before the young steps that followed reached him, and
when they did, Puffer found him so pale, and shaken by
fatigue, it seemed, he begged him to borrow his support.
Hobbleshank accepted it at once, and, with a smile of
hope and trust in his look as he turned to answer, leaned
upon Puffer, and they pursued their way. The old man's
guidance and the young man's strength bore them swiftly
on. When they looked back, from an eminence they had
reached in traveling up the citythe procession, they saw
by the flaring torch-light, was crumbling in pieces;
detachment
after detachment falling off in flakes, and with
drooping banners, melting in the neighboring streets.
As the old man and his companion moved along, there
crept out upon the air a thick darknessthe earth's
shadow lay, every minute, closer and closer to the pale
moon above. The houses seemed, in the ghastly light,
like ghosts or spectres of their former selves; the church
steeples, quenched in the dim atmosphere, were broken
off at the top.
The passengers they met as they advanced came
towards
them, wrapped in the strange darkness, like
travellers
from another world. The great heart of the city
itself seemed to grow still and be subdued to a more quiet
beating under the heavy air that oppressed its church
towers and its thoroughfares. Hobbleshank and Puffer
drew closer to each other's side at every step.
You had not forgotten that you were mine to-night?
asked Hobbleshank.
Not at allhow could I? answered Puffer. I am
yours now and at all times.
You are? interrupted Hobbleshank, quickly. Thank
Heaven for that!
To be sure I am, continued Puffer. You have
made me what I am, (I know this in more ways than one,)
and I am your creature as much as the pitcher is the
potter's
,
to carry me where you will, and to put me to what
uses you choose. I am not sorry that the Farm-house,
now your own again, is the first to visit.
Never mind that, returned the old man. But now
that you have grown to be a great man, no matter how,
won't the world be asking questions of your early life and
history? What can you tell them, eh?
Although this was spoken in a cheerful tone, he drew a
hard breath as it escaped him.
Not much, answered Puffer. I don't know that I
would tell the world any thing, let them ask as much as
they choose: but to you, my good old friend, always true,
I may say that I had no early life.
You don't mean, interrupted Hobbleshank, quickly,
that you ever suffered from want of food, or lodging, or
warmth? In God's name, you don't say that!
Puffer was startled by the old man's eagerness, and
seeing
with how anxious a look he hung upon him, he
answered
at once:
Oh, nonever thatI meant merely that my
childhood
had neither father nor mother's care; and can there
be life without them? But I ought not to repineI had
kindness and some friends. As I meant to tell you, my
first seven years were passed with a boatman who lived
on the edge of the North-River near Bloomingdale; where
I came from at first I don't know, although he used to tell
me I was found by him in the woods, when an infant.
In the woods? said Hobbleshank, cheerfully, Go
on, go on, you couldn't have been found in a better place.
The boatman's wife, or some one that was near to
him died, continued Puffer, wondering at the old man's
enthusiasm. His heart broke, his affairs went into decay,
and I into the Banks-street Asylum, as an orphan. When
I had been there some six or seven years, one day there
came into the room where we were all seated, our faces
just shining from the towel, a stout, white-headed, rosy
gentleman of a middle age; and pitching his eye upon
me, after ranging up and down the bench, said This is
the boy I spoke of! The matron answered it was.
Very good, said the rosy gentleman. His name is
Puffer Hopkins; and when he's of age let him draw this
check. He handed a paper to the matron, and smiling
upon me once more, went away.
What does this mean? asked Hobbleshank,
anxiously
.
He was no relation of yours?
I don't believe he was, answered Puffer, laughing.
Although I learned on inquiry in the neighborhood years
after, when I had drawn the money he had left me, that
he had been a bachelor, who had married late in life, and
been much mocked and joked-at for having no children.
He had given out that they might be mistaken, and by
frequent
visits to the asylum and this goodness towards me,
succeeded in getting his gossips and aspersers off the
scent. He was dead and his wife too, when I inquired,
and that was all I ever knew of him.
It was a joke then; a mere joke? said Hobbleshank.
I suppose it was, answered Puffer. This answer
seemed to be a great comfort to the old man, for he
breathed
more freely and they hurried on at a quicker pace.
The mighty shadow of the eclipse deepened and grew
heavier upon the earth. Foot passengers paused and stood
still in the road. The trees in the fields, looked like
solid shadows; the sound of wheels died away in every
thoroughfare. All life and motion were arrested for the
time; every thing was at a pause but Puffer and
Hobbleshank
;
they were moved by impulses, it would seem, not to
be stayed or dampened even by a disastrous darkness, or the
obscuration of the sky. The blue heavens, they knew,
lay beyond the apparent shadow and they pressed on.
They came to a steep road, and as they climbed this,
Hobbleshank clung closer than ever to Puffer. At
its top was an old country-house; from the windows
of which, cheerful lights gleamed upon the darkness.
The moment they came in sight of this, the old man
trembled as with an ague, and fell upon Puffer's arm for
support.
They were almost at its threshhold, when Hobbleshank,
arresting Puffer, they paused, and the old man turned so
as to look him full in the face. It was evident there
was something on the old man's mind he had reserved to
this moment.
Was there nothing, he said at length, like one who
lingers to gather resolution; was there nothing the
boatman
gave you, as evidence of the place you were found
in?
To be sure there was! How the old man's look
was renewed to youth by these few words, and shined in
Puffer's. To be sure there wasI forgot to mention it,
but not to wear it with me always in my breast, with a
hope. His hand was in his breast, but Hobbleshank
stayed him, and told him, not yetnot yetit will be
time presently. He would not trust himself to look at it.
Puffer knew something of the old man's mood, and
followed him silently as he led the way. There had been
cheerful voices from within the house, but when it was
known that Hobbleshank and Puffer were at hand, a dead
stillness fell upon the place; it was as if the old house
itself listened, in expectation of what was to be told.
They were no sooner within the hall than Hobbleshank,
pointing to a door at the left hand, said, In therego in
quicklyGod grant that all may be right!
While Hobbleshank walked the old hall, the dim figures
on its walls, watching him, as he might regard them as so
many good spirits, or evil spectres, Puffer found himself
in a small room, an ante-chamber, with two persons, one
a woman, stout, hale, and of middle age; the other a
man, spare of person, and of a sorrowful and forlorn look.
They both stood before him, as he entered, with looks
riveted upon the door with a steady gaze. The moment
he crossed its threshhold, a swift change crossed their
featurestheir whole expression was shifted, like a scene,
from that of dreadful doubt to one of certainty and
confirmation
.
It's Paullittle blackberry Paulalthough the berry's
worn out in course of time, said the woman, speaking
first, and closely perusing Puffer's features; Do you
know us?
Puffer's mind was sorely vexed and troubled; he knew
them, and yet it seemed he knew them not, for he could
call neither by name.
If I dared to hope it, he answered at length,
scrutinizing
40
his countenance, I might say this is my early
friend who brought me to be a boy seven years old; but
I don't believe it!
The man seized his hand quickly, and told him he must,
for he was no other.
You don't recollect
me
, then? said the woman,
somewhat
cast down by the inequality of Puffer's memory;
you sartainly haven't forgot HettyHetty Simmons, it
was then, Hetty Lettuce nowyour old nurse? Ah, me!
I can't be changed so sadly since then!
After a while Puffershe pressed him to itadmitted
that he caught now and then a tone in her voice that he
ought to know.
Now, to tell the truth, said Hetty, a little vexed, I
didn't know your face either; but I knew your voice the
minute I heard it at Bellevue the other night; it was me
that fastened that bracelet on your arm the night you were
stolen away.
What bracelet? said Puffer. You don't mean the
one I wear in my breast?
Sartainthe very one, answered Hetty; Let's
see; I guess it's a match. Hetty held in her hand a
half bracelet; in a minute more she had Puffer's;they
were matches, as she had guessed; the same auburn
hairthe same golden clasp. She threw open the door
Hobbleshank stood there like one in a swoon, white and
trembling, his two hands hanging like dead branches at
his side.
Come in, said Hetty; Good heavens, it's all as we
thought!
At this bidding Hobbleshank staggered across the
doorsill
,
and casting himself upon Puffer's neck, muttered
brokenly, My sonmy son! The tears fell from his
old lids like rain. Mrs. Lettuce, and the other, laying
the broken bracelet upon a table by the side of the great
breast-pin which was there already, took each other by
the hand and silently withdrew, leaving father and son
to know each other, after a life-time's separation, in peace.
With halting words, with tears and passionate embraces,
Hobbleshank made known to Puffer the chances of his
past life, how his mother diedhe did not tell him all,
there were dreadful words he could not trust himself
withhow he was losthow in twenty years he had
often thought his child found again, but was so often sore
baffled, and almost broken in hope. From the first, he
felt that Puffer was his child and no other; he dared not
claim him till the last rivet fastened him back, as it had
to-night.
For many hours they had lingered together, dwelling
upon the past, so full of hope and fear and strange
vicissitude
,
when Hobbleshank, starting up as though it had
just come into his mind, said
What will they think of us? Come, Paul, we have
friends hard by that must not be forgotten.
He led him along the hall, and, with his hand in his
own, they entered another room, larger than the first,
where a company sate, in an attitude of expectation,
looking
toward the door, and watching it as it opened. They
knew, without a word, what the story was. It was
Hobbleshank
and his long lost, new-found son. They looked
upon him whom they had all known as Puffernow that
he was Paul, and the old man's childwith new eyes.
How kind in Hobbleshank, to bring together such, and
such only, as he knew Puffer (for so we love to call him still,)
would most desire to meet. There was Mr. Fishblatt,
standing with his skirts spread, in the middle of the floor,
ready to open upon the case at the first opportunity; and
at his side Mr. Sammy Sammis, whose face, from being a
cobweb of smiles on ordinary occasions, was now a
perfect
net, in every line and thread of which there lay
lurking
a gleam of welcome. Then there was old aunt Gatty,
who smiled too, but afar off, like one who has not quite
so sure a hold of the occasion of her smiling as might be
desired, and seated near Dorothy, who whispered in her
ear, and did what she could to make her conscious of the
change that had come over the fortunes of her old friend.
Not far from these, something of a shadow in their midst,
was Puffer's early friend, the forlorn stranger; and Mrs.
Hetty Lettuce, who had not altogether recovered her
spirits from the shock of not being recognized by her boy
and nursling. But who were nextto whom Puffer gave
his earliest gazewhere his eye lingered so long? No
other than the little old aunt and the dark-eyed young
lady.
Puffer shook hands with them one and all: as if he were
starting the world anew, and wished to set out well. There
was no lack of voices, one might be well assured. Mr.
Fishblatt, at the top of his, declaiming upon it as one of
the most extraordinary, unparalleled, wonderful histories he
had ever known. (He had heard but the half yet.) Mr.
Sammy Sammis corroborating, and Hobbleshank running
from one to the other, and demanding, in a highly-excited
state of mind, opinions upon his boy. Then he would
come back again, requiring to be informed whether he
hadn't done wellwhether all had not been managed
with great discretion, and as it should have been.
Hold there a minute, cried Mr. Halsey Fishblatt
at one of these questionings. Are you sure of your title
here?
Quite sure, answered Hobbleshank.
What, sir! retorted Mr. Fishblatt. Won't the
State come in as the successor to the broker, who, as a
prisoner
,
is a dead man in the law, and seize the
farm-house
?
Ah! you haven't heard the story of the deed,
answered
Hobbleshank, quickly. Who has kept that back
from you? You ought to know that.
And he proceeded to give him a full and authentic
account
of the marvel by which it had been preserved,
rescued
and transmitted to his hands by Fob and his pale
country friend.
Come and sit by me, said Aunt Gatty, in a voice so
affected by age that every other word was at the ceiling
and the next plumb-down upon the floor. Come here
by your old aunt. Puffer placed a chair by her side:
she seized both his hands in hers, regarded him steadily
for some minutes, and then said, still gazing, How like
his mother!very likedon't you see it, Dorothy?
Dorothy, although she had never seen that lady, rather
than cross her old companion in her whim, admitted it
was marvelous.
That's her eye exactlybut her hairwas that black
or flaxenhow was that, Dorothy, you remember? How
old are you, my childtenperhaps twelveah, I forget
ages wonderfully, and she fell off into an idle pondering.
She evidently supposed the world had stood still for at
least fifteen or twenty years. Dorothy shook her head to
the company round, and soothed her aged friend as she
could. She presently after brightened a little, and asked
if this old man they saw was the Hobbleshank whom
she was bound to watch and guard as a death-bed trust
by a promise, at his mother's bed-side, fifty years old at
least? It was the same, Dorothy answered, and this was
his son. Aunt Gatty smiled at the news, and fell into a
new vacancy.
There was a close and whispered interview on Puffer's
part with the dark-eyed young lady, which, strain their
ear as they might, was pitched in far too gentle a key to be
gue sed at by any round, unless it might have been the
smart little aunt who sat by, brightening up as it
advanced
as though it afforded her infinite satisfaction to see
how close and whispered it was.
I buried my only daughter, said the sorrowful
boatman
,
when Puffer questioned him, many months ago
you remember heryour little play-fellowwhose blue
eyes you used to watch so closely?
Puffer didbut years had changed the hue of his mind,
and with that the color of the eye that fixed his fancy
most.
The sorrowful stranger sighed and Puffer turning away,
with some kindly thought at his heart, fell into the hands of
Mrs. Lettuce, who stood near by with a candle and
motioned
Puffer to follow her. She crossed the room and
led him into a small chamber at its side. The
chamber
,
unlike the other parts of the house he had seen, was
unfurnished; it held nothing more than a low, narrow bed,
a tattered blanket, and a few broken bed cords, trailing upon
the floor. It was cold and damp, and a chill struck through
Puffer as his companion closed the door and shut them in,
what seemed to Puffer, from the first moment, a hideous
place.
It's strange you didn't recollect your old nurse, said Mrs.
Lettuce. But never mind that: all your troubles and
tribulations
began in this room; and I want to tell what your old
father's heart failed him to speak of. This was Fyler
Close's sleeping-room for more than a year: all the while
your poor mother was sick,what snake's eyes that old
villain had!and when he stretched his neck toward that
door, when your'e poor mother was a dying, and spread
out his old ugly hands, as if he had 'em hold of her young
throat squeezing the life outBut that is'nt it. You'll ask
what all this means? The long and the short of it is this.
Fyler Close and your father loved the same woman; and
there wasn't brighter angel out of heaven than that girl;
they both loved her, Paul, but your father married her;
and from that day to this, he has had the shadow of the
devil, yes the devil himself in the form of that broker, at
his heels. Your father, Paul, was always quick and free
and lavish with his money; and that Fyler Close knew
well. He made believe that he didn't care which married
the girl, but he hated your father to the death; and as he
knew your father's weakness, he worked upon it; he urged
him to all sorts of extravagance; to buy this, and buy that,
and buy the othertill the tide begun to run back with
himand then Fyler comes in, and like a dear friend, lends
him all he wants. He was always of a lending nature,
more for spite than gain, I always thought; and so he
went on lending till your father wasn't worth a cent he
could call his own. Then Fyler began to call it in by
degrees
,
so that your father didn't see what he was driving at:
first he had to sell a picture, then an up-stairs carpet; then
Fyler came to board in this house, to keep an eye on things.
He thought plainer living proper; and the family was put
upon a short allowance.
This is a devil, as you say, said Puffer, from his
closed teeth, while the sweat started to his brow. A
devil with two hoofs!
By and by your mother fell sickit was the presence
of the old broker and a change in her way of living; she
grew worse day by day; it was no seated sickness, the
doctors said, nothing they could name; she was perishing,
I verily believe, of hunger, for every day the table was
more spare than before; the broker himself seemed to live
on air to keep it in countenance, and all that time, all the
while that poor dear creature was famishing with the pangs
of hunger at her heart, which made her cry out, though
for his sake, your father's sake, and least some direr
calamity
might be brought upon him, she said not a word.
But such cries as she uttered, so sharp and awful I never
heard in my life: and Fyler Close lay on that couch, that
very couch, drinking them all in like music. The devils
must have him, if any man. Your mother was buried.
Starved to death! gasped Puffer.
Even, so, I fear, answered Mrs. Lettuce, and her
grave is just by the house-wall, where the broker could
thrust forth his head from this chamber window, and gloat
upon it any time he chose. Your father saw her in her
grave, but more like one raving mad than a rational creature;
immediately after the funeral he disappeared, was gone no
one knows whither to this day, though it is said he lived
during that time upon the roads and highways of the
country
,
and sheltered himself in sheds and barns. The old
broker lodged here a few nights, grew disquieted it is
thought, and went into the city. Paul, Paul, said Hetty,
breaking into tears, I never thought when you were a
month's infant on my lap, that I should live to tell you a
tale like this. You didn't remember me, but I forgive
you.
Puffer stood gazing upon the bed, with a blanched face
and glassy eye, and rigid in every limb. Hetty would
not let him dwell upon it longer, but taking him by the arm
led him gently back. So pale and unearthly was his look
and action when he came forth, they all gathered about
and asked what sudden sickness it was that shook him so.
Nothingnothing, he answered. Before they could
put further question, Hobbleshank entereated them to
pardon
him for a while, and drew Puffer away. They went
into the open air, and treading gently on the earth, as
though a grave lay under every step, they stood beside a
tomb, built close under the wall. It heaved above the
earth, and Hobbleshank, laying his hand upon its top, said
to Puffer, This is your mother's grave. The swelling
vines, crested with pure white blossoms, broke like a green
wave over its marbled top.
As they re-crossed the threshhold the trouble passed
away from heaven, and the pale clear light lay on all the
country round.
Hobbleshank led Puffer again into the little chamber.
I have a favor to ask of my child, he said, but one
and that he will not fail to grantI am sure, am I?
To be sure he was, let him ask any thing he chose.
I want you, said Hobbleshank, to fix this
breast-pin
in your bosom and get married to-night.
To-night! Puffer hadn't thought of such a thing;
twenty-five
years to come would be time enough. The young
lady was in the other roomthe parson at handhow
could it be avoidedhe'd like to know from Puffer how
it was to be avoided? Puffer could suggest no
practicable
means of escape, and proceeded with the old man to
the other room, to be married with as good a grace as he
could. The little parson had come; there was the bride,
too, whose consent had scarcely been asked, in her snow
white dress; the smart old aunt smoothing the folds and
rubbing her hands alternately. In half an hour a change
had come over the aspect of Puffer's sky, as great as the
eclipse withoutbrightening, not darkening all that lay
beneath. Who can tell what gossip the old farmhouse
rung with that nightwhat plans, what jests were
broachedwhat good cheer went abroad, among them all.
How Halsey Fishblatt declaimedhow the little old aunt
chatteredhow Hobbleshank shambled up and down the
room in a constant glowhow it was finally determined
that Hetty Lettuce and Dorothy, and aunt Gatty should
come to live in the old farm-house (there was a chirping
house-full) with Hobbleshank and Paul and the new wife.
How Mr. Halsey Fishblatt would strike out some grand
scheme or other, by which they should hear and know all
that the city did or thought or said; how Mr. Sammy
Sammis, and the little old aunt would come out and visit
them, twice a week at least, in a new one-horse to be
immediately
established; and the poor stranger, too, Puffer's
early friendthere was a pleasant berth to be thought of
for hima nice little office Mr. Sammy Sammis had
pitched upon in his own mind already, and about which
he would see seventeen influential gentlemen to-morrow.
A blessing upon the old household and the young
having spun out a long sorrow as the staple of their life,
they have come upon a clear white thread, which will
brighten on in happiness and mirth to the very grave's edge!
THE END.